VOL. II. 1
CHAPTER I.
THE MEETING OF THE WARRIORS.
With
the first beams of the morning sun, the Indian
warriors of Zemaco, a wild and motly armament,
prepared
to descend from the mountains into the plain, or
rather valley, in which lay the Spanish settlement of
Darien
.
More than five thousand men, detachments from a
hundred tribes, which acknowledged the sovereignty of
Zemaco, were assembled under the lead of this vindictive
chief. They gathered at his summons from the province
of Zobayda, where the golden temple of their worship
stood, and which they esteemed to be the visible dwelling
of their God; Abibeyba, Zenu, and many other provinces,
the several cassiques of which, though not present with
the quotas which they provided, were yet required by
Zemaco to hold themselves in readiness to defend their
territories from the incursions of the Spaniards. The
hills that rose on three sides of the Spanish settlement
were darkened with savage warriors. Exulting in the
certainty of victory, they brandished their macanas of
palm wood, and shot their arrows upward in defiance,
while they sounded their war conchs for the general
gathering
.
Never, in his whole career of sway and
conquest
,
had the proud mountain chief at one time,
assembled
so vast a host. Their numbers, their known valour,
the great strength of their bodies, and the admirable skill
with which they swung aloft the club or sent the arrow
to its mark, filled his bosom with a vain confidence in his
own superiority, which the better taught Caonabo
earnestly
endeavoured to qualify and caution. But his
counsels
fell upon unwilling ears, and it was soon apparent to
the latter that the prudence which he commended had the
effect of diminishing his own courage in the estimation of
his hearers. Once assured of this, the mortified Caonabo
sank back to his little command, patiently resolved to
await events, and remove any doubts on this head, of the
Cassique of Darien, by the actual proofs of his prowess,
which he was determined to display upon the field.
When this noisy rabble, now so insolent, shall be
flying before the dogs of the Spaniards it will be for
Caonabo
to strike.
The pride of the fugitive chief, stung as it was, by the
little regard which had been given to his counsel, was yet
content with this single expression of mortification. He
led the warriors who were entrusted to his command
apart from the rest, and endeavoured to school them in a
portion of his policy. He taught them in few words a
knowledge of the kind of armour which protected the
Spaniard from his arrowof the coverings for the breast
and arms made of iron, such as were worn by the
captains
,
and that inferior substitute, known as the escaupil,
a coat padded with cotton, which constituted the chief
defence of the common men. He counselled them to
shoot at the horse rather than the man who bestrode him
disabused their minds of the belief that the steed and
rider were oneand satisfied them of the ease with
which they might despatch the fallen rider with their
clubs, when once they had wounded or slain the steed.
He showed them where the several pieces of armour were
usually joined together, and the parts most easily
penetrable
by their arrows, at which he required them to aim.
The thigh, he counselled them to select as a preferable
mark to that of any other part of the body, as being
seldom
protected; for though not a part where a fatal
wound might be often inflicted, yet, to disable a
Spaniard
was, perhaps, sufficient, with their far superior
numbers
,
to render his death subsequently certain from the
use of the war-club.
Such were some of the counsels which the fugitive
chief gave to the little band which Zemaco had assigned
him; and had these counsels, in connection with his
general
plan of conduct, been followed by the chieftain, it is
not probable that the Spaniards would have taken ready
foothold in the difficult passes of his country. The
obstinacy
and pride of Zemaco, which rejected this
wholesome
counsel, was shared among his followers; and it
was not without great difficulty that Caonabo succeeded
in making himself understood among his little band;a
difficulty which was greatly increased when he required
their obedience. They beheld their brother warriors
brandishing their weapons and shouting defiance, as they
rushed down the heights in the open face of the enemy;
and they felt as if some dishonour attached to their more
covert movement along the edges of the hills, down by
the gullies and gorges which mountain storms had fretted
in their sides, and through bush and bog, on hands and
knees, making their approach to the enemy in secret,
which they had hitherto never made without songs of
blood and clamorous threats, as if victory depended no
less in alarming the foe by their cries and threatenings,
than in beating them down with their blows. Nothing,
indeed, but the express commands of their sovereign, in
deputing the charge of them to Caonabo, could possibly
have reconciled them to a course which was seemingly
full of cowardice and degradation; and ill-concealed
indeed
were the looks of disquiet and hostility which they
shot from beneath their dark and shaggy eyebrows at the
strange warrior who compelled them to a departure from
their customs, for which they saw no necessity, and which
they obeyed without confidence or spirit. But the
fugitive
chief, though he beheld, was prudent enough to take
no heed of their discontent. He cheered them with
occasional
assurances of victory, encouraged them with the
hope of soon appearing before the enemy, and, with a
pains-taking interest that never once grew impatient, he
led them by circuitous paths, and without departing from
the route which he had contemplated the night before, so
that, upon the charge of the Spaniards, he must
necessarily
find himself upon their flank.
Meanwhile the thousand warriors of Zemaco, by tens,
by twenties, and by fifties, after the manner of all savage
people, were in motion, rising from behind the heights
where they had so long been watching, and displaying
themselves in all their strength and barbaric pomp, in the
presence of the Spaniards. They rushed down the
hillsides
to the sound of drums and conchs, shouting as
they ran, and brandishing their weapons with the
exulting
consciousness of certain victory. They beheld their
foe reduced to a point, a mere speck on the bosom of the
valley, which their numbers could soon environ, and as
they fondly imagined overrun. Some of them made their
forward movement towards the enemy in a sort of festive
dance, in which they kept admirable time, though compelled
to descend the while an unequal and sometimes rapidly
precipitous
plane. Their confidence, their numbers, their
long black hair, oily skins, and finely-formed persons,
together
with their shouts and howlings, were not without
an effect upon the invaders; but repeated conflicts with
the savages, and a confidence in their leader which was
not unwisely bestowed, kept them from panic, and the
Indians
were not without their own share of surprise when
they beheld the Spaniards awaiting their advance without
a single change in their position.
With the first signs of the morning, Vasco Nunez had
prepared for the attack which he had some reason to
anticipate
.
When he beheld the hills half encircling his
entrenchments
covered with his foes, he drew forth his
men with the view to use his dogs and horses. A portion
of his cannona species of falconet, or grasshopper, then
much employed in the wars of the new worldhe had
also drawn out of his fortress and concealed with select
bodies of men, under chosen leaders, each having his
especial
instructions. The dogs were leashed and kept in
cages at convenient points, but also covered from sight
and harm until the proper moment of their use. His
entire
force, consisting of two hundred and fifty men, were
drawn up in three columns, with just space enough
between
the array of each to permit of the play of the
artillery
.
His little squadron of horse, but twelve in number,
equally divided, lay with their backs close to the
entrenchments
of the settlement on the two flanks of his little army.
Thus prepared, he saw the approach of the enemy
without
apprehension. He was himself mounted on an animal
equally remarkable for his strength and fleetness. His
favourite hound, Leonchico,his only body-guard,with
the composure of a veteran, and a knowledge of his place,
which veterans do not always know, kept close beside his
stirrup, ready at the bidding of his master, and not
before
,
to take part in the approaching conflict. Such had
been his experience in the wars with the Indians, and
such his docility, in consequence of the admirable training
VOL. II. 2
to which he had been subjected, that the leash and cage
which alone secured others from evil, were esteemed
unnecessary
for him. The arms of the Spaniards were of a
motley description, and consisted of arquebusses,
crossbows
,
swords and targets:some few carried lances, or
javelins, of palm wood, with which they had provided them
selves from the hands of their Indian enemies. Thus
prepared
,
Vasco Nunez received the shock of the assailant at
the head of his little army. With a long wild shout, a
concerted signal, which found its echo from every hill
around them, the Caribbeans rushed on to the conflict. A
thousand arrows at one instant darkened the air, and
rattled
among the little host of the Spaniards. Then, following
up their missiles, without waiting to witness their effects,
the savage tribes darted down upon their foes, with the
avidity of the hawk stooping upon the sparrow. Wielding
their clubs aloft with practised skill and muscular arms,
they struck at the heads and knees, making one
movement
of the arm suffice for a single stroke at the two
extremes
of the person.
The Spaniards meanwhile, were not idle. Their
crossbows
returned the fire of the Indians, the archer firing at
groups only;but when the keen eye of Vasco Nunez saw
that the great body of savages had descended from the
heights and were huddling together in confused bands,
each striving to be foremost in its attack upon the small
and condensed array which he led, he saw that the
hour for serious strife was at hand. He commanded his
ranks to open. This movement displayed the artillery,
which another movement disposed in such order as to
rake the entire valley. Yet still the signal was withheld.
The Spanish leader lingered until the solid masses
should reach that line along the plain which his artillery
commanded. It was not long ere the impatient valour of
the Caribbees brought them to the point, and then the
cannon belched forth its unexpected and appalling
thunders
.
The solid mass recoiled but did not fly. Its own
density was against its safety, and prevented escape.
Nor did flight, after the first moment of alarm, seem the
desire of this fearless people. Checked by their own
numbers from flight at the first essay, they did not think
of renewing it. Encouraged by their chiefs, they
answered
the artillery with a second flight of arrows, and,
as before, followed up their missiles by a general rush.
As Vasco Nunez had anticipated, directing their fury
upon a point so narrow as that presented by his front,
their immense numbers were unavailing, and worse than
useless. The savages struggled with each other to reach
the foe, and in this condition could oppose only man to
man in the narrow valley into which they had
unwittingly
descended. It was now, as they began to exhibit
a consciousness of their difficulties, and swayed to and
fro beneath the raking fire of the artillery, that Vasco
Nunez gave the signal for his little troop of cavalry to
move from the wings towards the centre, and increase,
with a new form of danger and terror, the confusion
under
which the assailants struggled. A sudden and full
burst of martial music was the first ear-piercing
intimation
which the Caribbeans received of an onset, of the
terror of which they could have formed no adequate idea.
Then came the thundering tread of the horse, followed
by his plunging form, his fire-breathing nostril, and the
keen edge of that sword which it was the boast of the
Spanish cavalier, could, with a single stroke of a good
arm, sever the naked savage in twain. The roar of the
cannon was succeeded by the ringing of the clattering
sabre digging deep into the defenceless skulls of the
scattered
and flying crowd. Vainly the stubborn savages
threw up, with arms practised at defence, the massive war
club for their protection. The keen blade severed it like
a thread, and the same blow most usually struck down
the warrior to whom it yielded no protection. It was a
work of carnage simply and not of fight. Vasco Nunez
looked on with feelings of commiseration new to the
Spanish warrior. Still, the fearless savages continued the
struggle, however vain their opposition. Zemaco himself
cheered them with shouts and stimulated them by the
bitterest
reproaches. Himself wounded, he yet strove where
the fight was thickest, being resolute to die rather than
retreat. He had seen how rapidly the work of death went
on where the horsemen ploughed their way among the
flying, the fighting and the dead; and with a desperate
valour, he turned his arms in the quarter where he
seemed most likely to encounter them. Already he had
advanced among the conflicting fugitives, though with
great difficulty, to a point which was threatened by the
cavalry. They were near at hand, and but one dense
mass of his people stood between him and certain death.
But this band was moved by no common sentiment of
valour. They beheld the station which had been taken
by their sovereign, and saw his danger. Though stricken
down by their enemies, they clung to the necks and to the
legs of the horses, and baffled, by their crowding bodies;
the advance of the assailant. Shortening their arrows
and spears, they stabbed the animals with their sharp
flint heads, though without often inflicting mortal wounds;
and these injuries, falling short of the designed effect, had
rather the effect of goading forward the beast, whom the
martial music, and the efforts of his rider, had already
wrought up to a pitch of fury not congenial to the nature
of so timid an animal. The fury of fear, the most
intoxicating
of any form of madness, caused the steed, when
wounded, to overcome all obstacles; and the opposing
warriors were flung from their hold, and beaten down
beneath their flying hoofs. The devoted band who had
thrown themselves between their monarch and the death
which threatened him, were mangled and crushed. The
power of resistance was gone, and the seemingly
concerted
scream, with which they warned the cassique to fly,
was the last effort of their expiring loyalty. But the brave
chieftain was not suffered to meet the foe and sink
beneath
the fate which threatened him. The chosen
warriors
of Zobaydasuch as remainedand who claimed
always the personal command of the cassique threw
themselves
between him and the horsemen. While one party
devoted themselves to a like fate with the band which had
perished, another seized with strong hands upon the
person
of the struggling Zemaco, and bore him upward along
the heights. The flight of the chieftain was a sufficient
sign to his people that the battle was at an end; and the
fearless savages who would have continued the struggle,
however hopeless, so long as their sovereign remained
upon the field, now availed themselves of the tacit
privilege
thus given them to fly from the conflict with no less
haste than they had employed in beginning it.
Shall these rascals escape thus? demanded the
sanguinary
Pizarro, riding up to Vasco Nunezhis eye
glaring with the tiger's rage, while his hands were glued
to his sabre hilt by the blood which had dripped down
from its crimson edge. Shall we not set the dogs upon
their heels?
Ay, let it be done Francisco, was the reply, though,
in truth, it is a cruel business. Let it be done.
At a word, the cage doors were thrown open, and the
leash holders ran with the dogs to the nearest spot where
a blood puddle laythen cutting the cords which fastened
them, they hallowed them after the fugitives, and the rank
smell of blood, freshly left by the flying enemy, soon
guided them up the hills in rapid pursuit. The horsemen
followed at full speed, and ere the warriors who bore the
still struggling Zemaco had reached the eminence for
which they toiled, the furious Pizarro, followed by
Rodrigo
,
Colmenares, and Bartolome Hurtado, was close upon
their footsteps. The danger was imminent, and the
fearless
savage commanded that his people should desist from
flight, which they now considered hopeless, and make a
last, and no less hopeless, effort at resistance. They set
the wounded chieftain on his feet, and once more he grasped
his war-club in readiness, and prepared his javelin. His
face was grave, but not gloomy; and he rebuked his
followers
for the downcast and dispirited expression of their
looks.
The Carib had a song of rejoicing in his death, and
what says the priest who tends at the altar of the god, in
the golden temple of Zobayda? Shall there be sorrow at
the birth of the child, and sorrow too when he dies?
Begin
thy song of rejoicing and of triumph, Bahechioand
tell of the deeds of Zemaco. It will be good to say when
thou hast done, that he lifted his spear to the face of the
enemy, when death put an end to the battle.
But the answer of his followers was unanimous.
The song of death shall be our song, but not the song
of Zemaco. Zemaco shall live for his people. We will
stand before the Spaniards while Zemaco goes over the
hill.
The deep bay of the hound, breaking suddenly as it
were from the ground beneath them, seemed to baffle
this precious plan of flight. With a faint smile upon his
lips, the cassique replied
Hark! the barking dog of the Spaniard says `no.' We
must fightwe must die.
The dogs came rushing up the hill at this moment and
2*
the troopers fast following them. Leonchico led the way,
but ere he approached the little group which environed
the monarch, one of his followers sped a shaft which
entered
his side. But the wound failed to arrest the onward
motion of the fierce and powerful dog, and the savage
who had thus spent his last arrow in vain, with a noble
daring, and with a loyalty not often surpassed, flung
himself
forward in the very face of the animal. Leonchico
paused for an instant, thrust his nose to the earth, his eye
all the while keenly fixed on that of the Indian. His ears
were flattened, the skin upon his neck rose into a ridge of
elaborated muscle, while the tawny red hair which
covered
it, assumed a comblike appearance, like a crest, that
gradually continued to rise until it almost overhung his
brow. His hind feet were gathered up close behind the
fore, and in this attitude, he advanced two small paces
before he sprung. An instant motion in the airso
instantaneous
that the victim did not behold the moment of his
riseand he was upon the shoulders of the savagehis
thick jaws clasped together upon his throat with a
spasmodic
energy which defied his struggles and made them
short. The victim fell and writhed along the earth, but
the limbs of the dog seemed to follow all his contortions,
while his jaws relaxed their hold for no single instant
after they had once been fixed upon him. A silent
horror
seized upon the limbs of the cassique as he looked on
this dreadful spectacle. Arrow after arrow had been
discharged
at the inhuman assailant, but though all
penetrated
the skin, and some of them inflicted severe wounds,
he seemed to give them no more regard than if they had
been utterly unfelt. His victim appeared lifeless beneath
him, and the jaws of the dog relaxed; but only to close
again with double tenacity as he perceived another motion
of his body, probably the last fleeting indication of life.
In another moment he leapt from the carcass, and snuffed
the air as if for new employment. Meanwhile a portion
of the troops had gained the level on the verge of which
stood the savage chieftain. But here their steps were
arrested. A new enemy seemed to rise from the earth
beneath them; and an ally sprang to the succour of
Zemaco
,
at the moment when hope seemed to be gone for
ever. This was the fugitive Caonabo. His men were
scattered along the table ledge of the hill, and each had
his instructions. The policy of this seeming dispersion
of his followers was instantly obvious; since the Spaniards,
few in number, were required to face a hundred foes, all
assailing in the same instant at every point of the
compass
.
The commands of Caonabo, closely followed by
the men he led, now docile as they saw the evident
superiority
of his discipline, and more fresh for the conflict,
left the horsemen unharmed, but delivered their shafts
with united purpose and good aim, solely at the dogs and
horses. The first deed of Caonabo himself was to send
an arrow into the nostril of the famous Leonchico,
just at the moment when freeing his teeth from the
hold taken upon the savage he had slain, he was
preparing
to advance upon the group of which Zemaco was the
centre. Unable to rid himself from the shaft, which had
penetrated a part without the free use of which his efforts
were unavailing, the fierce animal retired from the field
with the quiet instinct of the soldier, who employs his
strength in seeking a cover in the bushes, when he can
no longer engage in the conflict. A second shaft from
the hands of Caonabo went quivering through the
bosom
of the horse bestrode by the unglutted Pizarro. The
Spaniard fell heavily to the ground half buried beneath
the wounded and struggling steed. The arrows of the
scattered Indians rained upon his armour, and all the
efforts of his companions were drawn to his extrication.
The fight thickened around his body, and this event
effected
a successful diversion of the pursuit. When Vasco
Nunez advanced to the assistance of his lieutenant, the
cassique had disappeared, and no foe remained in sight but
the fearless Caonabo, sustained by some fifty of the
savages
.
These, as the re-enforcement came to the relief
of Pizarro, began to retire slowly from the field; but the
blood of Vasco Nunez was inflamed by this unlooked-for
resistance and interruption to his conquest. He was not
willing to suffer the escape of a warrior who had shown
himself so capable. Giving the command to charge, he
himself led the way against the retiring fugitive, and
vainly did the latter seek to check his advance by a
timely and skilful use of his shaft. Vasco Nunez wore a
complete suit of mail, which defied the adroitness of the
savage. His steed was also protected by a clothing of
mail and padded cotton which protected him in all vital
parts. He had not escaped without wounds, however, and
his vigour was diminished in consequence of fatigue and
loss of blood. But the rising anger of his rider drove him
forward in the pursuit, and the proud Caonabo beholding
with what tenacious hostility the pursuing Spaniard kept
only upon his track without seeming to heed the assaults
made upon him by his followers, conceived the idea of
giving him the battle which he desired. This was a
resolution
,
presumptuous in the last degree, if considered
by the ordinary standard of judgment in reference to the
issue between the savage and the Spaniards. But
Caonabo
was no common man; and a reasonable conviction
of his own powers, skill, and experience of the sort of foe
with whom he had to deal, would scarce justify a charge
of conceit or presumption against him. Giving
instructions
to a few of his warriors who happened to be most
near him in his flight, to annoy the steed of his foe from
behind while he encountered the rider in front, he boldly
turned upon the pursuer, and awaited his approach at a
little spot where some strewn and broken rocks promised
to baffle the free movements of the horse.
Behind these he entrenched himself, with the hope that
in any effort of the rider to leap his battlements, the steed
might come to the earth, in which event he calculated
that his foe must necessarily become the victim of his
rashness. Knowing well the impatient insolence of the
Spaniards in all their encounters with the Indians, in
order
to provoke his enemy to that degree of rashness
which would make him attempt the rocks in front, he
boldly assailed him with words of insult as he approached,
delivered in imperfect Spanish. Surprised at such a
salutation
and in his own language, but still more enraged at
its audacity, Vasco Nunez, pricking his reluctant steed
with his dagger, drove him forward as Caonabo had
expected
.
But the anticipations of the savage were not
realized
in another and more important respect. The steed
of Vasco Nunez was one of a thousand, and carried him
over the rocks without stumble or impediment.
Dog of a savage, from whence come you? Who are
you? Speak, slave, ere I hew thee to pieces.
Such was the answer of the cavalier to the address of
the Indian. The answer of the latter as he slowly retired
backward among the rocks, was fearless and full of
defiance
.
Dog thyself! I am a manI hate thee, Spaniard,I
spit upon thee, and will slay thee.
Ha! say'st thouif thou art brave as insolent, it will
be some pleasure to cleave thee asunder at a stroke. St.
John of the Wilderness! let not this villain escape my
hands.
The repeated goadings of the steel drove the beast
forward
with such speed, that Caonabo was only able to
evade the onset of the cavalier by submitting his war-club
to the severing stroke which was intended for his own
head. Thrown upward in defence, the macana was cut in
twain at the blow; and flinging from him the worthless
fragment which filled his hands, Caonabo nimbly leaped
aside from the path of the Spaniard, and throwing himself
upon the ground at the edge of a steep declivity, he rolled
headlong down the descent through a gorge which had
been made by the continual passage of the mountain
torrents
.
Before Vasco Nunez could extricate himself from
among the rocks, the fugitive chief had disappeared from
sight, probably not without severe hurt, but through
passages
where no horseman might pursue. His enemy,
satisfied
that farther pursuit was idle, yet vexed with the
escape of one whose insolent language was no less strange
than offensive, gave over the search, and returned slowly
to his entrenchments, to count over the slain, attend the
wounded, and gather the spoils of the field, which
promised
because
of the gold plates and pearls with which
the savages with barbarous pomp had bedecked their
persons,to be no less profitable than it had been bloody.
CHAPTER II.
CARETA.
The
Indians disappeared from the surrounding heights
with the events of that bloody day, and the path of
discovery
,
for a brief distance, lay open to Vasco Nunez. But
as yet the brave cavalier could undertake no conquest or
enterprise of moment, from the limited character of his
resources, and the small number of soldiers which he
commanded. Some of these were slain, and more
wounded
in the battle, and many more were sick in consequence
of great fatigue, inadequate food, and diseases peculiar to
the climate. The provisions which they had obtained
from Hispaniola had long since given out, and their only
food was found in such scanty supplies, as they gleaned
from the savages by the terrors of their arms. Impatient
to proceed on his path of conquest and renown,-Vasco
Nunez was yet too wise and thoughtful to push an
enterprise
which called for adequate preparation. A premature
attempt he well knew would only result in disappointment,
and would, most probably, impair his own reputation to
so great a degree, as to lose him the confidence and
command
of his followers. Thus straightened, he reconciled
himself, as well as he might, to the necessities of his
situation
.
He strengthened his colony by additional
entrenchments
,
built houses for his people, and laid out
gardens for the cultivation of grain and vegetables. A
portion of his men, the feeble and unenterprising, were
employed in these necessary labours; while the rest were
despatched on various missions, either of conquest or
discovery
,
along the neighbouring coast and throughout the
country. He himself seldom left the colony, reserving
himself for those larger perils only, which, as they
involved
the greater objects, necessarily implied the greatest
dangers. Between the mountains before him and the seas
behind him, the glance of his eyes and the expectations of
his heart were equally divided. The one rose between
him and those meditated conquests, which he might not
hope to obtain without that succour which he knew could
only reach him by the other; and anxiously, indeed, did
he pray for the success of his messenger in Spain, who
was to defend his conduct before his sovereign, and
provide
him with those supplies which he fondly hoped were
to acknowledge his past, and facilitate his prosecution of
new, achievements. His men saw nothing in the
countenance
and conduct of their leader, but the firm
enthusiastic
courage and confidence of a spirit born for success,
and pursuing the only paths by which he might command
it; but pacing the melancholy shore, looking wistfully
over its chafing waters, a gloom, like that which broods
over their solemn waste, gathered new strength in his
bosom with every added moment of his watch. There,
or along the mountain paths, over which he sometimes
clambered to muse in secret upon his more than mountain
projects, dark clouds gathered upon his brow, the certain
token of those doubts which for ever haunt the path of
human ambition, and gather above the summits of its
loftiest
hopes. It was in vain that the astrologer renewed
his glowing promises, and dwelt upon the favouring
aspects
of his star. It was in vain that he reminded him
of what had been already achieved, seemingly in his own
despite, and certainly against his own hope, to give him
the elevation he desired. He who has lofty purposes and
hopes, has fears and doubts of corresponding depression,
and it is no disparagement of genius to say, that a certain
humilitythe result of a due conviction of its own human
incapacitymust sometimes make it tremble for the
success
of those designs, which a godlike imagination
conceives
,
in aid of the more slow and creeping experience.
Meanwhile, the Cassique Zemaco was not idle, though
dispirited by his late defeat. The result of the action
with the Spaniards had tended in no small degree to
elevate
the judgment of Caonabo in his mind. He felt the
force now of all those arguments which his vanity had
before rejected; and the policy, while avoiding all
general
engagements, of harrassing his enemy by hanging on
his path, placing ambuscades for his march, laying waste
the country, and cutting off his detachments, he
determined
to adopt after the counsel of the fugitive. Spies
were placed upon all the movements of the Spaniards
emissaries sent to all the minor chiefs of the country; and
their canoes, formed to ply the rivers and along the bays
and indentations of the coast, stole along by night, even
among the brigantines of the invaders, and ascertained
their condition and reported their objects. This
espionage
,
which the great numbers of his followers enabled
Zemaco to make singularly effective, had the most
important
and paralyzing effect upon the fortunes of the
Spaniards
.
Few of the enterprises which they undertook,
though under such captains as Pizarro, Colmenares, and
Valdivia, were entirely successful, and some of them were
defeated with loss and discredit. Such results as these
aroused Vasco Nunez to the necessity of undertaking the
minor adventures himself; and some information which
he obtained from two of the men whom Nicuesa had left
at Nombre de Dios, determined him upon a journey of
greater peril and extent than any that had been made
before. These men, to escape some punishment, had
fled from Nicuesa upon his first arrival in the country,
had wandered off into the forests, and finally fallen
into the hands of the Cassique of Coyba. Though
prisoners
,
they had been treated kindly, and had remained
with him in a sort of honourable captivity long enough to
see into the condition of the land. Of its wealth in gold
they gave a glowing account to Vasco Nunez, and spoke
of immense and secret stores of provisions to which they
could guide him without difficulty, pledging their lives for
the success of any enterprise against his dominions.
This offer, and the intelligence which they conveyed to
him, determined Vasco Nunez upon his course.
Choosing
a hundred and thirty men, from the most resolute of
his command, he at once set off for the province of Coyba.
But the wary and wily enemy who had so long watched
his movements, hung around them still, and though
he suffered his march to remain unmolested, he noted
every step in his progress, and the Cassique of Coyba was
duly informed of the approaching foe. He was enabled
to conceal his treasures of gold and grain, and to prepare
with all his force for battle. But the impetuous
Spaniards
entered the town where he had entrenched himself,
by storm and in the night. A desperate fight ensued in
the darkness. The Cassique fought bravely against a foe
of whose savage cruelties he had heard an account no
less appalling than had been told him, with more truth, of
his overwhelming powers; and with the high-souled
desperation of a prince, willing to sacrifice himself for his
people, he sought out the leader of the Spaniards, by the
blazing light of his habitation, which his own hands had
set on fire. But all the accounts which had been brought
him of the superior prowess of the invaders fell short of
the truth as he realized it in the encounter which he
sought himself. A single moment sufficed Vasco Nunez
to destroy the hope of the cassique. His spear, severed
at the first stroke of the Spanish sword, left his head
unguarded
for the second, while his prostrate form lay
beneath
the feet of the cavalier. Angry with the strife, and
roused to all that minor sort of madness, without the
blinding influence of which man would probably seldom
strike his fellow-man, Vasco Nunez prepared to repeat
the blow which must have severed the head from the
shoulders of his opponent; when, as they beheld the
danger
of their chief, the Indians, to a man, threw down their
weapons, and sunk with an appalling shriek of terror to
the ground. At the same moment, while the yet uplifted
sword of the cavalier hung threatening above the head of
the prostrate warrior, a girl, scarcely more than fifteen,
darted between the combatants, and throwing herself
upon the body of the cassique, clung to his neck with the
fondest devotion, seeking with her own slender and
sylphlike form to cover and shield it from the impending
weapon. Vasco Nunez was charmed by this unexpected
apparition. Never had so bright and ethereal a creature
descended before his eyes. Matchless in grace, as she
lay before him, one arm around the cassique, one lifted
imploringly to the conqueror, while her tearful eyes
pleaded with the more eloquence that her lips were silent,
he thought her one of those heavenly visions which
sometimes
hallow and delight even the dreams of the
unrelenting
soldier, and move him to momentary feelings of
gentleness and love. Her face was girlish, almost
childish
,
as, indeed, belonged to her years; but there was the
VOL. II. 3
expanded soul of the woman in her eye, and in her
conduct
the affections which belong to all ages, and lift any
into nobleness and beauty. Fairer than her people, her
cheek bloomed with an olive lustre such as the Spaniards
loved to applaud in the beauties of their own nation. Her
forehead was high and narrowher mouth small; and
while it quivered with the nameless terrors which were
struggling in her heart, the tips of the white teeth gleamed
at intervals through the parted lips, from which the
natural
red had taken flight, though to return again, the
moment
after, with accumulated richness. Voluminous and
of a glossy black like that of the wing of the raven, her
hair covered not only her own shoulders but the bosom
of her fatherfor such was the cassique whom she strove
to shield from the rage of his conqueror. But the rage
of the conqueror was already subdued. He looked on her
pleading and tearful eyes, and his heart melted within him.
He commanded his followers to stay the sword; and lifting
the damsel herself from the form of him whom she had
so opportunely rescued from the fatal stroke, he bade the
cassique, in tones of mercy and forbearance, arise from
the earth,
What have I done to thee, said the cassique, as he
stood in the presence of his conquerorFor what crime
is it that thou hast served me in this cruel wise. I have
fed thy people when they were hungry, I have helped
them when they were weary and athirst. I have ever
treated the stranger with loving-kindness. Hadst thou
sought me for food, I had given itmy people should
have brought thee grainmy women should have
strengthened thee with a pleasant beverage. I would
rather meet the stranger with fruits than with a javelin;
but thou hast yielded me no choice. Thy coming was
in wrath and thunder. Thou hast stricken my people,
and brought ruin to our dwellings. Wherefore hast thou
come in war, when thou shouldst have come in
friendship
.
Vasco Nunez, if a common rude soldier, might have
found some difficulty in replying to so pathetic and
well-grounded
a rebuke. But it is recorded as another
remarkable
accomplishment in the cavalier, that he had a
wonderful skill in winning the affections of the savages.
He was touched with the appeal of the cassique, and
replied to him, by expressing his good-will to the Indians.
He ascribed his assault entirely to the necessities of the
Spaniardstheir absolute want of food which could not
well be procured for present consumption in any other
manner. With arguments like these, and by a grace of
manner, which, in a being confessedly so superior, was
beyond any argument beside, Vasco Nunez soon
conciliated
the favour and removed the anger of his savage
host.
There should not be strife between us, replied the
cassiqueand it were madness in me to hope to
contend
with a warrior who wears such a weapon as this,
touching the sword as he spokeand can cleave a man
in twain at a single stroke. I would have thee as a
friendthee and thy people.
I do not seek to harm thee, replied Vasco Nunez, it
gives me no pleasure to destroy and slay, nor, indeed,
should I have descended upon thee in anger as I have
done, but that I know thou hast taken counsel from the
Cassique of Darien, to withstand me with thy warriors.
What pledge wilt thou give me that thou wilt give no
farther heed to the words of Zemaco?
My warriors shall follow thee, replied the cassique,
thou hast demanded of me the knowledge of the land
my people shall show thee their riches. I will provide
thee with food, and that thou mayst the better believe the
sincerity of my heart, lo! here is my daughtermy best
beloved Careta; thou shalt take her to thy bosom as thy
wife. She is good, and thou seest that she is both young
and beautiful. She shall be a bond betwixt thee and me,
a pledge of the fidelity of her father and her people.
The eye of Vasco Nunez turned anxiously and sadly
upon the downcast features of the shrinking damsel, who
clung to her father's arm as if dreading her instant
removal
.
For a moment the lips of the cavalier were
closed, compressed, as if to quell and silence certain
unbidden
feelings in his soul. Then, calmly approaching,
he laid his hand gently upon the arm of the maiden, while
he asked
Wilt thou go with the strange warrior, Caretawilt
thou leave thy father and live with me?
She shrunk back, and trembled with an undefinable
struggle. But though she shrunk, she looked up, as the
gentle words of the cavalier encouraged her, and her
dewy eyes encountered the keen, earnest glance of his.
In an instant they were cast down, while her face was
suffused with blushes.
Enough! thou shalt go with me, Caretathou shalt
be the wife of Vasco Nunez.
A piercing shriek escaped her at these words, and
throwing herself upon her knees, she grasped those of the
cassique, and wildly addressed herself to him.
Wilt thou say it, my father,wilt thou send thy
child, thy Careta, from thee, to the far home of the pale
warrior? Ah, my fatherno!
The pale warrior will be the friend of thy father,
when Careta sleeps upon his bosom. He will help thy
father to strike his enemieshe will protect him with his
mighty men from Ponca and Comagre. Will Careta
make the pale warriors angry with her people?
The girl rose meekly, and crossing over to where
Vasco Nunez stood, put her hand in his with all the
confiding
trust of the innocent and hopeful child.
Careta will go with the pale warrior. She will bring
him drink when he is weary, and watch over him when
he sleeps. Let the pale warrior be good to her people.
With emotions, strange and insuppressible, Vasco
Nunez
took the girl in his arms and folded her to his mail
clad bosom. The hand of the astrologer was laid upon
his shoulder.
Nay, Micer Codro, I know what thou wouldst say,
but it availeth nothing. I tell thee, my friend, that the
pure heart of this heathen maiden is at this moment
dearer in the eyes of Vasco Nunez than all the gifts of
glory ever promised by the stars.
Ah, Vasco, my son, couldst thou see with eyes like
mine; already art thou far advanced on the path of thy
greatness, and the danger that awaits thee is still the
danger from a woman.
It cannot be, Micer Codro, that this heathen damsel
should be the woman of whom thou speakest. Is there
not oneone that thou knowest?are there not other
women? The stars themselves could not make of this
pure-hearted and trusting damsel an enemy of Vasco
Nunez.
And he again clasped the maiden to his bosom at these
words, with a tenderness which surprised the savages,
who had beheld in him only the stern warrior before.
Shall I have no life but that of glory, Micer Codro?
continued the cavalier, I tell thee, my father, even that
life is not perfect if love hallow not its achievements.
Love! replied the other, didst thou not love Teresa
Davila?
The cavalier turned as if a viper had suddenly stung
his heel; he pushed the wondering girl from his arms,
then as suddenly reclasped them around her, while he
replied sternly to the aged man in accents of quick
reproach
.
Speak not of her, Micer Codro! why shouldst thou
seek to torture me with these cruel memories? Enough!
when I knew Teresa, I ceased to love her. Shall the lip
that has tasted a fruit which is bitter be denied to think
that another may be sweet?
Alas! my son! Even the sweet may have its sorrow
with the bitter. But I would not vex thee. Enough, that
whether the damsel be thy enemy or not, thou hast none
other than a friend in Micer Codro.
I know it, father, cried Vasco Nunez promptly
giving him his hand, and thou shouldst know that I
feel it even when in my impatience of rebuke I should
seem to forget. But no more of thisthere are other
matters.
Then turning to the cassique he said
Coyba, our interests are one. Thy daughter shall
be a tie between us, which shall bind us in strength and
amity together. Bid thy warriors refresh themselves with
sleep, for with the dawn of light to-morrow, it is my
purpose
to advance upon Ponca thy enemy. Micer Codro,
it will not be many days ere we get tidings of that
southern sea.
3*
CHAPTER III.
TIDINGS OF THE SOUTHERN SEAAN ENEMY IN DISGUISE.
With
the morning, Vasco Nunez set forth with his
warriors, and attended by the Cassique of Coyba with a
large body of the natives, he advanced upon the
neighbouring
territories of Ponca, the enemy of his ally. But
Ponca had been well apprised of the approach of his
powerful
foe, and had received the instructions of Zemaco to
fly from before him. He took refuge in the passes of the
mountains, where he busied himself in collecting his men,
and uniting himself with other minor chiefs prepared to
make a stand in situations where it would be impossible
for the Spanish horse to operate. But having left behind
him his chief treasures in his flight, Vasco Nunez did not
care to pursue him. Another and more powerful cassique
named Comagre, next attracted the attention of the
invader
.
The Cassique of Coyba was not unwilling to
display
to his neighbours the great superiority of his ally,
and persuaded Vasco Nunez accordingly to advance upon
his territories also. The approach of the Spaniards was
soon made known to Comagre, who disarmed their
hostility
by a timely conciliation. He sent forth a deputation
of his chief men who conducted them to his palace,a
huge building of wood, described by the historians of that
time as being no less than one hundred and fifty yards in
length, and eighty in breadth, surrounded by a wall of
stone, and, after the manner of that people, admirably
furnished within. There they were welcomed with an
hospitality which considered nothing but their wants and
wishes. Their treatment was, indeed, worthy of a higher
condition of civilization and refinement than was supposed
to belong to the Indians. Meats and dainties were spread
before them, with various beverages of different flavour
and various degrees of strength, which the Spaniards
pronounced
to be nothing inferior to wine. Dancing girls
displayed their agility and charms while they feasted,
and a plentiful supply of provisions for the colony was
placed at their disposal. Nor did the courtesy and
liberality
of Comagre rest here. His eldest son, at a signal
given by his father, disappeared from the hall of
reception
,
but soon returned followed by a train of seventy
slaves. Each of these slaves bore a vessel of gold, and
while the Spaniards looked on, wondering at the
profusion
of wealth so suddenly spread before them, the slaves
at another signal of Comagre, advanced each, and laid his
burden at the feet of Vasco Nunez.
These are for the chief warrior of the king of Spain,
said ComagreLet him be a friend to Comagre
henceforward
.
The slaves are for the Spaniard and the gold.
Then, after gratefully thanking the cassique for his gift,
Vasco Nunez bade the treasurer advance and separate
one-fifth of the gold to be set apart for the sovereign.
The rest he gave to his soldiers to be divided among
themselves. This donation, however, was productive of
strife. The soldiers soon quarrelled about the division,
most of them dissatisfied with the share allotted, and
complaining that the best pieces had been partially
bestowed
by the treasurer. Vasco Nunez was compelled
to interfere in the language of authority, but his
commands
,
though productive of instant obedience, would
scarcely have served to soothe and satisfy the discontented,
but for the sudden and strange action of the son of
Comagre
.
This youth, when he beheld the strife among the
soldiers, with a blow of his fist, struck the scale, full of the
precious metal, from the hands of the treasurer,
exclaiming
as he did so:
Now wherefore should the Christians quarrel for this
yellow stuff? If it is for this that they leave their own
land which they tell us is beyond such a weary waste of
water, let them follow me, and I will guide them to a
country where it growswhere the meanest vessels of
the people are made of it, and the water from the
mountains
carries it in masses to the sea.
What sea? what sea? exclaimed Vasco Nunez, with
impatience, proposing an inquiry which his followers
conceived
to be strangely at variance with the true question
which he should have made.
The Indian pointed to the south.
Ha! said I not! exclaimed Vasco Nunez, grasping
the arm of the astrologer, with an action that seemed
strange to his followers no less than to the Indians.
Years agone, when I came with Bastides to the shores
of Darien, a withered Indian assured me of that sea; and
vainly did I seek to persuade Rodrigo to enter upon the
adventure. Years agone!and in that time how many
have heard my thoughts and counsels. Yet none have
foundnoen have sought to find. The conquest is
reserved
for me!
The young savage smiled when he saw the exultation
which gleamed from the eyes of the cavalieran
exultation
which well informed him of the growing purpose in
his mind.
Why dost thou smile? demanded Vasco Nunez.
Dost thou think to conquer the country of which I
tell thee? was the reply of the youth.
By the smiles of the Blessed Virgin, under the favour
of the Holy St. John of the wilderness, that will I, if life
and strength be not withheld me.
The cassique of that country would laugh at thy
warriors
.
Thou wilt need a thousand such as thou hast.
He is the ally of Zemaco, and hath a power greater than
Zemaco. His people are like the leaves on the tree, and
they are trained to battle from their boyhood. They
wield the macana, which is hardened by fire, which our
people have not strength to lift, and their young men use
bows and slings, and they have strength enough to send
their arrows through a man so that no part of it shall
remain in. With their slings they can hurl a rock which
shall cleave the head of the bravest warrior.
Thou art yet to know the Spaniard, replied Vasco
Nunez. Look! and as he spake these words, he gave
orders for the discharge of one of his pieces, the effect of
which he well knew would be more convincing than any
boast which he could make of the powers of his men.
When the terror and wonder of the Indians had subsided,
Vasco Nunez, by a series of questions, drew from
Comagre
all that he desired to know of the people and the
mountains lying between him and the object of his desire.
His heart was burning and leaping within him to
overpass
these narrow boundaries, and overcome the
obstructions
that gathered in his path of greatness. But when
he looked round upon his little band, half of them already
rendered incapable of fatigue or fight by reason of the toils
and exposure they had already undergone, he was
compelled
with a sigh to defer the period of his full and final
triumph. But in order the sooner to effect it, he found it
necessary to return instantly to his little government of
Darien. A rash manone filled with his own
unregulated
enthusiasm,would have marched onward,
regarding
nothing but his own desires; but with a daring that
fell nothing short of the most adventurous, Vasco Nunez
possessed an overruling sense, and a judgment of calm,
deliberative, and comprehensive character, which was
studious
always to adapt his means to his ends, and to avoid
the injudicious exposure of his little armament, however
great might be the inducement, and however insignificant
the danger. But the danger in the present instance, he
well knew could not be insignificant. He had to
overcome
a range of high, untravelled mountains, cutting his
way all the while through the hitherto unbroken forests,
and fighting, as he went, with successive bands of
savages
,
the subjects of cassiques, most of whom were either
in alliance with, or subject to the control of his implacable
enemy,Zemaco. Under the most favouring aspects he
was well assured that the little army with him was
utterly
inadequate, and the force at Darien was not
sufficient
to change materially the aspect of his difficulties.
The world of beauty and delightful promise lay before
his eyes; but a gulf was at his feet; and though passable
by a single plank, the power was beyond him to procure
that plank. His hope lay in supplies beyond the water,
either from old Spain or Espanola, to both of which places
his emissaries had already been despatched. Anxious,
therefore, to hear from these regions, he hastened his
return
to the colony. His arrival at Darien was simultaneous
with that of his messenger Valdivia from Hispaniola, who
brought him some small supplies of provisions and
ammunition
,
and a more important addition, a few soldiers.
Among these soldiers was one, seemingly a mere boy,
who had not yet numbered more than twenty years of
human
life. He was so small, and seemingly effeminate of
person, that when Vasco Nunez came to examine the
soldiers
brought by Valdivia, he wondered much that he
should have accepted so inadequate a person. But
Valdivia
excused himself by saying that he did reject the
application of the youth, but that he persisted so
strenuously
in his desire to come, and expressed so great an
admiration for his commander, that he found all his
reluctance
overcome, and he at length consentedthe youth
being resolute, he said, if Valdivia did not take him, to
find other means for effecting his purpose. When Vasco
Nunez heard this account of the young man, he called
him out from the rest, and questioned him after the
following
manner.
Your name is Pedro de Ulloa?
Of Valencia, seor, was the prompt reply of the
youth.
You are yet very young to be a soldierand I think
not strong. Are you used to the weapon?
To none other than the dagger, seor.
It is not the weapon for the Indian, and an arm so
slender as yours may scarcely carry one more
effective
.
Your whole frame is feeble. I doubt whether you
have chosen the right profession, Pedro.
My heart is resolute in its purpose, seor; if my arm
be weak, and though I may not carry weighty weapon,
or do much harm to an enemy in arms, I am one to serve
a captain. I am swift of footI can write a clear hand
I can bear despatches, and keep counsel.
These are all excellent qualities, Pedro, returned the
cavalier, but in these heathen lands, it is needful always
that the scribe and the messenger, nay, the priest of God
himself, be ready to lift spear, and use it freely, against
sudden necessity. Wert thou my messenger over these
hills of Darien, and the warriors of Zemaco should
environ
thee, thy arm would do little for thy extrication.
It would do all that it could, senor; but with keen
eye, and quick foot, and quicker thought, it would not be
so easy for the savages to environ me. If they did, senor,
their tortures should only make me swallow my secret,
not yield it up.
Thou hast the proper spirit; were the strength in thy
armsbut, be it as thou wiltI will keep thee near my
person,thou couldst do but little service along with
those iron men. They would destroy thee soon, if they
could provoke thee to follow where they led. Thy face
does not seem strange to mine eyes, Pedro,have I not
looked on thee before?
Never, senorI am but a month from Spain. I had
a brother senora brother that thou might'st have seen
in Santo Domingo, in times past, and to whom it was
said I bore some likeness. It may be thou hast looked on
him.
The eyes of the youth were fixed on the ground as he
uttered this reply, and a suspicious eye might have
remarked
a slight emotion in his frame, as if a tremor
shook it. But Vasco Nunez beheld nothing, while he
replied
:
And where is he, Pedro?if he hath a spirit such as
thine, I were glad to have him in my command. Is he yet
in Hispaniola?Valdivia will soon return, and shall seek
him.
He lives not, senor, was the quick reply, while a
bitter
smile passed over the lips of the speaker, he lives
not; though, did he, he were scarce the man to serve
thee. He had not the right spirit, else, perchance, he had
been here in place of me, and had been to this day a living
man. If it please thee, senor, we will speak of him no
more. He sleeps in a bloody grave.
Was he slain in battle, Pedro? perchance
No! senor! almost fiercely interrupting his superior
that had been a fit finish for a noble life. He fell by
the hand of the midnight assassin; and, shame to me that
I say it, his murderer yet lives, and
He paused, his lips quivered and became almost livid,
while his eyes looked a venomous anger, even upon those
of Vasco Nunez, and he clutched the dagger at his
girdle
with an almost spasmodic grasp.
There is no shame to thee, Pedro, in this. Thou art
but a boy; thou art too feeble for strife, and cannot hope
to be the avenger of blood.
Ha! think'st thou, senor? Thou art wrong. The
injured hath a strength beyond the vain-glorious
imaginings
of the tyrant, though his arm be feeble, and his
condition
mean. The day may be far, but it will yet come;
and I despair not of my hour. The God who suffers no
wrong to go unpunished, will help me to the redress of
mine. Thou wilt see, senorby the blessed shrine of
Compostella, thou wilt see.
Well, Heaven grant it for thy sake, Pedro, replied
the cavalierthe assassin who slew thy brother at
midnight
should fitly perish at thy hands. But thou look'st
at me as if I had wronged theethine eyes flash with rage
as they meet mine own, and why shouldst thy hand
grapple
with thy steel at a time when thy enemy stands not
before thee?
Forgive me, senor, replied the boyhis voice filling
as he spoke, and his eyes sinking to the earth, while his
manner, on the instant, became that of a courteous
humility
forgive
me, but, in the madness of my humour,
methought he did. I pray thee, senor, that thou wilt no
more move me to speak upon this matter. My heart
kindles with a flame like that of a furnace, and the blood
leaps into my brain, when I am minded that mine only
brotherthe stay and support of our aged mother in Spain
was cruelly murdered, and the murderer, not beyond
my reach, I trust, lives yet to glory in his crimes.
But thou canst tell me the name of his assassin. Is
he of Spain?
Spare me, senorI can only declare his name in the
hour that lays him at my feet.
Vasco Nunez surveyed the face of the speaker with a
look of inquiry, that truly indicated the feeling of doubt in
his mind.
It seems to me as though I must have known thee
before, Pedroyet it is now many years since I left
Spain, and thou wert then too young to have been much
regarded. But it matters littleI take thee into my
service
,
since thou art resolute, and will find thee
employment
this very day. Thou shalt assist me to prepare my
despatches for our sovereign, and for Don Diego Colon,
who is restored, I see, to the command of Espanolaan
act of justice which doth honour to the king and his royal
council. It will be an hour before I need thee,meanwhile
take thy pleasure where thou mayst, but beware thou
goest not beyond the barrier. The infidel is lurking about
us, night and day, and whoso ventures single-handed
beyond
our defences, must needs have a keen eye to watch
his coming, and a swift foot, such as thou boasteth, to
escape
his snares. Thou art now at libertyin one hour I
will look to see thee again.
With these words, Vasco Nunez left him to proceed to
other duties. The keen eye of the boy watched him
closely as he departed, and words, brief and vindictive,
fell from his muttering lips.
Ay, indeed, my arm is feeble, sayst thouwould it
were not! But though feeble, thanks to the avenger, there
are other modes to strike the foe, to crush the tyrant,
and redress the wrong, than by mere brute-power. The
wit that sharpened the dagger at the forge, hath a
thousand
modes of vengeance, and mighty though thou art,
with gigantic limbs, and a skill that man can seldom
match, there is yetthou shalt findan art beyond thine
own, which shall bring thee, with all thy might and
muscle
,
to the earth. Thou prayest heaven that I may win the
vengeance I intend. Fool! Little dost thou imagine that
thou thyself art the victim of thy prayer!
Having thus spoken, the boy, concealing his bitter
mood under a face of smiling and conciliation, passed
from the apartment where his conference had taken place
with Vasco Nunez, and, leaving the ordinary
thorough-fare
,
took his way towards the sea-shore, where, in
wandering and melancholy fancies, he consumed the brief
period of time which had been allotted him. He then
returned
to the dwelling in which he had been instructed to
await the commands of his superior.
VOL. II. 4
CHAPTER IV.
HOPES AND ACTION IN ABEYANCEHATE AND LOVE ALONE BUSY.
While
Pedro waited without, a slave brought him
word that Vasco Nunez desired his presence in an inner
room, to which he conducted him. This was an
apartment
which was sacred to the commander and his most
trusty friends. Here, he found Vasco Nunez, attended
by Valdivia, to whom he was giving his parting
instructions
for his return to Hispaniola. The two warriors
were employed at a table, which was covered with
papers
,
rude charts, and Spanish books chiefly on subjects
of war and adventure. At the feet of Vasco Nunez, lay
the favourite Leonchico, who raised his head at the
entrance
of the boy, and surveyed him with a keen
watchfulness
that betokened some jealousy, if not distrust;
while, sitting upon a sort of ottoman, rudely
constructed
from the severed shaft of a pine, and covered with
padded cotton, such as the natives were wont to use
commonly in the decoration of their furniture and houses,
sat the Indian damsel, Careta, busily intent in working,
after the fashion of her people, a tippet of dyed cotton,
over which she was distributing, with the natural and
felicitous taste of the woman, a handful of seedy pearl,
which, under the rapid movements of her fingers, soon
began to assume, upon the garment, all the several shapes
of leaf, bird, and flower. She gave but a single look to
the stranger, and her eyes thenceforward were divided
solely between her girlish labours, and the mighty chief
upon whom her father had bestowed her. She had found
it no difficult task to love one who so completely filled
her own and the imaginations of her peoplewho was
endued with such wondrous powers, alike, of conquest
and persuasion; and possessed a charm of winning
affections
with no less facility than of winning countries. His
full, clear, open countenance, beaming with conscious
nobility of soulhis high and towering forehead denoting
manly intellecthis mild, but expressive eye of blue,
and the small mouth, the sweetness of which was not
lost even when it wore the stern aspect of battlethese
realized that ideal of a god, which rendered it a thing no
less strange than grateful to her mind, when she reflected
that she was beloved by such a beingthat she held the
dearest secret of his soul, and even slept with an ear,
listening through the long night to every beating of his
heart.
But the boy was not suffered much time to survey the
scene. His services were instantly commanded by his
superior, who, bidding him to the table, proceeded to
instruct
him in the labours he was required to perform.
You are a scribe, Pedroyou have had the blessings
of the schools?
I was favoured by the wholesome instruction of the
royal school at Merida, seorthe Holy Father, Gomez
Gutierrez was my teacher in God and man, from my
tenth year to my sixteenth.
You should have grown as learned as the Holy
Father
himself, Pedro, in that long stretch of time. I trust
thou hast enough of thy school knowledge to prove a
worthy scribe for thy present duty. Thy writings shall
have no less worthy eyes to read them, than those of the
Bishop of Burgos; and it may be, by reason of their
contents
,
our royal master himself will be pleased to behold
them with his own. Do thy best therefore in
transcribing
on clear parchment, the rough advices which I have
here drawn out before thee. Let thy copy be true, for I
am jealous of the words which I here employ. As I use
none that may be rejected, it follows that each hath its
own force and meaning, and may not be so well
expressed
by any other. To thy task, therefore, with all
speed, and the better to encourage thy labour, thou wilt
learn from me, that the record which thou readest is a
true history of this province of Darien, and of the means
whereby I came into power, having no power in the
colony
at first. Thy knowledge of all these matters, will
the better prepare thy mind against what may chance in
future.
With these words, Vasco Nunez left the boy to his
task, and, turning to Valdivia, he resumed the tenor of
those instructions, touching his business in Hispaniola,
which rendered his instant departure necessary. These
were long and various, nor were they uttered with any
restraint or reservation. The boy heard equally with the
warrior. Vasco Nunez was a man proverbially frank
and fearless, and he recounted to Valdivia, not only the
facts which had transpired in Darien while under his
command, but even the hopes that grew out of his own
calculations, and the plans which he had formed, the
better to realize the resources which he knew to be in
the country.
I lack but a thousand men, Valdivia, and this sea of
the south shall be reached. Beyond it there are lands, I
well know, richer far than any yet known to the
Spaniards
;
lands where the sun, with a more fervid power,
turns whatever mineral he smites with his glance, into
the pure and precious metal.
A shadow darkened the entrance at this moment.
Ho! who is there? Francisco! enter, manstand
not there. We await you.
The individual who made his appearance at this
moment
,
was the afterwards world-renowned Francisco
Pizarro
a
man utterly illiterate, but daring and
adventurous
;
stout of limb and fearless, as became a soldier of
fortune, but quick in hostility and implacable in his
anger. When he entered and was seated, Vasco Nunez
continued his enthusiastic and but half imagined pictures
of the new world, yet in waiting for the tread of the
conqueror
;
and from his glowing narratives and vigorous
plans, the bold and savage soldier gathered that
knowledge
of the regions to which the eyes of the cavalier
were turned, which enabled the former, in after days, to
achieve the conquest of the empire of the Incas. Pizarro
hearkened with greedy ears to the rich visions which
Vasco Nunez described as truths, and which proved so to
his hearer if not to himself. He summed up the various
scraps of information afforded by individuals of different
Indian tribes, all tending to confirm his grand theory of
the southern sea, and the mighty continent which its
waters laved, and which yielded, from its sands and
mountains, an unfailing tribute of the virgin gold.
These waters and this world, it may be said, are
now at our feet awaiting us. A few days' march, and we
enter upon a new ocean and a new empire. I care not
to live beyond that hourthe hope of my heart is
answered
.
And you, Valdivia, will luxuriate in golden
vessels, quaffing your wine from cups which our king
may scarce equal, and must envy, while you, Francisco,
will prefer, perchance, the spearing of a thousand tawny
enemies, before you can sufficiently quiet your feverish
blood, to sit down to supper with your companions.
By the Holy Cross, it were a blessing to be prayed
for, seor, answered Pizarro with a reckless laugh; and
Valdivia cannot too soon return with the forces which
are to help us to this empire. My blood even now is in
the mood for active service among the heathen; but it
hath little encouragement from the numbers at this
moment
fit for service in our army.
Hast thou finished thy count, Francisco?
I have, seorof the arquebusses, there are
seventy-one
men; of the crossbows, one hundred and fifteen; of
the swords and targets, one hundred and twenty-three;
these, however, include not the men brought by Valdivia,
of whom I took no count, seeing that he himself was at
hand to speak more clearly to that matter.
Seventy-oneone hundred and fifteenone hundred
and twenty-three! and thine, Valdivia?
Sixty-seven, seortwenty-one arquebusses,
thirty-three
crossbows, and twenty-three swords and lancers.
But three hundred and seventy in all, mused Vasco
Nunez, and of these not two hundred in condition for
service. We can do nothing with these, Francisco
it were madness, madness! The savages in these
mountains
of Darien are no such timid creatures as the
Haytian
;
and were they but wise enough to fight in the close
wood or among the rugged passes of the hills only, we
should find the warfare not so unequal between us.
They will learn this secret from our successes, and then
we shall lose the power. Haste with thy writing, boy
we have need of baste. The wind favours thee now,
Valdivia, and all depends on thy skill and fleetness.
Diego Colon thou think'st friendly; he is a noble
gentleman
seek
4*
him firstthou shalt have a special letter for
himself. The gold for the king's treasury, thou wilt
deliver
only to Miguel de Passemontefifteen thousand
crownswhich must be kept apart from other sums
which are sent upon private account to certain creditors
in Hispaniola, who still cry, like the daughter of the
horse-leech
,
`give, give.' On his own account and mine, Micer
Codro will provide thee with a treasure for the payment
of a bond which is held against our mutual names by
Davila. Thou wilt be heedful, ere thou deliverest the
money to see him yield the parchment, and rend it with
thine own hand. There are good reasons why it should
be my prayer to have no claim against my person in the
hands of such as he. Hast thou finished thy writing,
Pedro, that thou givest freedom to thy pen?
The papers are finished, seor, replied the boy rising
and placing them before his superior. While Vasco
Nunez prepared to peruse one of the despatches, Pizarro
took another into his hands, and looked with a degree of
interest and curiosity over the document, which, though
perceptible to Vasco Nunez, he yet regarded without
seeming consciousness. Valdivia turned away from the
table, concealing the smile which irresistibly rose to his
lips; while the boy, ignorant of the illiterateness of the
soldier
,
and seeing only that he surveyed the instrument
reversed from top to bottom, in few, respectful words,
endeavoured to set him right. The sallow cheeks of
Pizarro
grew to crimson on the instant, while he replied in
tones the harshness of which he scarcely could subdue
Wellthinkest thou I know not, boy?
A single glance of the eye of Vasco Nunez taught
Pedro
his error, but the evil was already done, and from
that moment the boy knew Francisco Pizarro for his
mortal
enemy. A similar offence against the same individual
in after days, cost the Inca of Peru his life. When the
business of the morning was over, Valdivia despatched,
and of the council the boy alone remained with Vasco
Nunez, that cavalier spoke to him thus:
Pedro, thou hast unwittingly made a foe of Francisco
Pizarro. He is a man proud of the favouring opinion of
mankind, and ambitious of that greatness which he may
yet earn in these wild countries. But he hath the
misfortune
to be of lowly birth, and the blessings of that
learning of the schools which is thy becoming boast, hath
been denied to him. Hadst thou been wiser, and less
prompt, thou wouldst have suffered him to read thy
writing after his own fashion, satisfied that, beginning at
the end, he would soon have finished. As the matter
stands, be wary not to vex or offend himgive him no
power over thee by a perversity of speech, or chafing and
offensive look. I have marked that thine eye hath a
spirit and fire which speak thy feelings promptly, and
with something too much of defiance in them. It will be
well to throw none of these glances on Francisco. It
will seem as if thou rememberest his errorwhich thou
canst not too soon forgetand gavest him thy scorn in
consequence. He would sooner forgive thee a stab at
his throat than a flout upon his understanding, as indeed,
would most men, those in especial who have the
ambition
of greatness without its soul, and better love the
attributes
which follow achievement, than the difficult paths
and chastening circumstances which attend it. Enough:
be wary, PedroI caution thee, not to rebuke thy youth,
but that, through its rashness, thou mayst not come to
harm. The rest of the day is thine.
The thought insensibly rose into the mind of the boy
as he departed from the presence of Vasco Nunez:
Surely, this is one of the great men of Spain. He
hath a wisdom that governs souls not less than soldiers;
and, how strange to the time, the nobleness which strives
not to secure for himself the treasures to which he guides
the footsteps of all the rest. Yet, is he not the murderous
wretch by whom my brother fell, and am I not sworn to
avenge him? What is his greatness to me? wherefore,
should I care whether he have noble or base purposes?
If he be noble, the better, since the blood which I shed
will not dishonour the steel of the avenger.
Thou art happy, Careta? said Vasco Nunez to the
damsel when they were alone.
Doth not my lord know, replied the girl, with eyes
radiant with smiles and tears, as, throwing herself upon
the rush-covered floor of the apartment, she placed her
hands upon his knees, and looked up into his face. Her
words, a sort of broken Spanish, in which language he
himself strove to be her tutor, were sweeter to his ears
from the lisp which accompanied and added to their
imperfectness
.
He gazed upon her sweet and girlish
features
with a degree of tenderness that lost none of its
character, because it was mingled with something of
sorrow
if not of regret. He spoke, but his words, only in
part understood by the damsel, seemed the escaping
expression
of his own moved feelings, rather than as a
speech intended for her ears.
Thou should'st be happy, Careta, and I that have
brought thee away from thy people, from thy wild
foresthome
,
to share with me the cares of strife and the evil
fortunes which may befal my ambitious strivingsI
should make thee happy if I mayand if I may, by the
smiles of the Benignant Mother, I will. But, an hour, my
poor girl, may hurl me from the high place, the possession
of which alone enables me to make thee happy and
secure
.
The breeze that comes in fairly from the sea,
though I look for it with prayers, I await its fruits with
apprehensions. If it brings me the anger instead of the
smiles of my sovereignif it brings me manacles, rather
than honourswhat then will become of thee? At whose
mercy shall I leave thee, far from thy father's home, and
destitute among those who will scorn thee because of the
very tie which thou hast had with me? Better, indeed,
that I should slay thee with my own hand, than leave
thee to the stripes and blows, such as the brutal
Spaniard
too freely bestows upon the weak or the unwilling
victim of his prowess. he will punish thy weakness, as
if it were unwillingness, and thy unwillingness, as if it
were crimeuntil
The speaker paused, as if made conscious for the first
time, that the damsel listened to his words. That she
comprehended something of the feeling and the subject of
which he spoke, if not the language, was evident from
the increasing and tearful interest with which she
watched
every movement of his lips.
Is my lord sorry that he took the poor damsel of
Darien
to sleep in his bosom? she demanded with
trembling
tones and a broken dialect that seemed to go more
deeply into the heart of Vasco Nunez, as it reminded him
of her entire dependence upon him, than if it had been
uttered by the polished lips of the noble Spanish maiden,
and in the sweetly sonorous language of Castile.
Let not my lord be sorry. Let him send Careta back
to her people. Wherefore should he have trouble
because
of the poor Indian girl? She can go to the woods,
and hide herself in the mouth of the rock, and when my
lord asks at Coyba, `where is Careta?' they will tell him
she died in the mouth of the rock, because she would
not that my lord should be sorry. Careta will go back
to Coyba, that my lord should not be sorry.
Thous shall stay with me, Caretawhy shouldst thou
think that I am sorry to have thee in my arms. Alas!
my poor girl, my sorrow is that I may not be able to
keep thee in them.
And who shall take Careta from my lord? Is not my
lord strong? who can stand before a weapon like this,
that can cleave down the warrior of Darien at a single
blow? Is not my lord the lord at Darien? Doth not the
cassique Zemaco fly from before him? Hath he not
driven
the cruel Ponca to the mountains? Did not Comagre
do him honour?and when he speaks, do not his own
bearded warriors come and go, even as he bids them?
Ah, my lord, they cannot take Careta from thee, if thou
be not sorry to behold her.
Thou forgettest, Careta. Have I not told thee that I
too, though I seem greater to thee here than allI, too,
serve a cassique in Spain, to whom my own power is that
of the infant when he would strive against the grown
warrior? Should the cassique of Spain be angry with
me
No! no! my lord said that his cassique was wise
would Zemaco be angry with his best warrior, that slays
his enemies, and brings him their treasure? No! no!
my lord is beloved of the great cassiquemy lord that
loves Careta must not fear. Let him not look sorrowful
any more.
I will not, for thy sake, Careta,and, indeed, it would
be unbecoming for my own. The brave man should have
no fear when he is without the feeling of wrong. Let me
now teach Careta of my Godof the God of the
Christians
,he
who died upon the Cross, that thou shouldst
be saved in life for ever.
How!died for Careta, didst thou say, my lord?
Can it be? Where did he seehow did he know
Careta
?
He knows thee now, and has known thee from the
beginninghe sees thee ever, and even now his eyes are
looking upon thee.
Ah! dost thou say, my lord? cried the startled
damsel
,
springing to her feet, and looking around with the
timid expression of the fawn, suddenly aroused in the
covert
by the footstep of the hunter. Then, suddenly turning
to her companionI see him notI see him not. Ah!
my lord, can it be that thou art he?
God forbid! exclaimed the cavalier, with something
of a holy horror in his countenance, God forbid that
such impious thought should have birth within thy mind,
Careta. The God of whom I tell thee looks on thee, even
though thou mayst not look on him. He sees thee in the
darkness the same as in the daylight. Thou canst not
hide from himthou canst do nothing which he may not
seethou canst say nothing which he may not hear; and,
therefore, it is wisdom for thee to do nothing and say
nothing
which may give him displeasure. But sit thee,
Careta
,
while I teach thee of these things in order. First of
God the Father, then of God the Son, the Holy Ghost,
and the thrice-blessed Mother of God, who will, through
great love, intercede for thee, so that thy sins may be
forgiven
thee. Look on this picturethis is an image of
Mary, the Mother of God.
Oh, sweet! oh, sweet! She is looking on me, my
lord,she is going to speak to me. Speak to me, sweet
mother,speak to the poor girl of Darien, and teach her
the good thingsteach her all the good things that she
longs to hear!Ah, my lord, she says nothing.
And an expression of disappointment passed over the
face of the damsel, as she turned her eyes from the
portrait
to meet the watchful and fond glance of Vasco
Nunez.
She cannot speak from this. It is but an image,
Careta
,
and has no life. I give it thee only that it may
remind
thee of one whom thou wilt soon learn to know,
never to forget. But I will speak for her. I will teach
thee her story, and the story of her Son, and the Son of
God, who came down for thy safety and salvation,
Careta
,
not less than mine. Hearken to me then, while I
speak to thee of a people older far than thine own, and
of lands, the names of which thy ears never heard before.
The Blessed Mother of God help me to enlighten thy
understanding
as I proceed, and make thee quick to know
the words that I utter.
Sitting upon the rushes of the floor, with her hand resting
upon his knees, while her eyes were riveted, with equal
admiration
and curiosity, upon the face of the cavalier, the
maiden disposed herself in silence. The speaker,
meanwhile
,
as if duly elevated with the noble but unwonted
task which he had undertaken, wore an expression upon
his fine features which almost sublimed them; as if the
Deity had lent something of his divine countenance to the
spirit which impelled the performance of this new duty in
the warrior. It is not our purpose to go through that
process which the cavalier found it necessary to observe,
in simplifying, to the rude understanding of the Indian
damsel, the sacred history which he laboured to impress
upon her. This must be left to the imagination of the
reader, who will hardly fail to conceive the course, more
readily than it can be compassed in unnecessary
description
.
It will be enough to say, that the lesson which is
taught by love, is one seldom found difficult of
acquisition
;
and the history of immortal love, descending for the
universal happiness, is one, of itself, too satisfactory and
grateful, not to lessen the few difficulties which remain in
the way of such a teacher. Ah! how much more
auspicious
to the reign of Christ on earth, and how much more
blessing and beneficial to man, if, instead of cold constraint,
austere dogmatism, and selfish intolerance, love alone
could always be found or chosen to represent the religion
of love. How many thousands more would gather before
the altars, from which they are now driven by
vain-glorious
pride, and join in that glorious procession that
proclaims
where it goes, Peace on earth, and good-will to
all men.
CHAPTER V.
HOW RESOLUTION DEFIES DANGER, AND GENIUS FINDS ARMOUR
AGAINST NECESSITY.
Weeks
went by after this manner, and Vasco Nunez
remained in Darien. Not that he remained either idle or
inactive. The pleasant employments of his domestic life,
such as we have faintly sketched them in our last
chapter
,
were not suffered to interfere with his duties to the
colony, nor to produce that luxurious desire of ease which
has overthrown so many of the world's most boasted
conquerors
.
With the ambition of Alexander, and the
tenacious
closeness of purpose, such as marked the career of
the wondrous Carthaginian, he was yet too emphatically
a man of thought and high moral purpose, to be enfeebled
by the oriental delights of an Ecbatana, or to succumb to
the more gross enticements of Capuan sensuality. His
dress, habits and indulgences, were alike simple and
manly. He drank no wine, pursued no sports, and with
a sort of Roman self-denial, such as marked that people
in the earlier periods of the republic, he countenanced no
exercises but such as tended remotely or directly to the
activity and improvement of mind of body. Mere
amusements
he refused, on his own part, though he denied them
not to his people. He well knew that the inferior mind,
having no such resources of thought and imagination as
belong to the better taught and more endowed, always
prefers those indulgences which do not task the
understanding
in their prosecution, nor require a reason for
their sanction and justification. Such minds, like those
of children, desire little more than the unrestraint which
follows the absence of the governor and the lash; and
though our hero refrained from the relaxing enjoyments
which his men had no such occasion to forego, he neither
denied them their indulgence, nor frowned upon them
while thus engaged. His employments were his sufficient
pleasures, as they always prove to the better-minded of
mankind. His cares for the colony absorbed all his time,
and what with building dwellings, repairing vessels, and
laying out lands for cultivation, not an hour was suffered
to be lost which could be made available towards the
grand object which he had in contemplation. His
soldiers
,
though sufficiently indulged as we have shown,
were yet kept well drilled, exercised in the use of their
weapons, and employed in occasional adventure. His
favourite captains, Pizarro and Colmenares, were sent out
on expeditions,at once seeking conquest and supplies.
The rivers adjacent, the islands, and the shores of the sea,
so far as it would have been justified of prudence for him
to explore them, were traced out with an earnestness,
truth, and fidelity, which have not been surpassed, nor
even equalled, in latter days. Indeed, it is no less true
than discreditable to us who admit the truth, that the
Spanish maps of America are, to this day, in many
instances
the very best that we have. Nor were these the
only toils and objects which gave our hero employment
in the intervals of his leading actions. Were it our
object
to relate the history of his colony, rather than his
own, we could recount a series of struggles with the
Indians
of an hundred petty principalities, attended with
various fortune, in most of which, following the
commands
of their superior, the course of the Spaniards was
marked by success and good fortune. Domestic troubles
were at hand also for his annoyance,even insurrection
in all of which, displaying the wisdom of a master mind,
and the energies of a master spirit, the star of Vasco
Nunez
still continued to rise, soaring and spreading as it
grew, until its bright glances glistened with unqualified
lustre over the secret waters of the Pacific ocean. But
we anticipate.
There were trials yet to be overcomedoubts yet to
be dismissed, and dangers passed, before that happy
consummation
could be reached. It was while Vasco Nunez
turned his eager but divided glance, at the same moment,
to the seas which led to Europe, and to those frowning
mountains that stood up between him and the mighty
VOL. II. 5
prize for which he was contendingas if resolute to bar
his progressthat the ungenerous fortune, which ever
seems resolute to baffle those who rely rather upon their
own resources of strength and genius, and scorn to pay
blind allegiance to a deity, herself blindwith a malice no
less mean than unreasonableoperated against him in the
court of his sovereign, to the confirmation of all those
fears which for so long a time had vexed his thoughts by
day, and haunted his sleep by night with distressing
visions
.
By the arrival of a vessel from Hispaniola, he
received private advices from his messenger Zamudio,
whom he had sent to Spain along with his enemy, the
Bachelor Enciso, that the latter by a series of ingenious
misrepresentations, had succeeded in arousing the
indignation
of the king against him, and had obtained from the
royal court a sentence in his own favour, involving the
original cost of his expedition, and all the damages which
he estimated to have accrued from the defeat of his plans,
and the usurpation of his government. Not satisfied with
so much gained to himself, the vindictive Enciso had
advanced
against him a long list of criminal charges, such
as having tampered with the fidelity of the soldiers,
against the unfortunate cavalier Nicuesa,the harsh
treatment of the latter which ensued at their hands, and
his subsequent melancholy death. To defend himself
against these latter accusations, Zamudio informed Vasco
Nunez, that he would soon be summoned to repair to
Spain to answer in proper person to his sovereign.
This stunning intelligence, which was, however,
unofficial
,
and consequently unknown to any in the colony but
himself and such confidential persons as he thought
worthy
to be entrusted with the secret, for a time overcame
his spirit and cast him down in strength and heart,
leaving
him incapable of thought and action. Bitterly in the
recesses of his chamber, with no eye but that of the
Indian
damsel upon him, did he curse his confiding simplicity
that felt shame at the bare idea of having any fear of such
a creature as Enciso.
He was in my powermy hand could have sealed
his lips for ever, and defied all investigation, had
investigation
been a matter of which I had felt afraid. But do I
fear investigation now? No! Would it could be had
would it were that the royal Ferdinand himself could have
beheld, with his most jealous eyes, the course which I have
takenthe deeds which I have done, and every thought
and feeling of my mind in all this business. It is not too
late. He shall hear me now. He shall know
He paused, and a withering smile passed over his
noble but inflamed features.
What a child am I become! I dream of justice and
truth among men, and among courtiers in particular, as if
the first days of the earth were restored, and man, that
walked with God and with the angels, was still scarcely
less than an angel himself. What justice can I hope now
from Spanish judgment, or in Spain? If I had not done
so much in Darienif the worst were not already
overcome
it
might be that I should have itthat I should be
suffered to pursue my career of conquest, until the future
became sufficiently easy for some sleek favourite of
power
to thrust me from the seat, and consign me to a
dungeon
.
Jesu! can it be that I am reserved for such a fate
as this! and thou
With a stealthy tread and closed lips, the Indian
damsel
had stolen to his sidewhere he now stood looking
through the window upon the chafing waters of the bay
and sinking with the same unobtrusive stealthiness of
movement upon her knees, took one of his extended
hands in her own and carried it to her lips.
And thou!ah! my poor Careta, what then would
become of thee?
My lord has heard evil from his own country. Has
death gone into the habitation of my lord's mother? Oh,
my lord, tell the poor Careta, that she may have sorrow
too.
Thou wilt soon enough have it, my poor girl, was
the mournful reply,when the manacles are on the
wrists of thy protector, and they bear him from thee,
perchance
,
for ever.
With some difficulty the untutored Indian was made to
understand the danger to her protector, which his words
expressed. When she did comprehend it, she started to
her feetas she replied in language still more imperfect
from the impetuosity with which she spoke
But who shall take my lord from Careta? Careta
will go with my lord. She will not fear the big waters
when she is in the great canoeshe will not fear any
thing when she goes with my lord. If they are strong to
take my lord away from Darien, they will be strong to
take the poor Indian girl, that loves him very muchshe
will turn her back upon Coybashe will go every where
with my lord.
Unbidden tears which he strove vainly to restrain and
hide, gathered in the chieftain's eyes at a proof of
affection
such as his fortune had not made familiar to his
heart. The memory of Teresa Davilaa memory which
he vainly endeavoured to repelarose to his mind at this
reflection. How different had been the regard of that
maiden, so long, so tenderly enforcedand we may add,
so ably served in moments of greatest dangerby one
whom she could invite and beguile, only to triumph over
and reject. Still, though Vasco Nunez felt all this, there
was mingled with his indignation a degree of regard and
love, which he could not overcome; and he sighed, with
a strange contradiction of thought, with the vain wish that
the same accents of devotion which had been uttered by
the poor Indian damsel, could have fallen from the lips of
the proud Spanish beauty. How much dearer still, he
fancied, would they have been to his ears, spoken by
Teresa
.
Still, though thus labouring under the workings of
a divided heart, Vasco Nunez was not the person to do
injustice to the true, through a still lingering attachment
for the false, woman. The very doubt which he felt that
in thinking thus of Teresa, he was wronging the fidelity
of Careta, led him to a still deeper sentiment of gratitude
to the latter; and lifting her from the floor at his feet, he
pressed his lips upon her forehead; then, placing her by
his side, while he seated himself upon a rude bench in the
apartment, he began more clearly to convey to her
understanding
the general tenor of those tidings which had
just reached his ears, and had so painfully wrought
upon his feelings. But while the damsel listened in
profound
silence to the narrative, which she could only slowly
comprehend, the humility of her devotion was such that
she could not maintain the position in which he had
placed her. Sinking down with a movement so effortless
that her companion, in his excited mood, failed utterly to
perceive it, she was again in a few moments at his feet, and
looking up with eyes in which consciousness was fast
gathering in the shape of tears and a cloudy apprehension.
She heard the narrative of his past career in Darien, his
rise over the colony, and the overthrow and probable
punishments
which awaited him. When, at length, the
fearful
truth burst upon her, and she learned from him that
the danger even threatened his life, her agitation assumed
a strength and character which her timid and shrinking
deportment hitherto had not seemed to warrant. With
the presence of the necessity, alone, the energies of the
noble soul spring up to contend with it.
But my lord has warriors. He is strong. Will he
put the chains on his own hand, and go to the King of
Spain, and say `I am come.' Will he not do battle for
his life?
In broken language, such as we have striven to amend,
it was thus that the Indian damsel expostulated with her
protector against what she inferred to be his resolution.
Ah, Careta, replied the chieftain, to what would you
counsel me? Would you have me defy my sovereign, and
become a traitor to my country? What, if your father,
the cassique of Coyba, summoned one of his warriors to
come to him at Coyba, and answer for his conduct:
would he not slay him if he refused to come?
The damsel was not readily confounded, but, after the
pause of an instant, replied thus, in her own imperfect
manner:
The cassique of Coyba should not do wrong to his
warrior. If my father designed injustice to his tall men,
it would be foolish in them to come to him when he
summoned
them. Wherefore should my lord go to his king,
when he has strong men around him, with weapons that
carry lightning in their mouths, and make the big hills
shake with their thunder. Let him go to my father at
Coyba, and put his feet among the mountains, and bid
his warriors lie in readiness, and say to the king of Spain,
I am here and I will not come to you.
Alas! my poor Caretathou little knowest. For
every warrior of mine, the king of Spain has his
thousands
,
and even these warriors are not mine but his. Let
him say to them, bring me the head of your chief, and
they will do it.
Ah! but they shall carry the head of the poor Careta
too, when they do such things. But my lord speaks thus
only to frighten the poor girl of Darien. The king of
5*
Spain cannot do thishe has no such power. It cannot
be that there is a greater warrior than thou. Hast thou
not driven Zemaco from the hills, and Poncano! no!
my father says there is no warrior like to thee.
A noise at the entrance, and the approach of Micer
Codro, interrupted the farther dialogue between the two.
The astrologer was followed by the youth, Pedro, whom
Vasco Nunez had tacitly adopted as his secretary. As
yet, the unofficial intelligence brought to the cavalier in
his private letter from Zamudio, had been withheld from
the colony; and Micer Codro himself, up to this moment,
was unapprised of the threatening tidings which it
contained
.
It was not the intention, however, of Vasco
Nunez, to keep the matter from one so entirely his friend,
and at his entrance the communication was put into his
hand. When he read it, the paper fell from his grasp
his cheeks were suddenly blanched, and tearsbig,
unrestrainable
tearssuch as spring from the heart which
hope has deserted in the moment of its greatest seeming
triumphburst unbidden from his eyes, while a groan
which seemed to come from the very soul, but no word,
broke from his lips. Perhaps the manner in which the
astrologer received this intelligence, conveyed to the
Indian
girl more forcibly than the explanation of her lover,
the true extent of the evil predicament in which he stood.
She clasped her hands, and her cheeks grew to a kindred
paleness with those of the aged man, while, with a vague
absence of purpose, she advanced a few paces towards
him and remained in this posture, stationary in the
apartment
.
The youth Pedro, alone, to whom the meaning of
all this was a mystery, looked to one and another of the
several persons around him with an air of wonder which
he found it as impossible to conceal, as the rest of the
company the emotions which affected them; and the
face of Vasco Nunez, which, if sad, was firm,
conveyed
no explanation to his mind of the engrossing
trouble which distressed them. His humble position, no
less than the imposing solemnity of their aspects,
prevented
his making any inquiry into the mystery which
yet filled him with the keenest curiosity. He was not
destined, however, to remain long in ignorance. With a
smile of bitter sadness, Vasco Nunez advanced to the
astrologer.
Ay, Micer Codro, thou may'st well groan. Thou
shouldst groan as well over thy vain judgments as over
my fortunes. Where now are thy predictions, thy
promises
,
my hopes? What say the stars to thee now?
These, crumbling the despatches within his hands, and
hurling them behind him as he spokethese speak
another language than thy oracles; ay, Micer Codro,
and a far less questionable language. Which are we to
believe? whichhere his tones were subdued almost to
a whisperwhich will my soldiers believe, think you?
Summon thy wisdom to thy aid, and thy lucent spirits,
for, by the blessed Saint John, it will be marvellous
indeed, if thou wilt not need all their aid ere thou findest
an answer which shall save thy golden prophecies and
solemn judgments from the laughter and vexing scorn of
all who have heard and hearkened to them. Not that the
scorn will fall only upon thy headno! no! They will
have their laugh also at the ambitious and vain fool, who
hath had a faith in them that hath ruined him.
Indeed, my son, but these are sad tidings in truth;
and well mayst thou be shaken with sorrow and vexation
while thou readest them. Yet I know not that thou dost
rightly to fling such reproach upon my head; for whether
the stars be true or false, they had little to do with thy
seduction. Ere my lips opened to counsel thee, thou
wert a voyager with Rodrigo de Bastides, seeking
adventures
in strange worlds, and filled with fancies, deemed
no less strange by thy companions than have been the
predictions of Micer Codro. I did but confirm to thee,
by the promises of thy natal star, what the ambition of
thy own heart had promised thee long before.
Ay, aymine own heart and my own ambition.
Thou say'st well and rightly, Micer Codro, for, of a truth,
had not my own heart too ably counselled, and my own
ambition too fondly urged, be sure thy predictions had
never moved Vasco Nunez de Balboa, to lift foot or
finger on this daring progress. But think not, old man
and old friend, that I reproach thee for thy promises
think not even that I repent me of this daring, which has
brought me to the verge of a great empire; and which,
whether I win the sight of the great sea of the south or
not, has enabled me to point the pathway to its borders
to the monarch who denies that I shall behold it
The flowing and free speech of the cavalier was
interrupted
by the astrologer, who, pointing significantly to
the youth, Pedro, spoke in accents of warning:
Thou art not alone, my son. Is it wise to give forth
these tidings yet?
Vasco Nunez looked upon the countenance of the
youth for a brief instant, then exclaimed
Nay, let him remain; he hath the soul of a man, if he
be not one, and I fear not to trust him. I would that
I had a thousand followers such as he. I should not then
fear that the injustice of a king should prevent the glory,
or dishonour with his judgments the name of his
subject
.
Ere long, they will all know what we might
conceal
but for a brief season; and I am now in the desperate
mood of the gambler who cares not what eye beholds
that he hath flung his last counter on the board. Hast
thou any counsel, Micer Codro, in this difficulty? I would
have thee speakI would have thee exhaust thy wisdom
and pour forth thy full phophecy, that I may confound
thee for ever after, by showing thee that I can do without
the star, nay, in spite of it. When thou hast shown at full
thy counsel and thy hope, then will I deliver mine.
Meanwhile
,
I hear theeI wait thee.
With features, the constant working of which showed
the perpetually changing and active mood of the mind
within, Vasco Nunez paced to and fro through the
apartment
,
his eyes cast upon the ground, and his lips, though
quick with life and frequently in motion, yet giving forth
no sound or accent. There was a fascinating something
in the whole air of the superior, in the tones of his voice,
in his bitter smile, and hurried but firm gesture, that
fixed the eyes of the secretary Pedro, even more than
they did those of the wondering damsel, whose limbs
seemed frozen to the spot to which she had advanced
on witnessing the sudden and confounding effect of
the despatches upon the astrologer. The youth could
readily conceive, from what had been suffered to escape
from Vasco Nunez and Micer Codro, the dangers and
difficulties that hung about the fortunes of the former.
None could know better than himself, the evils to be
feared from a collision in that day between the subject
and his sovereign, particularly when the mind and valour
of the first had opened the pathway to treasures of which
the last desired to avail himself, without being liable to
any of the concessions which justice might esteem the
due of gratitude. He had already been apprised of the
relation in which Vasco Nunez stood to the Bachelor
Encisothe memorial which he had copied but a short
time before, had sufficiently apprised him on that head.
Besides, he well knew from facts notorious to the colony,
that the Bachelor was urging his specious charges against
his rival, in the royal presence. With the first conviction
that the man against whose life he had so solemnly
sworn, was about to be convicted as a rebel to his
sovereign
,
and was likely to suffer doom as such, his blood
rose in tumultuous exultation, and his heart triumphed.
But while he gazed and listenedwhile he looked upon
the proud unbending attitude, the noble grace of
movement
,
the keen, quick, sparkling eye, and the eloquent
gesturewhen, above all, he hearkened to those noble
sentiments and fearless thoughts which gushed forth in
free language from the threatened victimthe victim of
jealous hate and mean rivalry alonehis hostile thoughts
departed. He forgot his feelings of hate and exultation,
and admiration succeeded with a most natural transition,
to the more ungenerous feelings which had possessed
him. The fearless resolution which made Vasco Nunez
himself rise higher and stand more erect, and endowed
his words and voice with a nobler energy, when the
venerable
counsellor who stood in no such danger, was cast
down and trembled, had a charm in the mind of the
youth which fascinated his attention, and made him
breathless as he listened to a dialogue, which, as it
involved the future progress of the cavalier, necessarily
involved his fate. Slowly indeed came forth the accents
of the astrologer, in reply to the demand of Vasco Nunez,
and how wanting to the necessityhow vain and
unsatisfactory
did they appear! They offered no remedy
they led to none; nor, did it seem, that the speaker had
striven at any suggestion which should do more than
encourage the cavalier to hope. Hope, without action
or effort of his own, to the proud, fearless, energetic
mind, always resolute upon its own performances, is a
mere mockery; and bitter, almost contemptuous, was the
smile which overcast the face of Vasco Nunez, as the
astrologer spoke to him in some such language as the
following:
In truth, my son,I know not what to say, or how
to counsel you. These tidings are most unlooked for.
Surely Zamudio hath done but little, and how could
Enciso
make such strange matters appear to our sovereign,
as those of which these despatches tell us? It is truly
beyond
my thought and judgment. I know not how to
speak; though, in truth, I do not yet despondthere may
be something yet to come, which shall alter this
judgment
of the king, and I trust yet in the promise of the
stars which have befriended us so long. Thou shouldst
not be cast downthou must still hope, my son. Even
now
The impatient cavalier interrupted him.
Cast down!dost thou see it in my thoughtsin my
looksin my actions? Have I not told thee, Micer Codro,
that when thy predictions fail thee, and thy words lack
counsel, thou shalt hear then, that in myself, in my own
heart and resolution, I need them notnay, will triumph
in their despite? And this is all that thou canst tell me,
Micer CodroBe not cast downtake hearthope for
the sunshine, which will come to-morrow! Hast thou
nothing better than this to offer to thy friend in the hour of
his tribulation, when the stars fight against him in their
courses even as they fought against Sisera?
But they do not fight against thee, my soneven
now they work in thy behalf with a greater lustre, which
makes it the more wonderful to me those tidings which
have reached thee.
Oh, Micer Codro, wherefore wilt thou dream thus,
and speak still of these old-time vanities? It was thus
thou spokest to me even at the moment when the
hurricane
swept away to the bottomless ocean, the goodly
vessel
in which our joint fortunes had been treasured up.
Hear me nownow that thy counsel fails thee as thy
prophecies have failed menow that, in thy silence, thou
admittest that thy wisdom and thy stars, alike, avail thee
nothingknow that I have resolved in spite of them and
of these threatening tidings. By to-morrow's sun I set
off for Coyba, and for the mountains and the seas
beyond
!
Surely, thou dost jest, my son. It cannot be that with
such force as thou hast in Darien, thou wilt dream of this
perilous adventure. Thou hast scarce three hundred
men-at-arms
,
replied the astrologer, in astonishment.
I know it; but if I wait for more I shall have none.
It may be that a week will bring me the commands of our
sovereign which I dare not disobey; and take from me
all power in Darien. Shall I linger for these tidings?
No! I can but perish in my search after the life which is
eternal, and if I remain till these summons find me, I
shall not merely lose power, perchance, but life with it.
Not that I dread death. No! By the blessed Jesu that
died for all, I fear not the pang and the parting. But I
would not lose the exceeding fame and the undying glory
that is the first passion and desire of my mind. For that
I would shrink from death. For that I would fly from
these coming tidings, and await them, when they do
approach
,
on the shores of that new worldthat mighty
ocean, which, if I once win, will take the sting from death,
as it will leave to life no greater conquest or desire. But,
that conquest made,and even Ferdinand would scarce
dare destroy the conqueror. Nay, he could not but
confirm
me in the conquest. And with such hope as this
before
meand such a certainty of overthrow, if I seek it
notshall I linger here in apathy, awaiting the coming of
the summons and the executioner? No! what matters it,
though ten thousand savages beset the paththere is
more glory to the few who yet dare to pursue it and
reach the goal in safety. If the danger has a larger
division
among the few, the share of the treasure shall be
great also among them; and this argument to the Spanish
soldier, will give him tenfold strength, and a courage that
will confront danger with a hardy love, so that he will
seek her out even in the forest den where she is
ambushed
.
They will not go with thee, my son, on this wild
enterprise
,
said Micer Codro, absolutely confounded at the
audacity of the design. They will shrink back in terror,
as they may well do, and with no shame, remembering
their strife with Zemaco and Coyba.
What, when I tell them that I ask them not to
advance
,
but to follow! When I tell them that I myself will
lead them at every step! Ha! ha! thou knowest them
not, my father, and thou knowest not me. I tell thee,
these men shall serve me with more fidelity and success
than the stars, which I shall flout with defiance. If I may
not persuade the capricious and cajoling fortune,by the
Holy Mother. I will force her to my embraces. If thou
canst not wed us fairly, Micer Codro, as her
acknowledged
priest, I will compel thee to behold her frailty in
a new light, and thou shalt wink at the concessions,
which she will be no longer in condition to refuse.
The astrologer was confounded. There was a savage
delight in the eye of the speaker, indicating a drunkenness
of heart, and the phrensies of a mood made desperate by
long denial and the utter hopelessness of ordinary remedy.
While he spoke, his face lighted up with the exhilaration
of certain triumph; and that triumph sweetened too, to
the anticipative mind, by the consciousness that it was to
be wrested from the fates in their own despite, and
against all the ordinary barriers of circumstance. It is
in moments such as these, that genius makes itself
obvious
and feared. The common man would have sunk
under the prospect before him. The accustomed hopes
of such men were all withheld from Vasco Nunez. The
probabilities were all in array against himeven the
supports
of friendship, and the encouragements of sympathy
were unoffered or denied, in the general stupor which
they felt under the unfavourable aspect of his fortune;
and it is from the very incapability of all ordinary help
and counsel, that the strong man, forced back upon his
own soul, then asserts that native superiority and strength
that can never be entirely known even to himself, till
goaded into activity by the stirring and potential
necessity
.
The cavalier laughed cheerfully, and as with a
light heart, as he looked at the consternatian of the
astrologer
.
Be not afraid, Micer Codrodidst thou not say that
the stars were looking down upon me with favouring
eyes? What then? Shall they be clouded with these
tidings from Spain, which they must have known; and
shall they not brighten when they hear of my resolve, of
which they know nothing? Go forth, my friendlet the
soldiers know that the hour is come, according to thy
nightly observation, when it is decreed that Vasco Nunez
shall achieve his greatest triumph. I will take more care
than the stars seem to have done, that thy predictions be
not belied. Away, my friend, if you love me, and warm
their hearts with the glorious fancies which, for so long a
season, have made green and fruitful thine own.
Wondering still, and only half reconciled to a scheme
which seemed far too daring for success the astrologer
yet saw that farther expostulation would be altogether
vain; the mood of resolution being so unqualified and
decided
in the bosom of the cavalier. Perhaps, too, a little
reflection served to convince him, that this seeming
desperation
of his friend was, in fact, the coolest and most
manly policy. He knew how little there was to hope
from the ungenerous judgments of Spain, when once the
royal court of justice had taken consideration of the
conquerors
and their conquests. He went forth as he was
bidden accordingly, to confirm among the soldiers that
faith in the fortunes of their leader, which they had long
since yielded to his wisdom and valour. Meanwhile,
Vasco Nunez turned to the youth, Pedro, who still
remained
in his apartment.
Thou hast heard, Pedro, he began after a brief pause,
in which the ferment of his blood seemed somewhat to
subsideThou hast heard something of this business,
and may readily guess the rest. I have toiled here in
Darien against open and secret foes,I have saved this
colony from utter ruinI have won treasures that have
greatly helped to fill the treasury of Spain, having
reserved
none thereof, such portions alone excepted, as were
despatched to Espaola, to answer the demands of a few
griping creditors;and now that my world opens upon
menow that I have brought my sword to bear upon
new empires, the treasures of which are perchance
boundless
new
seas, over which the fleets of Spain shall glide
without rivalbehold, I am summoned to surrender them
all to some sleek favourite of the throne or the bishop,
who will enrich himself by my labours, and grow great
and insolent in the prosecution of my designs and
thoughts. Ferdinand will gladly hearken to the base
suggestions
of Enciso, as they will yield him a pretence for
seizing upon my achievements, which will yield him new
powers of patronage; and the better to countenance this
wrong, they will doom me, as a traitor, to the sharp and
sudden death, that being the shortest way to avoid the
reproach of innocence, or the vengeance which valour
should be for ever prompt to take. But they shall not
deprive
me of my triumph. They may take from me my
VOL. II. 6
treasure and my life; but, by the Blessed Saint crying in
the Wilderness, I will win that sea of the south. I will stand
within its waters, and launch my bark upon its bosom,
and my sword shall point your eyes to the green islands
of other empires, ere they do their will upon me. Thou
hast the soul, Pedro, for such a triumph as this I promise
thee? Thou wilt not shrink to follow me in this march of
danger and of glory?
Surprised into corresponding enthusiasm with the
speaker, the boy rapidly promised to attend his superior,
and the latter continued
Ay, boy, thou hast the soul and the spirit which shall
achieve and shall make achievement glorious; but
ambition
is an eating fever, and produces its own pains and
sorrows that come surely with all its tumults and
successes
.
It will make thee enemies who fear and hate
where they cannot rivalmen who, as they lack the
greatness to do greatly, will mock at the soaring of the
nobler wing, which their eyes follow always, but their
souls never. They will aim the shaft, which will strike
a mark to which wings of their own can never rise. They
will content themselves, though pulling down the lofty, to
remain for ever low. But why should I discourage thy
young mind with such doubts as these? Thou wilt run
the race like all others, and wilt not believe, until the
truth is proven in thy own experience, that such can be
the truth. It is the fate of all who aim highly, and will
perhaps console thee in the end, as it will soon be my only
consolation, that greater and wiser and better men have
had no other fortune. And this may be enough. The
smooth way never leads to the eminence;the good
seaman
learns not his craft when the seas are level, and the
winds soft and favouring. So, to my mind, the glory were
not of my getting and but little to my gain, if good fortune
bore me ever forward with a friendly gale, and a bright
star, such as the venerable man who left us but now,
speaks of, hung over the path, to guide me where the
spoils of glory are. Let my own eyes seek out the path,
and I will care not that my feet should stumble, so that
my spirit rose with every fall, even as my body rises after it.
The toils which thou wilt begin to-morrow, Pedro, will be
a service to thee when I am sleeping. Away, boy, and
get thyself in readiness.
CHAPTER VI.
WINGS AMONG THE MOUNTAINSTHE STRIFE OF EAGLES.
The
next day opened in the town of Darien,which,
by the way, had been called Santa Maria by the devout
Spaniardswith the clangour of trumpet and drum. Vasco
Nunez proceeded to review his troops; and with an
increased
audacity which added still more to the
astonishment
of the astrologer, contented himself with little more
than one half of his real force in the prosecution of his
meditated enterprise.
Were you new men, he said to his followersmen
of cloth and buckram, just from Seville, I should need a
thousand of you to pass from Coyba to the great southern
sea. But being what you are, I will lead two hundred
of you with greater pleasure, and more profit to all of us.
Nor let those complain whom I leave behind. They shall
share the spoils which we win, equally with those who
undertake the peril; since, well I know with Zemaco
watching them ever from the surrounding hills, they will
have duties of as much toil and danger in Santa Maria,
as we shall encounter in our march beyond the
mountains
.
Know ye then that I need two hundred volunteers.
Let the men who came with me to Darien from San
Sebastian
advance firstthen, of those who followed the
Seor Diego de Nicuesa, and came with Colmenares,
and lastly, of those who came from Nombre de Dios.
The new soldiers brought by Valdivia will remain at
Santa Maria, unless it be that I find not before me ready
to embark on this new enterprise,one, as I warn ye now,
of the greatest peril,a sufficient number of the scarred
veterans who have followed me so long. I tell ye nothing,
men, of the great glory, and the vast wealth, the gold and
the pearls which ye may, perchance, gather in this
expedition
.
If ye know me not, it will be well that ye should
ask, wherefore should we take this toil and danger upon
us? If you know me, it will be enough that I tell ye that
I, Vasco Nunez de Balboa, will march at your head, will
guide ye in your true path, and lead the charge in every
conflict. Sound, trumpets, and let the true hearts of Santa
Maria show themselves with the golden burst of your
music.
Seating himself upon a rock, the cavalier calmly
awaited
the result of a speech that was no less artful than
simple, and seemingly unstudied. The proud Spaniards
who had been with him from the first, and claimed
precedence
over the new-comers in all times of danger and
all matters of new adventure, were greatly flattered by
the especial preference which had been given them;
while the others beheld nothing in the distinctions made
by the commander, but a proper division of force,
according
to the natural pre-eminence and seniority. The
shouts of all were mingled in the air, and rushing forward,
as if fearing to be suspected of lukewarmness, the
veterans
surrounded the stone where the chieftain sat, and
laid their long lances at his feet. When he had counted
their numbers, and accepted their services, they ran
about the encampment in a paroxysm of serious joy,
which vented itself in clamorous invocations to the patron
saint, concluding, as by common consent, with the praises
of their leader. With a more decorous movement, but
with no less real enthusiasm, the second and third classes
which Vasco Nunez had designated, approached him in
like number, and he soon found that to accept all who
offered would far exceed his limitation. It was not easy
to soothe those whom he was compelled to reject; but, as
we have already said, and the various chronicles confirm,
the persuasive powers of Vasco Nunez were scarcely less
remarkable than his genius and valour. The discontents
were made to conceive corresponding advantages
resulting
to themselves, no less than to the community, from
their stay at Santa Maria; and to disregard the
commiserating
looks and speeches of the more fortunate of their
number who had been chosen for the expedition. But
many an invalid veteran wept bitter tears at the bondage
in which fever, or the wounds of previous battle confined
him, and it tasked all the leader's powers of soothing to
reconcile him to a condition which was the more
irksome
as it was inevitable. The enthusiasm of all parties
filled the heart of Vasco Nunez with a grateful triumph.
What creature courtier of Fonseca, think you, good
Micer Codro, could win such followers to such free-will?
Only two hundred say you; and your heart still beats
with apprehension; but I tell you these two hundred
Spaniards under my conduct are more to me than one
thousand men had been to Ojeda; and, by the holy Saint
John, I will work with them greater things in this
wilderness
of Darien than in thy own imagining, even thou,
watcher as thou art of the visionary stars, could ever
have dreamed of. Lo! youtheir looks, their voices,
the madness of their souls, as they fling up their lances
in delight, and leap among the hills. Sawest thou the
grave sullen Spaniard ever in such mood before? If it
were now the time to meet with Zemacothey would go
like the rage of the red lightning through his naked
thousands
.
Such a temper would make their battle
irresistible
,
though it would be fatal on a weary march. I will
school this temper. It is not the wild horse which I need
along the rigorous mountains, but the patient mule, steady
and sure-footed; and thou shalt soon see these wild
warriors
become as such. Ho! Franciscoaddressing
Pizarro
I
assign thee twenty crossbows, and ten
fire-locks
with
twenty swords and lances. To Colmenares
a like forceye shall try the favour of these men so that
ye may each have the warriors that most affect you. Let
there be no loss of timethe brigantine is already
waiting
us.
Now could I spoil this triumph at a word, was the
unexpressed thought of the youth Pedro, as he gazed upon
the glowing face of Vasco Nunez, and beheld the
enthusiastic
devotion of the soldiers. It needs but to say to
these capricious knaves, or to this envious and ambitious
warrior in whom he so much confides, Francisco Pizarro
`know ye that this man is a traitor to his sovereign,
under doom as suchthat even now the ministers of
justice
and of vengeance are on their way to place him in
bonds for judgment;'and the smooth lips that now
honour
,
would be roughened with the sharp bitter shouts of
vulgar hostility. And shall I suffer him to triumph thus?
Shall it be that a murderer,one whom I am sworn to
slayshall go on from triumph to triumphshall win
6*
fame at every footstep, in my own sight, in my own
despite
,having
the blood of my brother yet reeking upon
his hands, when a breath of mine can bring him to the
dust? A single word to Pizarro, and Vasco Nunez is cut
downcast down, like the Philistian Dagon, his head
rolling from his shoulders. Pizarro hath the envy which
would make him glad to overthrow the superiorhe
hath the cunning which would move him to its
performance
with success. He shall know all. He shall be
counselled to keep him in custody but a few weeks, and
then deliver him in the same moment to the king's
minister
and to death. I will speak to him even nowthere is
no more fitting moment.
The youth, as if doubting his own resolution, hurried
towards the spot where Pizarro was choosing his
individual
command. As he approached, however, his mind
was busied with the train of thought which this subject
and his design had opened upon him; and though he
strove to continue in the same resolve, he found
scruples
gradually rising against it in his reflections, which
cooled his temper if they did not qualify his hostility;
and when, as he drew nigh to the man he sought, he
encountered from him a bitter scowl, the fruit of his
unwary
detection of the fierce soldier's want of letters, his
malicious purpose relented. His eye involuntarily put on
a glance of corresponding hostility with that of the savage
captain, and his brow assumed a scowling aspect, scarcely
less stern and fearful than that of Pizarro. He no longer
felt the resolution to destroy Vasco Nunez by such an
agent.
No! he muttered to himself as he turned away
slowly and proceeded to retrace his stepsthat the
lion should rend the lion, or the eagle strive with the
eagle unto the death of both, were not ungrateful in the
eyes of valour and true greatness, but that I should arm
the snake against either, were something full of shame.
Besides, have I not sworn that my deed alone shall be
my avenger, and shall I avail myself of so foul an ally as
this? Neither have I sworn against the fame but only
against the life of Vasco Nunez. Let him triumphlet
him win these southern waters which are his dream, and
these new empires which he fancies will reward his
dream  am I not with himcan I not slay him at any
moment when this triumph is obtained? It shall be so.
In that moment when his conquest is secure I will strike
for vengeance. I will then destroy him.
The person of whom he spoke, at this moment called
him to his side.
I bade thee prepare to go with me, Pedro, on this
expedition
.
I thought not on the feebleness of thy frame,
and thy lack of skill and practice in fields of peril. It
would be thy death to enter upon the weary march I
purpose, and however great may be thy thirst for glory
it were not fitting that I should suffer thee to risk thyself
so much against thy ability. Thou shalt remain behind
at Darien.
Nay, seor, but thou wilt do me great injustice if
such be in truth thy purpose; replied the youth
earnestly
,
and with an expression of sorrow in his face which
was truly felt in his heart, and which he could not hide.
For what have I come to Darien but for the very perils
of which you tell me. These are perils for which my
soul pants, and the life passed without their pursuit were
unworthy a care. It was thy promise, Seor Vasco, that
I should go with thee ever; it was thy further promise
that I should go with thee on this adventure. If thou
dost not seek to put my forehead in the dust, I pray thee
depart not from thy words, on the faith of which I came
into thy service.
Be not rash, Pedro, replied the other, of a truth, I
would choose to have thee with me ever, even as I have
promised thee; but to take thee with me on a perilous
adventure, such as that before me, were to mislead thy
youth, and do wrong to the very faith which thou hast
put in me; look you, boyhere he lowered his voice to
a whisper, and led the youth away, as he replied, from
the hearing of all othersknow you not that the
chances are thick against us in the perils which we go
forth to encounter? Hast thou not heard the wisdom
of the venerable man, Micer Codro, warmly awakened
against my project which he pronounces a temerity
savouring of madness? And wilt thou not believe me
when I say to thee, that, even with my own hopes of
final success, which I confess to thee are strong, I yet
greatly fear that one half of the hardy men who go with
me, will perish from over-toilsome marches, or the keen
and vengeful arrow of the lurking savage? Be wise, my
son; let thy thirst for glory keep pace with thy strength
and experience, both of which thou yet lackest too
greatly for so great a danger as surrounds this
enterprise
.
Vasco Nunez pleaded earnestly with the boy, but the
latter remained unmoved.
If, said he, I have hearkened to the words of
wisdom
from the lips of Micer Codro, I have yet also listened
to the more grateful answer of wisdom and valour which
fell from thy lips in reply. I have not forgotten the speech
of either, and my resolve is no less the growth of my
thoughts on this subject than a desire of my heart. I
know all the peril; but as there is no glory without peril,
it should be the care of him who seeks the one to be
always foremost in the encounter with the other. Seor,
I have thy promiseshall it be said against thy own
well-earned
glory, that thou hast failed to keep thy faith?
These words, and the tacit reproach with which the
youth concluded his reply, were conclusive with Vasco
Nunez.
Thou hast the true spirit for fame, Pedro; I would
that thy father had endowed thee with a manhood of body
such as God hath given to thy soul. Thou shalt go with
meit shall not be from thy lips that Vasco Nunez shall
hear rebuke for broken faith. Get thyself in readiness
thou shalt have the glory which thou covetest.
It was on the first of September, says the historian, that
this daring cavalier embarked with his followers in a
brigantine
and several large piraguas for the dominions of
the cassique of Coyba; his daughter, Careta, who had
acquired
no small influence over Vasco Nunez, accompanied
him in this expedition. Standing to the northwestward,
he reached Coyba without accident in a few days, and
was received with open arms by the cassique of the
province
.
Here he made his final preparations for the
painful
and dangerous journey he was about to take; he
offered up prayers to the Deity, and caused mass to be
performed, with a degree of solemnity which, while it
impressed
his own people no less than the savages, with a
feeling of religious enthusiasm, mingled with some little
awe at the perils rising before their path, attested the
soaring and serious resolution of their leader's mind,
making him appear, at the time, something more than
the mere commander; and giving him the attitude
and aspect of one of those stern leaders of the people,
under God, commissioned to achieve miraculous
conquests
,
and assured of the confirming smile of the
Deity in every effort and adventure. It was, perhaps, no
small help to Vasco Nunez, that such became the
persuasion
of his followers on this occasion. Nor was it simply
as a stroke of human policy, that our hero imparted this
reverential aspect to his proceedings. His own mind had
been in truth elevated by the lonely and constant
contemplation
,
amid all the changes of his fortune, of the one
single object. He had gradually discarded from his
desires
the accursed thirst for gold, which was converting
his own people rapidly into a more cruel set of savages
than any that they came to conquer. The baser aims of
humanity had all been purged out of his bosom, by the
high, unselfish desire of opening the sealed barriers that
led to another world; and the intentness with which he
contemplated the legitimate purpose of a noble mind, had
produced its natural effect, in bringing him nearer to the
nature, and, consequently, to the knowledge of God
himself
.
All his movements partook of this influence. All his
words and thoughts were now marked by this triumphant
and rising spirit; and while his mental pride was
forgotten
,
and a just humility that knows its own make and
measure, and trespasses never beyond the claims and
against the spirit of its fellow, was growing hourly
stronger
in his heart, it was evident to all that there was a holy
erectness in his deeds, his air, his manner, and his
language
,
which insensibly subdued the spirits of those who
beheld him. He showed none of the petty cares and
jealousies
that so often impair the grandeur of human
greatness
,
and embitter its sweetest successes; but, as if the
contemplation of a performance so far above the aims of
his contemporaries, had also uplifted him beyond their
ordinary
strifes and enmities, his mood ceased to exhibit
anger or passion, and a gentle and indulgent spirit
distinguished
his government, both of Spaniards and Indians,
which formed a feature entirely new in the moral history
of all the parties. It may be added that the boy, Pedro,
was not the last to acknowledge this influence over his
mind, which the high-souled superiority of Vasco Nunez
seemed to assert, with little qualification, over the minds
of all.
Six days after the departure of the cavalier from
Darien
,
he struck off for the mountains on his bold and
perilous
adventure. The Cassique of Coyba provided him
with guides and a number of Indian warriors, who were
used in carrying provisions, and in scouting along their
intricate and toilsome path. Of his own warriors, brought
with him from Santa Maria, he took but one half, the rest
being left at Coyba in charge of the brigantine. But
these were his tried men, chiefly armed with arquebusses,
and they were attended by a large number of
bloodhounds
a
foe no less formidable to the Indians than their
masters. On the eighth of September they reached the
dominions of Ponca, the ancient enemy of Careta. He
fled before their coming, as he had been commanded by
Zemaco. But his retreat was discovered, and he sent in
his submission to the invaders, and came, though with
fear and trembling, into the presence of Vasco Nunez.
His terrors gave place to a more subdued, though yet
stronger feeling of reverence for the heroic Spaniard;
and beholding in him a superior, as much distinguished
by benevolence as might, he was soon converted from a
distrustful foe into an obedient and devoted friend. Ponca
revealed to him all the secrets of his native mountains.
He pointed to the wealthiest valleys and watersinformed
him of their grateful fruits, and freely brought him of his
gold and treasures. But when he confirmed to him the
proximity of the great pechrythe wondrous sea of the
south, which lay beyond the mountains; and taking him
to a little eminence, pointed out to his eyes a dim and
distant peak which rose like a thin gray cloud almost
into the heavens,telling him, from that pinnacle he
should behold the sea for which he searched,the heart
of the conqueror melted within him with an enfeebling
joy, and once more sinking on his knees, he implored the
Divine Power to strengthen and protect him on the
toilsome
ascent which was to yield that blessed prospect to
his sight. Animated by the tidings of Ponca, and
strengthened
by prayer, he prepared to ascend the barrier
mountains
,
under the conduct of fresh guides, which he
procured
from the cassique.
The implacable chief, however, who swayed all that
countrythe proud and warlike Zemacodid not view
the departure of the Spaniards from Darien, and their
appearance
at Coyba, with indifference or unconcern. With
spies at every point, it was not long before he became
possessed of a knowledge of all the movements of the
invaders
.
The virtual rebellion of Coyba, in forming an
alliance
with his foe, was already known to him, and the
defection of Ponca he was apprised of almost as soon as
the latter had made his appearance before Vasco Nunez.
These events embittered his mind and impaired his
judgment
.
He ascribed them to the very counsel which,
perhaps
,
had preserved him so long in safety.
See you not, he said to the fugitive Caonabo, see
you not that while we watch like silent dogs along the
hills, the pale faces send their thunders into the valleys.
Why have you counselled me to this forbearance? Shall
it be that they shall go where they please, succouring my
enemies, destroying my friends, and making slaves and
women of my people, while my warriors groan that they
may not fight, and call me a woman like the Haytian?
Zemaco hath not been idle, though he hath not gone
down to do battle with the Spaniard. The wisdom of
my counsel hath been shown already. The cassique of
the Spaniard hath also remained in his bohio, and when
he sent out his young warriors were they not met by the
young warriors of Zemaco? Did they not fly before the
keen arrows of thy braves, and were they not despoiled
of their canoes, and the yellow dirt that they worship?
Twice, thrice did the young warriors of Zemaco drive
the pale faces from their path, when they came out in
small numbers to gather gold and provisions.
And is it not well, that my warriors should drive
them again from the path? If they beat the Spaniards
being but few, then shall they again beat them when
there are many. Is it not wisdom in the warrior to try?
The warriors of Zemaco have never beaten the
cassique of the Spaniard. They have only driven his
foolish young men from the path, when they scattered
themselves without wisdom in the thick woods. Let
Zemaco hear Caonabo, who hath looked down from the
hills of Xaragua on the deeds of this pa'e warrior.
Zemaco
hath been successful when the small bands of the
Spaniards were far asunder. Even now they are far
asunder. But a few remain among the bohios of Darien
a few are left with the great canoe, and dwell with the
traitor Cassique of Coyba; the rest follow their chief
warrior among the mountains, under the guidance of
Ponca
Another traitor! It is because of thy counsel,
Caonabo
,
that the hearts of my people are turned away from
Zemaco. They would have me go down and do battle
with the Spaniard.
You have fought, replied Caonabo gloomilytwice
have you fought with the Spaniard, and your arrow has
failed to reach his heart, and your war-club has failed to
crush his head.
Does the warrior lose heart for ever if he be beaten
by the strange foe, whose weapons he knows not? The
warriors of Zemaco fail not always. They cry aloud for
the battleit grieves them to look down upon the
Spaniards
while they march over the land. They shall go to
battle when the pale faces gather in the paths of the
mountains.
It is well, replied the other. Caonabo will fight for
Zemaco as if he fought for himself. But the cassique of
the Spaniards is a great warrior. You may not drive
him when you look him in the face. The arrow of
Zemaco
may not penetrate the thick armour which covers
his heart.
You tell me that I am a woman, cried the chieftain
angrily. Thou wouldst have me fly from Darien and
give up my country to the pale faces. Lo! you, Caonabo,
if I show this counsel to my people, they will tear thee in
pieces.
It is not the counsel of Caonabo, said the other
coldly but calmly, I know that the people are angry
with a warrior who has counselled them to safety, when
they would have gone to death without doing service to
Zemaco. They have grown blind because of misfortune,
and sorrow hath made them unjust. They will think
more wisely when the Spaniard hath his foot upon the
neck of Zemaco.
Ha! thou sayst! replied the other, lifting his
macana
in sudden wrath above the head of the fugitive.
What if I strike thee dead for thy insolence!
Caonabo will lose lifea little loss to a brave man
and Zemaco will lose more than life.
How! what meanest thou shall be the loss of
Zemaco
?
Wisdom, and a friend! I tell thee, Zemaco, if thou
send'st thy warriors forth against the Spaniard, they will
perish unless they can slay the cassique who leads them.
If thou canst slay him, thy conquest of the rest is easy.
He is their life as thou art the life of thy people. It is him
thou shouldst seek to slay.
Caonabo is wise indeed! replied the other with a
bitter sneer, but can warriors be slain save by
warriors
?
Have I not said, the warriors of Zemaco shall go
forth against the Spaniard? Quarequa shall lead them
against the Spaniard.
Quarequa is a brave warrior, replied the other, but
he cannot fight against the cassique of the Spaniard. Hear
me! he said, as Zemaco was about to interrupt him,
impatiently
,
hear me, Zemaco. I will counsel thee to better
things. Thou shalt gather thy men in three places, a
thousand in each, and each under a trusty warrior. One
to these shall descend upon the bohios of the Spaniard at
Dariena second shall fall upon him in the night time
when he sleeps in the dwelling of Coybaand the third
shall lie in watch along the paths, when the cassique of
the Spaniard ascends wearily the mountains. Yet I
counsel thee not to face him even then in battle. There
are ways to slay the Spaniard and yet not stand before
his thunders. Thou shalt send him messengers of peace
thou shalt give him help to ascend the mountains of
Darien. Thou shalt tell him Zemaco fears thee as an
enemy, and would have thee as a friend. Lo! he sends
thee tribute of gold and pearls, and here are fifty
warriors
to serve at thy bidding. Thou shalt do this,
Zemaco.
Ha! wouldst thou have me sell my people to the
Spaniard? Am I to bend my back to his burden? Shall
the woman of Zemaco plant maize for him in the fields,
and bear his stripes when she faints beside the task? and
shall the Cassique of Darien go to the pale face with a lie
on his tongue, and say he fears him? Go! thou hast
counselled dishonour to Zemaco, and wert thou one of
my people thou shouldst die.
VOL. II. 7
Nothing daunted, the other replied to him calmly
Thou art quick, Zemacothy bosom is filled with
doubt and bitterness, so that thy ear catches not the true
meaning of my speech. I counsel thee to speak thy fears
to the Spaniard, but I counsel thee not to fear him. I bid
thee send him thy warriors, but I bid them not serve him;
and if thou giv'st him thy treasure, it is rather that he
may have faith in what thou tellest him, than that thou
shouldst give him thy faith. If thou help'st him to ascend
thy mountains, it is only that thou mayst destroy him
when thou hast him thereif thy warriors go from thee
to the Spaniard, it is that they may be the better able to
surround his footstep, and strike at him, and him only, in
battle. Thou hast many braves who would die at thy
bidding. Say to them`Are there fifty of ye who are
ready to die, that the enemies of Zemaco may perish?'
They will answer thee`Yea, we stand before thee.'
Let them go down to the Spaniard, and say to him, `We
come from Zemaco. He sends you goldhe sends you
the seedy pearl that is gathered from the sea. He sends
you food and drink for your warriors that are famished,
and he bids us guide you along the mountain paths where
they are easiest. He would be your friend;he will
come to you when you gather on the mountain.' See
you not, Zemaco? Your warriors will bring the cassique
of the Spaniards into the narrow valleys, and there you
will meet him with all your strength. Your arrows shall
then speak for your friendship, and the rocks that sleep
along the hill-tops shall go down in answering thunders
to the thunder of the Spaniard. This is the counsel of
Caonabohis last counsel, for well I know, Zemaco,
though you have told me nothing, that the young
warriors
of Darien clamour for the life of Caonabo, and will
not sleep till they have drunk the blood from his heart.
They would make him answer for the valour of the
Spaniards,and would sacrifice him to the war-demon,
that they themselves should become wise and brave.
Caonabo fears not death, but he would have vengeance
on the Spaniard before the day is hidden from his eyes.
See you then to the words he hath spoken, for I tell you.
Zemaco, as one who sees the wing and shadow of death
above him, that the cassique of the Spaniard, whom they
call Vasco Nunez, is one to conquer all lands and all
people
before
whose path your warriors will melt as the
thick mists that gather in the evening shadows melt and
vanish before the bright eyes of the morning sun. If he
be slain, there are none to take his place, and lead his
people over the mountains. His wisdom is a greater foe
to the power of Zemaco, than all the thunder of his
warriors
.
Zemaco was impressed with the sagacity of the
fugitive
,
and not less with the calm and dignified manner in
which he declared his knowledge of a conspiracy against
his life, to which, however friendly, even Zemaco dared
not entirely oppose himself.
Caonabo hath spoken truly. The young warriors of
Zemaco hold him an evil counsellor, whose words have
gone more deeply into the heart of his people, than the
Spanish lightning. Even now they seek him that
Caonabo
may be given to the war demon as a sacrifice. But
they shall hear what he hath counselled. Zemaco will
declare the wisdom of Caonabo. Let the Haytien
warrior
go aside from the path of counsel, while the strong
men gather to Zemaco.
The fugitive did as he was bidden, and retiring from
the encampment, which now lay contiguous to the
mountain
paths over which Vasco Nunez prepared to lead his
little command, he wandered among the rocks, gloomily,
but in calm, brooding over the defeat of his plans, and the
threatening aspect of his fortunes. He was joined by his
wife, the devoted, true-hearted woman, Buru.
Father, chief, Caonabo, she exclaimed, as she
approached
himknow you that the chief who leads the
Spaniard is he who would have saved the boy from the
sharp sword of Garabito? I have seen him. It is hehe
would have struck for the poor Zemi.
The sharp sword of Garabito was a friend to Zemi
the cassique of the Spaniard is the foe to Caonabo. He
must die! was the stern answer of the fugitive.
Alas! fatherCaonabo! let not thy hand touch the
life of the good Spaniard. Spare him! spare him!Spare
him for the sake of the poor Zemispare him for the
sake of the poor Buru. Turn thy arrow from his breast
to the breast of another Spaniard. Slay not himnot
him!
Zemaco will slay allhe should spare none, if he
would be himself safe; and least of all, the cassique who
governs the Spaniards. What matter, whose arrow goes
into the heart of the Spanish chief? Will he feel more
pain if the arrow come from the bow of Caonabo or of the
basest warrior of Darien? Go, go! you are a woman
these things are for the warrior. The Spanish chief must
die, but he will not die by the hand of Caonabo. Zemaco
will send him warriors with good words, and when he
inclines to them his ear, then will they set upon and slay
him. Hear you,Caonabo will go into battle with the
Spaniard, but he will raise no hand against the chief.
Ha! but the warriors who go with a lying word to
the chief? exclaimed the woman.
They will set upon and slay him when he thinks not.
Caonabo will be among the hills. He will not strike the
chief.
Alas! alas! were the only words of the woman in
reply, as she comprehended the meditated treachery,
while with her hands she covered her eyes, from which
the tears were streaming in profusionthe tears of the
gentle-hearted Haytien to whom even the destruction of
an enemy was productive of a sorrow scarcely less great
than would have been the sudden bereavement of a
friend.
It is well that the keen sword of Garabito slew the
boy, said her lord with more gentle tones than the words
seemed to requirethou hadst else made a woman of
him like thyself, Buru. But the messenger cometh from
Zemaco. Leave me, womanI would encounter him
alone.
When she had gone, he exclaimed
He cannot bring life to Caonabohe may bring death.
If I may no more serve my people, nor harm my foe, it is
well that death should come. I will go forward and meet
the messenger.
The latter simply brought him a summons to attend
the cassique. When he reached the little hollow of the
hill, where the council had convened around their
sovereign
,
he met several of the warriors leaving his presence.
From these Caonabo encountered nothing but looks of
suspicion and ill-will. These he did not seem to regard
with any other than a sentiment of pity. Conscious of
having done for them what they never could have done
for themselvesbaffled for months an invader whom they
could not otherwise opposehe gave himself little concern
as to the estimate which they put upon his conduct. With
that forbearance of soul, which is perhaps one of the
highest
proofs of its superiority, his chief, nay, his only feeling
was one of regret, that, though their own ignorance and
vanity, his genius had been all the while labouring for them
in vain. In all probability, the rashness of an hour would
defeat all the toils and the successes of the past. Without a
word or look, either of scorn or hostility, in requital of those
so freely bestowed upon him, he entered the presence of
Zemaco, who received him with a more indulgent aspect
than that which he had shown him before the conference.
He had succeeded in pacifying the hostility of his warriors
for a season, and this little triumph enabled him to bestow
the favourso he considered itof prolonged life, upon
one who had freely risked his life in behalf of the warriors
by whom it had been so begrudgingly prolonged.
Zemaco hath shown the counsel of Caonabo to his
warriors. They love not Caonabothey believe not in
his wisdombut they have hearkened to the wishes of
Zemaco. Fifty warriors will go down to the cassique of
the Spaniard with the words of peace, which Zemaco will
put into their mouths; and when they rise among the
broken
rocks Quarequa shall lie for them in waiting, and shall
set upon and destroy them. Is this good?is it spoken
as Caonabo would have spoken?
It is good, was the reply of the fugitive, whose
features
did not change, nor put on the appearance of
pleasure
which the cassique expected them to assume. He
rather continued with a countenance and manner which
insensibly put on the extreme gravity which marked the
demeanour of the other.
Zemaco hath declared to them that Caonabo will fight
under Quarequa. Is it good?
It is good; was the almost indifferent response.
Has Zemaco no other word for the ears of Caonabo?
was the inquiry of the latter, as he beheld an expression
of anxiety in the face of the cassique, and observed that he
hesitated and faltered in his speech. With something like
an effort, as if he felt some of the pain he expected to
inflict
,
the cassique thus called upon, responded to the
questioner
as follows:
7*
There is more, Caonabo. The warriors of Zemaco
will follow the counsel of Caonabo, even as they have
followed it before; but they sayupon his head be it if
we conquer not the Spaniard. He shall die upon the
rock of sacrifice, even upon the altar of the war-demon of
Darien.
He paused, and his eye sank from before the intent and
earnest but cold gaze of the fugitive. A brief pause
ensued
ere the latter replied.
This too is good, Zemaco. Now let the warriors go
down to the Spaniard, while I join myself to the men of
Quarequa. Caonabo is ready for the Spaniard or for the
war-demon
.
But, thou, Zemaco!think'st thou that one
warrior
like Caonabo will appease the rage of the war-demon?
No! his tongue shall lap blood, when I perish, from a
thousand necks in Darien, and thine too shall be among
them.
CHAPTER VII.
THE HAYTIEN MOTHERTHE WINTER BIRD CAGED FOR SUMMER.
The
warriors of Darien were convoked in a grand and
general assemblage. The presence of the priests and
women, in all the pomp and pageantry which are almost
equally, in all barbarous countries, affected by both, served
to render the scene one of imposing and gorgeous display;
and the place chosen for the convocation was on
consecrated
ground. A rock of sacrifice rose in the centre of
the plain, which was immediately surrounded by the
magicians
the
uninitiated crowd covered the hundred hills
which looked down upon the spot. Between the great
multitude and the officiating priesthood, occupying a little
space to themselves, stood fifty of the bravest warriors of
the people of Zemaco. These had offered themselves to
the war-demon, and were to be present at the barbarous
rites performed in their behalf, and for the better
propitiation
of the appetite of the cruel power to whom they
dedicated themselves, and whose favour they invoked.
They had sworn to sacrifice the cassique of the Spaniard to
his anger, or to yield themselves up to death in the
prosecution
of their object. It needs not that we should dwell
on the horrible details which distinguished the barbarous
rites by which this pledge was to be consummated and
rendered binding on the parties. It is enough to know
that a wretched prisoner was sacrificeda subject of the
cassique of Coyba, and the blood of the victim absolutely
lapped by the devoted warriors. A consecrated knife was
put into the hands of each, with which, before he delivered
it to its future possessor, the magician gashed his breast,
thighs, and shoulders, with seemingly unmeasured and
sometimes dangerous strokes. The rites finished, the
warriors departed on their mission of treachery and hate.
Among the spectators on this occasion was the wife of
Caonabo, the unhappy woman of Hayti. The tender
heart of the islander revolted at the horrible display she
witnessed, so utterly foreign to the habits of her own
people
;
and when she thought upon the cruel object for
which the dreadful ceremony had been performed, an
intense
anxiety arose in her bosom which rendered her
feelingsharrowed and torn as they had been by the
savage orgies of the priesthoodscarcely restrainable.
It has been seen that she now knew what Spaniard led the
invaders. This knowledge had prompted her to the
appeal
made to Caonabo in his behalf. Watching along the
hills the toilsome advance of the foe, her keen eyes had
distinguished the majestic and graceful form of that
warrior
,
who, once seen, it was not easy to forget; and whose
features and carriage, impressed on her at a moment the
most keenly observant and anxiously intense of her whole
life, had become, as it were, a very part of her memory.
Never could she forget the prompt, though unavailing
interference
which he offered, when the sword of the
murderous
Garabito was lifted against her childnor the no less
prompt valour by which he would have avenged the
barbarous
deed by which she had lost the boy for ever. With
her heart beating and burning with the gratitude which she
felt for the good and gallant Spaniard, could she calmly
behold the preparations intended for his murder? Could
she hear patiently the dreadful imprecations of the savage
priesthood of the Charaibee,  the profession of a religion
the most savage of any known to the new worldand
hear the promises of the young warriors to their cassique,
to wreak vengeance by treachery, in the unguarded
moment
to which their falsehood should beguile him, upon
the brave and noble gentleman to whom her maternal
heart acknowledged so warm a debt of gratitude? Her
eyes grew blind with their tears, when all others around
her gleamed with triumph. The shouts in her ears, the
fierce cries and savage exultation, which lifted all other
hearts to furious satisfaction, went like the chilling stroke
of death into hers; and while a singular, and, we may add,
a patriotic sentiment of hope and rejoicing filled the
immense
multitude around her with the conviction that a
national enemy was about to perish, she had but the one
feeling and the one fear, that she was about to lose no
other than a friend. As yet the quickening resolution in
her mind was still unformed; but she felt, when she
retired
from the assemblage, that she could not suffer the
brave Spaniard to fall by this wily treachery. It was only
after hours of confused thought that the course of conduct
which her duty presented to her, rushed with the speed of
fire to her mind; and she resolved at all hazards to
fore-warn
the Spaniard against confiding in the professions of
the devoted warriors who had undertaken the work of
treachery. It must be understood that she little knew or
little dreamed of the danger which threatened Caonabo.
He had, with a tenderness rather due to his Haytien
connexions
than to his Charaibean birth, withheld from her the
painful doom which awaited him as the penalty following
inevitably the failure of his plans; and with the fond
conviction
that while she saved the noble Spaniard she harmed
none, and least of all, the lord of her own life and
affections
,
she resolved that very night to descend into the
plainavailing herself of the absence of Caonabo, who
was about to set forth with the army of his jealous enemy,
Quarequaand apprise Vasco Nunez of the purpose of
those who would seek him with proffers of service, and
bringing with them those treasures of gold and pearls,
which, she well knew, would tempt the Spaniard to any
degree of confidence, as they tempted also to any measure
of rashness. Women are not apt to be good politicians in
any country, and the good Buru little thought that her
truth to the cassique of the Spaniard was only so much
treachery to the protector of herself and husband, the
cassique
of Darien.
Circumstances favoured her design. It was considered
advisable that the Indian deputation bearing the presents of
Zemaco and his friendly protestations, should fetch a
compass of some extent, in order to deceive the Spaniard
as to the precise spot where the Indian army lay. The
necessity of gathering the treasure from various quarters,
was also a cause of delay, which contributed to the
prosecution
of the plan of the woman; and when she
descended
from the hills, and, on the ensuing night, entered
the camp of the Spaniards, she was several hours in
advance
of the warriors whose purpose she was about to foil.
At midnight the sentinels brought the strange woman to
the presence of the chief she sought. When she saw
him she fell upon her face. She was reminded by his
noble presence of the fearful event in which her heart was
so deeply woundedthe murder of her sonand her sobs
silenced her own speech, while they commanded the
wonder
of all around. Vasco Nunez raised her from the earth,
and gazed steadfastly on her agonized features; but the
rapid passage of events, and the continual change of faces
passing before him, had almost obliterated her mild and
humble, but truly beautiful, features from his memory,
until, seeing the abstracted and inquiring expression of his
glance, she exclaimed in accents still broken and impaired
by sobs
Buru, masterBuru. The poor Buru,the woman
that danced for the Spaniard, when the boy
Ah! said Vasco Nunez, with a feeling of
astonishment
prevailing over all others,Can it be? You here,
Buru? How came you herein whose vessel?
With more art than she commonly employed, she evaded
this inquiry, and proceeded with as little delay as possible
to declare her object, and apprise him of the dangers which
awaited him from the approaching deputation. The eye
of the warrior searched keenly her countenance, as she
unfolded the details of a design which denoted a higher
degree of artifice than was common to the Indian, and
betrayed
a kind of tactics which, if persevered in, promised to
be more dangerous to his successes than any he had yet
encountered in the new world;he would have preferred
to doubt her intelligence,her faith,but the plain and
direct narration which she gave, and the simple and sincere
expression of her face, at once forced upon him a
conviction
which he would not willingly have entertained.
The star is working for us, said he to the astrologer,
when the narration was over, and truly the events are
wonderful which belongs to this. How came this poor
woman
here, whom we left at Santo Domingo? Can it be
that she has come with other of her people in vessels of
their own? How is it, Buru, will you not tell me?
Let my lord suffer the poor woman to go to the hills,
she replied, evasively, in imperfect Spanish. Have I
not spoken all for my lord's safety? Would my lord have
the poor woman say what shall bring sorrow to her
people
?
It were base for me to think this thing, Buru, replied
the cavalier. The Blessed Mother of God forbid that I
should desire thy lips to declare any of the secrets of thy
people, which shall bring them to harm. But why would'st
thou return to the hills? Know'st thou not I am thy
friend? I will not harm thee if thou keep'st with my
warriors, but danger awaits thee among the hills, when I
go up to battle with Quareqna. It is Quarequa who leads
the warriors of Zemaco upon the hills, thou say'st?
Quarequa, and another chiefa great chief, replied
the woman.
And what name has the other chief, Buru?
demanded
Vasco Nunez.
Let not my lord ask the woman what she is forbidden
to speak; but let her depart upon her way, up the narrow
path upon the mountain. It were not well that the young
warriors of Zemaco should behold her in the tents of the
Spaniard.
Shrewdly spoken, Buruthou may'st depart; but
thou shalt wear this for my sake around thy neck, so that
when the Spaniard shall meet thee, he will say, this is one
whom Vasco Nunez loves, and will leave thee unharmed.
Nay, fear notit is the image of the Spaniard's God whom
thou beholdestone who died a cruel death, Buru, that I
might save thy child if I could, and be kind to his
mother
.
Ah, master! was the only exclamation of the woman,
as he flung around her neck a little crucifix of silver, with
the image of the dying Jesus attached. The tears trickled
down her cheeks the while, and her thick rising sobs stifled
all her farther efforts at speech. Vasco Nunez himself
conducted her beyond the limits of the camp, and deported
himself the while, without forgetting the air of the
superior
,
with all the respectful deference of one who feels
how much that is venerable is associated with the idea and
the person of a mother.
Micer Codro, he said to the astrologer, at returning,
our star serves us well at seasons, but I cannot help the
thought which tells me thou hast not yet learned truly to
decipher its language. From thy lips, whatever thou
speakest of my fortune, thy language is ever one of omen
and warning when thy subject is woman. She that has
ever been my hope and joy, is ever thy dislike and dread.
What wilt thou say touching the humble and true-hearted
woman of Hayti? Shall I doubt her story? Shall I hold
her an enemy seeking to beguile me into dangerto lull
me to sleep, or blind me against the truth, until I am shorn
of my strength and fall into the hands of my enemies.
Thou wouldst have me, I nothing doubt, reject her story,
and give ear to these cunning savages, who would lure me
with rich gifts and friendly speech, until they find fitting
moment to destroy me.
I warn thee, my son, replied the other, against
woman,since I am shown that it is by woman thou wilt
fall at last;but I tell thee not that all women will do thee
harm, and I say not that some women may not serve thee.
The stars work for man sometimes through hostile aspects,
even as Satan works in the cause of Heaven, even when
he would seem most busy in his own.
Then it is still a power beyond their own which brings
goodness to woman, and prompts her to becoming works.
Ah, CodroI fear me it is in thy memories of youth, and
in the great experience of thy heart in long past years,
rather
than in the stars of heaven, that thou seest this
ill-favour
in the nature of the woman. But, to the present need
shall I give ear to these tidings of Buru, and hold these
savages that are to seek me with friendly speech, as I
should hold lying enemies? What aspect shall I put on
before these messengers of the cunning Zemaco?
I would not have thee treat them as friends, nor yet
as foesfor the woman may have mistaken the words of
Zemaco, or she may have spoken falsely
No! no! cried Vasco Nunez hastily, interrupting
the old manNo, Micer Codro, I should as soon look to
thee for falsehood as to that meek woman of Hayti. But
thy counsel nevertheless is good. I will not treat the
savages
as foes,but I will guard them as if they might be
so. Were I sure that they came on purpose of treachery,
I should give them to the dogs for punishment. Ho
there! Colmenares!
The lieutenant made his appearance.
Get thee thy men in readinesssee that their matches
be lighted, and all things prepared for hidden strife.
Double
your guards, and let your swords be out, for we may
have close conflict. I will put these savages in chains
all but onewho shall bear the tidings back to his master,
of the bad success of this most cunning scheme. He shall
see that his treacherous practice speeds with no better
fortune than his daring. Awaybe ready.
Before the dawn of day, the fifty messengers of Zemaco
appeared in the camp of Vasco Nunez, and so far
confirmed
the truth of the tidings brought by Buru. They
were received by the Spanish cavalier with a cold
indifference
of manner which effectually concealed from them his
discovery. The preparedness in which the Spaniards
stood for battle, did not alarm them, since, under the
command
of Vasco Nunez, the Indians had never found them
otherwise. They delivered up the rich presents which
they brought, and he beheld them placed at his feet with a
countenance that underwent no change. He heard with a
like inflexibility, the glowing protestations of the orator,
who headed the deputation, and described for Zemaco, the
fond and friendly interest which his master entertained in
the fortunes of the Spaniard, in language, the warmth and
exuberance of which, fitly corresponded with its
insincerity
.
When he had finished, the cavalier regarded his
unsinking, unabashed countenance with a piercing gaze,
that might have made less rigid muscles than those of the
Indian, quiver with shame and apprehension. But the
orator met the glance with a stare of utter immobility.
What name do they give thee among thy people?
said Vasco Nunez to the speaker, after a brief pause.
I am Bacheco, said the orator, but my people call
me Canomee-calichee, or the bird that sings in winter.
Indeed! replied the Spaniard with a smileI will
cage thee, Bacheco, that I may hear thy voice in summer
also. It should be good at all seasons.
Then giving a signal to Colmenares and Pizarro, which
had been previously resolved upon, the Indians were in an
instant surrounded by the soldiers, and so sudden and
complete
was the surprise that they were disarmed of the
consecrated
knives which had been conferred upon each,
before they could think to use them.
Thou, said Vasco Nunez to one of the prisoners,
whom he commanded to be released, thou shalt go back
to Zemaco; tell him that the Spaniard sees into his heart
and knows all its falsehoodthat he hath spoken to me
VOL. II. 8
with a lying tongue, and I will put his warriors to death if
he will not come to me in person. Away! I will be upon
thy steps with the sun of another day.
The Indian thus released, looked at the Spanish chief
though without obeying him, until a glance from the eye
of the chief of the deputation, Bacheco, the orator for the
occasion, seemed to authorize his departure. Then,
bending
almost to the earth, with an air of the profoundest
deference, at the feet of Vasco Nunez, he turned gracefully
from the presence and was soon hidden from sight in the
crowd of gathering shadows that thicken at the coming of
the dawn.
CHAPTER VIII.
LOVE REMAINS, THOUGH HOPE FLIES, IN THE CONSTANCY OF
MISFORTUNE
.
Ha
, Buru! Wherefore hast thou followed me from the
hills where Zemaco keeps, and where is safety? Knowest
thou not that the warriors of Quarequa lie in wait for the
coming of the Spaniard? Knowest thou not that the path
of the Spaniard is upon these hills? Thou hast come where
the storm threatens, BuruI would thou hadst kept with
Zemaco.
Such was the salutation of Caonabo when the woman of
Hayti stood before him on the evening of the day which
followed that night when she sought the tents of the
Spaniard
.
The gentle tones of the cassique's voice, and the
earnest solicitude which he expressed for her safety, smote
her heart sorely, for, after leaving the Spaniard, she grew
half conscious that she had played the traitor to her
husband
no less than to Zemaco. It partly reconciled her to
her breach of trust, when she felt that she could declare
with an approving conscience that she preferred to share
the danger with him to the safety which he did not share.
If the storm is for Caonabo, the storm is also for
Buru. If she feared not the black waters of the sea when
Caonabo was in the canoe, she fears not the black wings
upon the mountain if he be lying beside her. Buru sees
not the danger when she looks on Caonabo.
It is well, replied the fugitive, in melancholy accents,
which as they were unusual to him, went more piercingly
into her heart than any words which he might have spoken
in anger. It is time that thou shouldst cease to behold
the stormits black wing has been above our eyes since
the Spaniard first found his accursed yellow god in Hayti.
The storm is on all the hills, and thou hadst found it with
Zemaco as thou wilt find it with Quarequa. What we
must see, that we need see not. It is therelet us not
look. If it destroys,well. If it spares,well. If it
threatens,wherefore should we tremble, when it makes
us not to tremble even when it slays? I have gone from
hill to hill that the storm might not touch me;and lo!
the very sunshine that I saw afar, had a black storm
hidden
in its bosom. I am weary of flight. I will fly no
more. I would have left thee in safety with Zemaco,
Buru, but it is better that thou shouldst be here. When
the keen sword smote the neck of the boy Zemi, dost thou
think he felt pain, Buru? Look! I would take this little
javelin, Buru, and I would make in thy heart a small mark,
no bigger than its pointwhy dost thou tremble and
shrink?I will only do so at thy prayer:and thou
shouldst never see the cloud, nor fear the storm any
more.
Ah, father, chief!thy words are strange and terrible
to the poor, weak woman of Hayti. Oh, speak not thus
as if thy heart had forsaken thee. Be angry with the
foolish womanlift thy hand and strike her with thy
anger
;but
let not this heavy spirit be in thy speech.
Wherefore shouldst thou lose thy heart, now, when thou
hast warriors at thy bidding, and the great cassique Zemaco
calls thee even to his secret counsels?
Ha! ha! exclaimed the fugitive, with a laugh of
bitter
derisionthou art but a woman, Buruthou knowest
as little of the hearts of men as of their counsels. Let us
say nothing of the warriors which are led by Caonabo, or
of the counsels that he gives to Zemaco. When the
Spaniards
come up the mountain, thou wilt ask after these
warriors
,
but I know not that they will answerand if Zemaco
takes counsel from Caonabo, and the counsel be unwise
and unsuccessful, it may be thou wilt then ask, and have
no answer, when thy question is of Caonabo. But thou
hast not said the thing I asked of thee. The sharp sudden
stroke of the Spaniard when it smote the neck of Zemi,
the boydost thou think it brought him more pain than
when they put the lash on his back at the Encomienda of
Ribiero?
Oh, no! no! was the prompt reply.
Thou hast a quick and true thought of it, Buru. The
pain of death is a pain here and heretouching his head
and heart as he spokeand if these care not to live,
there is no pain. If I put this sharp flint into thy
bosom
Oh, father, chief, Caonabo, what wouldst thou
wouldst thou slay the woman of Haytithe mother of the
boy?
She shrank back impulsively from his grasp, as, half
baring the swelling bosom which was still beautiful, as she
was still young, he rested the edge of the keen javelin upon
her heart.
If thou biddest me,yes! was the calm replystill
terrible, though nothing could exceed the mournful
tenderness
of his tones. I would not slay thee, BuruNo!
But thinkest thou to live when the strife rageswhen the
Spaniard has put his foot on the neck of Caonabo?
Her shriek silenced him, and falling on her knees before
him, she implored him to forbear.
Ha! what is this, woman! he cried in fierce accents,
as, falling from the bosom where she had concealed it, the
silver cross given her by Vasco Nunez became revealed
to his sight.Speak!say, before I slay theewhy is
it that I find upon thy neck the image that the Spaniard
worships?
He seized the sacred emblem as he spoke, and tearing it
from her neck, while she vainly endeavoured to arrest his
arm, flung it over into one of the wild abysses of the
mountains
where they lay. His fierce demand which received
no answer, was again repeated, and, still incapable of speech,
she sank prostrate upon her face before him, while his
wrath, rising into almost ungovernable violence as he
surveyed
her, prompted him to spurn her with his lifted
foot.
Thou hast fled the gods of the Charaibee and the
Haytien
to which thou wast sworn. Thou hast sold thyself and
them to the gods of the Spaniard. It is because of this
that they aid us notit is because of this that the Spaniard
drives us to the hills and slays our warriors. What
black spirit has possessed thee, woman, to deliver up thy
people to the foes who have slain thy own child? Speak,
that I may be moved with fury to slayit is because I
look on thee with horror that I cannot strike.
8*
The moaning, inarticulate prayer for mercy alone
reached his ears; and her eyes were not once uplifted
from the ground. Suddenly the air resounded with the
clamours of an hundred war conchs, a token that the
army of Quarequa was rising into activity, and a summons
that demanded the presence of Caonabo for other duties.
His tone and whole manner suddenly changed. His words
and accents were alike mournful.
Oh, Buruwoman that has been the mother of the
Charaibean son, and has slept on the bosom of Caonabo,
was there not enough of sorrow for the chief that thou hast
done this thing? Was the grief slow to hunt him that thou
hast invoked a false god to be my enemy? Did I speak to
thee even in angerdid I beat thee with cruel blowsdid
I gash thee with flintsdid I drive thee forth beneath the
tempest in winter? Why has thou taken the dead god of
the Spaniards to thy bosom and cast from thee the living
god of the Charaibee? It is well for thee that Caonabo has
no anger left him nowit is well that he feels so base that
he can no longer strike any but the Spaniard. He hath
heard the threat of Zemaco in his ear, and he hath spoke
no defiance. He hath beheld the scornful glance of
Quarequa
,
and he hath lifted no hand to slay. If he spares
Zemaco and Quarequa, shall he not spare the woman?
and yet, Buru, I tell thee that if thou hast taken the god of
the Spaniards to thy heart, thou hast done more harm to
Caonabo than the threat of Zemaco and the scorn of
Quarequa
.
He left her prostrate where she lay and went forth to
where the warriors were assembling. There, in the
presence
of the host, Quarequa informed him of the messenger
from the Spanish chief and of the fortune which had
befallen
the fifty warriors.
And thus saith Zemaco, continued the jealous and
malignant savage, with an exultation which gleamed from
his eyes and which he did not seek to hide, if the
cassique of the Spaniards fall not in the strife to-day, it is
because of thy counsel; and thou shalt atone, on the stone
of sacrifice, to the war-demon of Darien, for the warriors
that have perished.
Caonabo gave no answer, and the smile of pity which
overspread his countenance as he witnessed the hostile air
of his enemy, was quickly succeeded by a look of wo,
which, however, took its rise from a far different source
than any solicitude for his own fate. The war-conchs
sounded, and the command of Quarequa compelled his
attention to the band of warriors which he was required to
lead. But a moment was left him for speech with the
poor woman, his wife, who had followed, with all the
adhesive
attachment of the dog, the steps of the master who
had punished.
Woman, I now know thy secret. Thou hast been down
the hills and hast spoken with the Spaniard. Thou little
knowest the evil thou hast done. Thou hast saved him,
but thou hast slain thy husband. It is well. I reproach
thee not for this, for I tell thee I am weary of life. But
thou hast given me to a cruel death, and thou hast betrayed
thy people to a more cruel enemy. Lo! I am merciful.
Get thee in readiness to die when the battle is over, for as
sure as the god of the Charaibee is a god of strength and
terror, so surely will I sacrifice thee to his wrath when the
strife is ended with the Spaniard.
Slowly she followed after his footsteps, as he went to
the spot where his warriors awaited him, but he spoke to
her no other word; and many and mixed, indeed, were
the thoughts of dread and danger in her mind, and of
sorrow in her heart, as she heard the far music of the
Spanish trumpet coming up to the combat on the
mountains
.
But of the danger to herself she had the most childish
unconsciousness. Though he had spurned and threatened
her, she thought only of his danger, and of that strange
and sad hopelessness of heart with which he had spoken
in their late interview. With an eye that never lost sight
of his person, she followed all his movements; and when
the Spanish files began to appear in sight, winding slowly
on their way up the uneven hills, she sat down upon a
rock which overlooked the ambush of the Indians, resolved
to watch over the fugitive Caonabo, as if her mere watch
could suffice to disarm some of the danger, or defeat
some of the foes which might lurk around his path. It
was the watch of love still lingering, even after the flight of
hope, and no less constant in its devotion than that
envious
fortune which had driven from the side of the warrior
all his other and abler friends.
CHAPTER IX.
THE LAST FIGHT OF THE CHARAIBEETHE WAR-DEMON HAS HIS
VICTIM.
The
justly-minded reader will seldom find much
pleasure
in the perusal of narratives which dwell largely upon
the conflicts between the accomplished cavaliers of Europe,
and the simple, half-naked warriors of the new world. The
inequality of the combatants revolts the mind at all
solicitous
of justice. The war between these adversaries was
most generally all on one side,and the poor Indians
obtained
their occasional successeswith some few
exceptions
,
among which may be named the long contest of the
Spaniards with the Araucanianssimply through the
contemptuous
negligence of their adversaries. Their battles,
so called, were usually little else than massacres, in which
each butcher slew his thousand victims. Mere numbers
on the part of the Indians, so far from increasing the
difficulty
and the merit of conquest to the Europeans, in
reality facilitated greatly the dreadful business of arquebus
and sword; since, as the Gaul said to the Romans, thick
grass is always easier cut than thin. The policy of
Caonabo had been to reconcile this inequality between the
parties, by a resort to that only ally which could possibly
effect the object; but which, strange to say, our European
casuists have always found particularly detestable when
employed by any other than their own people,namely,
treachery. As if the injured and inferior people were not
not merely authorized, butbound to resort to any and
every practice in order to repel and destroy the invader, who,
without pretext or right, descends upon foreign and peaceful
lands, and relying on the superiority of his arts and arms
makes unequal war for the destruction of the unoffending.
Zemaco had no other idea of war than that taught him by
the hardy valour of his people, in which personal agility
and strength furnished the chief sources of power, and no
arts were practised but those which enabled them to fling
the javelin to its mark unerringly, and in the close strife
to wield the heaviest club with the lightest effort, and
grapple the most formidable foe with heart and muscle
equally inflexible and unrelaxing. The small, and
seemingly
effeminate Spaniards, were, until the influence of
their strange and godlike weapons were made known,
regarded
with scorn by the gigantic warriors of Darien, who,
rushing upon them without fear, thought to annihilate
them without effort. The result of the combats of Zemaco
with his new enemies is already known to the reader; and
a demonstration to the mountain warriors of the utter
inadequacy
of the arms and practice to which they had been
accustomed for successive generations, to oppose assailants
who carried thunderbolts always lighted in their hands,
left them for a brief period in a state of hopelessness which
was truly pitiable. The counsels of Caonabo had
produced
a beneficial effect upon their spirits no less than
fortunes
;
as they taught them to oppose caution and cunning
to superiority, and to avoid the enemy with whom they did
not openly dare to contend. They fled from well-drilled
and well-commanded bodies of the Spaniards, but still
hovering along their path, they descended upon them in
their hours of indiscretion or repose; and by this
partisan
policy, cut off stragglers, foragers and explorers;
gradually
thinning the numbers, always few, of the power
that was destined never to prove itself more formidable to
the poor Indians than when it seemed least numerous and
most feeble. What effect this policy of the fugitive
cassique
might have had upon the progress and the fortunes
of Vasco Nunez, if continued, may not be so readily
affirmed
;
but the inference is fair, from what is already
known, that, with the slender forces of the Spanish
conqueror
,
his insecure position in the regard of his
sovereign
,
and the restless, reckless and impatient character of
the men whom he commanded, he must have been baffled
sufficiently long in his march across the peninsula, to have
made him so unpopular with both sovereign and people,
as to have led to his deposition; and this event, by placing
the Spaniards under the command of inadequate leaders,
would, more certainly than any other, have produced that
equality between the parties which was the chief object in
all the labours of Caonabo. But the favour which the
fugitive had found in the sight of the cassique of Darien,
led, naturally enough, to a jealous hostility on the part of
those native warriors, who, hitherto, had been the
exclusive
agents, and, perhaps, directors of his power. The
fierce chieftain to whom was assigned the task of opposing
the progress of the Spaniard over the mountains, first
kindled the spirit of discontent among the people of
Darien at the honours bestowed upon the stranger. A
faction had sprung into existence, of which Quarequa was
the head, the power and claims of which Zemaco found
himself unable to withstand. But the cassique did not
yield without an effort to save the fugitive, and to his
resolute
defence of Caonabo may be referred the indulgence
which had been given him, by which his life was made to
depend upon the success of his own plans. The failure of one
important item in these plansthe attempt upon the life
of the Spanish captainwas, Caonabo well knew,
equivalent
to the failure of his last hope, and a sure forerunner
of his own doom;and it would not be easy to describe
the pang which the doomed warrior felt, when, in the last
moment of his interview with the wife of his bosom, he
was driven by the force of circumstances to the conviction
that to her treachery the failure was attributable wholly.
Suffering as she did, the pang would have been far greater
at her heart than any at work in his, could she have known
the dreadful consequences, following, to the chief whom
she did not less reverence than love, from an act which
seemed to her one of unmixed benevolence and good. It
was, perhaps, the noblest proof of his love for the unhappy
woman, that, in the moment of his own conviction of the
truth, he yet withheld it from her knowledge. Had he
but spoken out what he knewhad he but declared the
true meaning of that vague charge which he made her at
parting, then the death with which he threatened her had
been the very kindest boon ever offered by his hands.
But though indifferent to life, Caonabo did not go into
battle as one without hope. He did not suffer his private
wrongs, and the hostility of Quarequa, to blind him to the
remembrance that the Spaniards were their national
enemies
.
He prepared to exert all his capacities against
them, as much so as if the country which he toiled for was
his own, and he possessed the warmest confidence and
affections of the people. With this aim he sought out
Quarequa, while there was yet sufficient time left to suffer
them to elude the arms of the enemy and even to escape
his sight. He declared himself averse to battle, advised
that the warriors of Darien should harass the Spaniards
from the heights, and still retreat at their approach. It
will be easy, he said in brief, to destroy the dogs with
our arrows when unsupported by the warriors, and by their
death we deprive the Spaniards of one of their most
powerful agents of destruction. Their thunder we can
ourselves escape behind the hills, to the tops of which we
only rise for an instant to aim a shaft or a javelin, and by
timely flight from hill to hill, baffle equally pursuit and
aim of the enemy, who, covered with heavy armour and
without horse, cannot hope to follow us. The ambuscade
you have set for them now, will surprise but not destroy
them; and failing to do this, when you have once met
them, you cannot then avoid a general conflict.
Such was the amount of the last advice which the
fugitive
offered to his uncompromising enemy. It was answered
in the language of insolence and taunt
Let the women of Hayti fear the Spaniard. There are
men in Darien. Caonabo can go back among the
mountains
,
if he loves not to behold the strifelet him hide
behind
the hills, and shoot his arrows down into the plain by
stealth, even as he counsels; but he cannot fly death
always
.
Hath he not heard the words of Zemaco? If we
conquer not the Spaniards this day, it is because the
war-demon
of Darien is hungering for his victim. Caonabo will
do well to prepare himself for the Spaniard, if he loves not
the rock of sacrifice.
For a moment the natural indignation of the man got the
better of the calm, forbearing spirit of the patriot, and the
fugitive chief replied to the insulting warrior in tones and
language which were not unfelt even by the savage enemy
whom he addressed.
Were it not that there is an enemy before us,
Quarequa
,
I would tear thy dog tongue from thy throat. It will
be well for thee if the thunder of the Spaniard strikes thee
down this day, for, as surely as the war-demon of Darien
clamours for one victim, I will give him, if I survive this
battle, another; and thou shalt go to his altars tongueless,
that thou mayst neither taunt the brave warrior with thy
foul speech, nor brag of thy own worthless deeds. See
that thou make thyself worthy of death by my hand in the
doings thou shalt this day show.
Nothing but the prompt interposition of the surrounding
warriors, and the rapid approach of the Spaniards,
prevented
the mortal issue which the chiefs equally desired, and
the words of Caonabo had invited. They separated with
eyes breathing fire, and hearts in which the flame of mutual
hostility was burning almost as keenly as that which they
individually felt towards their invader. Though maddened
to momentary forgetfulness, the fugitive chief did not suffer
himself to lose sight of the cares which gathered before
him in the approaching conflict; nor did he spare any of
his efforts of mind or body to make the battle, so unwisely
risked, more hopeful on the part of the Indians. He
scatterred
his men along the most broken ledges of the heights
commanding the advance of the Spaniards, and lessening
the distance in an air line between themselves and the foe,
in reality lessened the danger. Many of these, in addition
to their ordinary weapons, he provided with heavy rocks,
which had been previously heaped conveniently together,
and lay in little piles on the verge of every declivity. He
commanded his men to sling their clubs to their necks
by the thong with which they were usually tied for this
very purpose; and by a command so very unusual among
the savages of Darien, on the approach of battle, he
furnished
a check to that impetuosity of disposition, which
most generally led them to rush forward to the combat
hand to hand, in utter despite of the superior arms borne
by the Spaniards. Another result of this arrangement was
to compel them at first to the free and exclusive
employment
of the weapons left them,namely, the missiles
provided
on the hills, and the arrow and javelin, in the use
of which no people could be more expert. These were
the weapons which were chiefly feared by the Europeans,
since a well-aimed lance or arrow in the hands of an Indian,
was most frequently quite as fatal as the rude firelock of
that early period, and perhaps, in a closely-wooded
country
,
not much inferior to the more deadly rifle of our own
day. Their value as a weapon of war against an invader,
one chief part of whose strength lay in bloodhounds, was
incomputable; since a deliberate warrior, having an elevated
position, might very well disable every such assailant, if
his approach could be seasonably distinguished; and the
heavy rocks which garnished the heights were no less good
against the slow, uptoiling soldier. Thus prepared, Caonabo
waited with impatience the progress of the foe, and his
war-conch was the first to open with the signal music of
battle.
Vasco Nunez was a wary captain. He saw no foes
while ascending the ambushed pass, but his quick military
eye readily conceived the excellence of such a position for
the purpose to which Caonabo had preferred it. He
commanded
a halt, and resolved to devote some time to a
survey
of the ground in order to the choice of a less perilous
pathway. But, fortunately for his little army, the rash
character of the cassique who led the main body of the
Indians
,
now doubly stimulated to temerity by the exciting
controversy which had taken place between himself and
the fugitive chief, and no less encouraged, perhaps, by the
unexpected show of caution on the part of the Spaniards,
hastily emerged into sight from the cover which concealed
him, and rushing forward with all his force, himself
entered
upon the passage, the heights overlooking which were
lined with the still hidden warriors of Caonabo. Exulting
in the feeble vanity of his heart, at an exhibition of courage
which he thought every way beyond his antagonist, he
shouted aloud to the fugitive, whom he passed in his rapid
onset, to do likewise if he was a man.
Fool! fool! was the bitter exclamation of Caonabo
in replyhe hath ruined all. He hath given me, and
himself, and his country, to the barking dogs of the
Spaniard
.
The prediction was accomplished almost in the instant
after its utterance. The onset of Quarequa relieved Vasco
Nunez from any apprehension of danger from the heights,
and, pouring in a dreadful volley from his arquebusses, he
rushed forward to the
mele
, leading the way himself for his
no less resolute followers. Quarequa paid for his temerity
in the first joining of the battle. A shot struck him in the
brain, and he fell without a groan, his own headlong
followers
rushing, unconsciously for a while, over his
prostrate
body. The Spaniards bearing bucklers at once closed
with the more forward Indians, and the terrific thunder of
VOL. II. 9
their first-used weapons was scarcely more imposing in
its effect than the short keen cut-and-thrust, which was
the common weapon of the time. Still the Indians fought
manfully. Indeed, they had no choice but fight. Their
own immense numbers, crowded and still crowding into the
narrow passage into which their leader had so rashly
descended
,
not only defeated their own capacity to fight with
profit, but utterly prevented those from flight who bore the
whole brunt of the unequal battle. Meanwhile, Caonabo
looked down from his heights in an anguish that cannot be
spoken. Not an arrow could he send, not a javelin could
he fling, without danger to his own people. The Spaniards
were effectually incorporated with the confused and blinded
crowd, and the bloodhounds, now loosed, were pulling
down victim after victim without the pause of an instant,
and almost without injury in the conflict. The brave Carib
felt that he could no longer maintain his positionthat he
must descend also to the hopeless strifegiving himself up
to share the dangers of the miserable victims, led like sheep
to the slaughter by the improvident and insolent rashness
of the incompetent fool who had them in command.
Yet, were it not well, he demanded, looking round
upon his men, if we slay the Spaniards with our rocks,
not seeing that there are people of our own below? Let
us fling down these mighty masses which shall crush them
all, and give us freedom for ever. Zemaco will lose many
warriors, but oh! my brethren, the Spaniards will all
perish
all!
all!
The terrible proposition was received in profound
silence
.
There was no answering word or action. The
warriors
commanded by Caonabo had imbibed no small share
of that jealousy of his power which had led the native
chiefs to a factious rashness; and though they had seen
how easy it would have been for them to have absolutely
annihilated the power of the Spaniards, under the sole
guidance of the fugitive chief, yet the daring and the death
of Quarequa had redeemed his rashness and folly in their
eyes. The appeal of Caonabo fell upon unheeding ears
none responded to his suggestion, and a sullen reply
from more than one proposed to descend to close combat
in the already crowded gorge. With a sigh from the
bottom
of his hearta sigh which denoted the loss of the last
hopethe chief bade them get their war-clubs ready, and
leading the way, he brought them into conflict at the
somewhat
auspicious moment when the Spaniards, driving the
fugitives before them, were about to ascend the table-land
of the mountain. His war-conch sounded cheerily and
encouraged the flying party, as much as it startled the
successful
,
by announcing the coming into combat of a fresh
band of warriors. The voice of Caonabo rang through the
field, clear as a Spanish trumpet, in encouragement to his
men. He spoke in the native dialect of Darien. He used,
in brief, every argument and phrase of bitter import which
could make them more reckless and ferocious in the
conflict
.
The war-demon looks down upon you, he cried
he claims, he clamours for ye all. Ye will all perish,
whether ye fight or fly, then why should ye fear this
bursting
thunder of the Spaniard, or why should ye shrink from
his biting sword? Will ye not bite again with a keen tooth
will ye not grapple him with a hearty hate? Lo! men
of DarienI a strangera man of Hayti, where ye hold
the men as womenI will show ye how to grasp the
Spaniard
I
will lead ye to the sort of strife ye love! Look,
where I go, ye who now tremblelet all follow, and take
ye hold, each on some such enemy as him I seek; then,
if ye die, Zemaco will have no more need of warriors,
since he will have no more enemies. Lo, ye! Follow!
follow! 'Tis a woman of Hayti shall show the warriors of
Darien how to seek their foes.
Without heeding the effort of this taunting speech, and
seemingly only solicitous to gain the thick of the combat,
the fearless fugitive rushed forward, and it was not long
ere he attained what seemed his object. Once more he
confronted the Spanish captain, and opposed his war-club
of palm, to the keen edge of the Spanish sword. Vasco
Nunez recognized his opponent at a glance.
Ha! thou art a bold knave to face me again, but thou
shalt not escape me now. Yet, before I strike with thee,
let thy people throw down their arms and receive mercy.
Thou seemest to be their leadercommand them, that I
may spare their lives.
They want no life from thee, Spaniardthey seek
thy life, as I dothey will give their own lives to win it.
Have at thee then, for a bold savagethou deservest
the blows of one.
Once more the well-tempered steel of the Spaniard
severed
the macana of the Indian, but the sword flew in twain
also with the stroke. Some secret fracture in the blade, or
the uncommon hardness of the opposing wood, rendered
it unequal to the collision; and the Spanish chieftain,
still confronted by the Charaibee, bore no weapon but the
fragment of the blade, scarcely a poniard's length, and
without
the point of the poniard, to make it useful as such. The
Indian meanwhile threw aside his equally ineffectual club,
and grasping Vasco Nunez around the body with one arm,
heedless of the repeated strokes which the latter bestowed
with his broken weapon upon his head, he raised a dagger
with the other hand, the stroke of which was only baffled
by the keen eye and quick movement of the Spaniard.
Practised in every sleight in the use of his weapon
proverbially
egregius digladiator,Vasco Nunez caught
the uplifted arm of his tenacious foe, and flinging away his
own broken weapon in the same instant, with a strength
which awakened the Indian's wonder, and which he vainly
endeavoured to resist, he wrested the dagger from his hold,
and ere he could recede a pace, he drove it, with unrelaxing
arm, deep into the eye of his enemy, the sharp point of
the steel meeting its first resistance only from the skull
behind
.
The hard struggleone of the hardest to which in
a life of warlike enterprise the Spanish cavalier had ever
been subjectedwas over; and he threw from him the
expiring body of a hero, who, in his own savage empire,
and during his exile in the empire of other savages,
betrayed
virtues of patriotism and courage which had done
honour
to the histories of a people far more advanced in those
arts which secure the awards of glory and posterity. With
the fall of Caonabo, the battle, though not over, will need
at our hands no farther development. Enough, that the
Indians fighting valiantly still, fought against hope and in
the very mockery of valour. A carnage followed, which
Vasco Nunez vainly endeavoured to restrain; and it was
with a rebuking and gloomy spirit that he walked over the
bloody field, and surveyed the grim, fearless faces of the
thousand savage warriors whom he had slain, and who
seemed still, even in death, to gaze upon him with a stern
defiance. But when he came to the spot distinguished by
his own desperate conflict with the fugitive cassique, he
was startled to hear a faint moaning arising from the place,
and to behold a woman outstretched beside the corpse of
the unconscious warrior. A second glance revealed to
him the Haytian motherthe now utterly desolate and
miserable Buru.
Buru! he exclaimed, stooping to the ground and
striving
to raise her from it as he spoke, is it thou, my good
Buru! What dost thou here, and who is he, the warrior
beside thee?
She resisted his efforts to lift her, and clung with
something
of violence to the corpse.
Let Buru die with the chief! she exclaimed, Buru
would not have help from the Spaniardshe would die
she would die.
But thou forgettest, Buru, I am thy friendI would
help and save thee. Thou shalt go with me and be in
safety among the tents of the Spaniard.
No! no! not with the Spaniard, she replied with a
passionate shriek and gesture, not with the Spaniard.
He hated the Spaniardthe Spaniard was the enemy of
the chief. He will be angry with Buru if she goes to the
Spaniard.
And who was hewhat was he of whom you speak,
Buru? What chief is it that you lamentcan this be
Zemaco
?
It is no Haytien, it is a Carib!
Zemaco! no! Zemaco sleeps in safety on his hills
towards Darien. He!and she spoke in lower and
reverential tones while she pointed to the bodywas he
not the great chief of the Caribwas he not Caonabo, the
father of Zemiand was not Buru the mother of the
boy?
A passionate flood of grief followed this revelation; the
sobs of the woman who still clung to the corpse of the
warrior, utterly preventing all farther speech at the
moment
.
This, then, was the mountain warrior that buffled our
best warriors so longthis was Caonabo.
The half spoken eulogy which fell unconsciously from
Vasco Nunez, renewed the provocation to sorrow in the
mind of the hearer.
Alas! for the womanalas for the poor Buru. It is
Caonabo no more. The chief is silent like the rock, and
coldcold. Caonabo! father! chief! He will not hear
me, or I went down to the Spaniard, and told him of the
9*
young warriors! He is angry with the woman, and she
must die. He hath sworn when his sleep is over, to give
me in sacrifice to the angry god of the Charaibee. Buru
must die!
The words of Vasco Nunez tended in no way to settle
the grief of the woman. She was possessed of an idea
one, most probably, common to her peoplethat, as he
had doomed her to death, the doom would inevitably be
fulfilled by some agency under the instigation of the
cruel demon which the Charaibee worshipped; and all her
words and actions tended, after this, to reveal the strong
hold which this faith had upon her mind. She suffered
them to remove the corpse and to bury ita degree of
respect especially shown to the unhappy widow, and of
which she seemed acutely conscious, as she closely
regarded
every movement of the warriors to whom this duty
was assigned. But this done, she proceeded to offices
which truly indicated the insane direction of her mind;
and in the tent to which Vasco Nunez had her conducted,
and in which she was carefully watched and tended, she
busily employed herself in those preliminary rites with
which the doomed victim prepares herself for death. She
cut away her hair and consumed it by fire. Fearing that
she might employ the same instrument upon herself, Vasco
Nunez had it removed from her possession and control.
But this seemed to give her no concern. She carefully
performed her ablutions, arranged her garments, and
seating
herself at the entrance of the tent, appeared like one in
waiting for a messenger. The tears were dried upon her
cheek, and she uttered no farther complaint. But the eyes
lacked all lustre, and looked out with a stare quite as full
of unconsciousness as indifference, though the busy
movements
of the warriors returning from pursuit of the
fugitives
,
and gathering spoils and repairing armour, were all
going on before her. Vasco Nunez encamped that night
on the field of battle; his sentinels were placed and his
preparations made, as if he had not been the victor, and as
if the forces of his foe were still lurking along the hills
around him. Silence rested upon the encampment, so
deep that the very footfall of the watchful and walking
soldier
disturbed the drowsy echoes, and wakened them to
startle for a moment the hungering beasts that had descended
for prey to the field of carnage. Sound, indeed, was the
sleep of that weary band, with few exceptions, which had
toiled and fought so freely and with such success. But no
ear was so dull with sleep, but would have been pierced
by the terrible and strange shriek which rang at midnight
throughout the host. It came from the tent, the only one
in the encampment, which Vasco Nunez had assigned, with
a considerate humanity, to the widow of the cassique.
Once, twice, thrice, was that shriek repeated, and every
heart trembled into instant consciousness and
apprehension
,
as the shrill sounds came back in prolonged
reverberations
from the hills. Vasco Nunez was one of the first
to leap from his place of rest, and, snatching up his arms as
he heard the cry, to rush to the spot whence it proceeded.
One of the sentinels was already at the tent which he had
not yet entered, but from which he averred himself to have
seen a tall and shadowy figure depart, the moment after he
had been startled by the screams. The cavalier called to
the woman within, but received no answer. All was
ominous silence. He entered, and his first step was
arrested by something which seemed like a human body
at his feet.
Bring torchestorches! he cried aloud, as his own
anxiety grew almost intolerable. Fearing to harm the
person
at his foot by any forward movement, he was about to
recede, when he felt, with a nameless horror, his sandals
almost fastened to the earth by some clammy substance,
the nature of which he too readily divined. Lights were
brought, and he found the unhappy woman on the ground
in the person before him. She was already insensible.
The blood, streaming from mouth and nostril had sluiced
the earth around her, and had exhausted the precious
fountain
at her heart. There was no wound, no sign of
violence
upon her person. The conflicting emotions of her
heart had been her executioner, and the sanguinary god of
the Charaibee had despatched an avenger, as silent and
certain
as he had been noiseless and pathless. The poor
woman had expiated her involuntary treason to her lord;
and it may be permitted to fancy, to believe that, restored
to his favour, she still attends him, and the child she loved,
among those blue hills and green sloping valleys which
make the heaven of the humble-hoping savage.
CHAPTER X.
THE CROWNING EMINENCEVASCO NUNEZ SURVEYS THE PACIFIC
OCEAN FROM THE PEAKS OF DARIEN.
The
victory gained over Quarequa removed from the
path of Vasco Nunez all farther obstructions from that savage
in his passage onward. That warrior with six hundred of
his followers lay on the field of battle, having paid, in this
manner, the penalty of his impatient valour, and of the
mean and fatal jealousy with which he regarded the
progress
of the fugitive cassique in the confidence of his
superior
.
The next day his conqueror reached the flourishing
village in which Quarequa dwelt, where he found abundance
of those spoils of gold and jewels, which had been
sufficient
reward for most Spanish conquerors, and amply
compensated
his followers for all their wounds, toils and perils.
To him, however, whose heart was set on schemes of far
higher object, and whose spirit yearned with that audacious
ambition which seeks life beyond man's ordinary limits
seeks life among men even when the grave has covered
over the feelings, the fears, and the fortunes of his petty
hour and mortal partthe delights shown by his followers at
these acquisitions seemed no less ridiculous than base.
He turned from the glittering heaps as they underwent
division
among his soldiers, and his eye watched with
anxiety
inexpressible, the only mountain still towering in his
path, which remained for him to overcome. From the
peak of that mountainso his guide assured him,might
be seen the placid waters of that secret sea, the sight of
whose waters was to reward him for years of
apprehension
,
months of toil and peril, constant strifes, and the eating
cares of that often-defeated hope, which had grown sick
under a thousand disappointments, and only revived in the
compelling fervour of that resolving genius which had
sustained
him and it alike, and forced the very stars of destiny
in the direction of its desires. That single mountain, at
the foot of which he stood, lay between him and the
object
of his quest. His heart bounded within his bosom
his spirit, scarcely restrainable, impelled him forward;
but when he looked round upon his weary and diminished
band, only sixty of whom remained for this last effort, he
felt that the toil was too much to be undertaken, in the
exhaustion
of the day, no less than of his soldiers. And still,
at least for one night longerhis hope was to be baffled.
And what might be the events,the defeats, the disasters
of that one night! Even now, with the empire within his
grasp which was to crown and render glorious all the
previous
toils of his life, it might be plucked from his
possession
,
and he himself hurled down to that obscurity,
worse than death, which was the antipathy of the fervent
and leading passion of his soul. Such were the thoughts
that kept him wakeful that long and weary night; and
apprehensions
which put on the shape of fear that his soul had
never known before, now made him tremble with a
weakness
,
the result of that superior height of aim and position,
which too often leads to dizziness in the triumphant aspirant.
Even now, thought he, the messenger of Ferdinand
may be on his way, pursuing me, even into these pathless
solitudes. His footstep may sound in my ears ere this
night be over; and if he be of the temper of the base
Enciso
,
as of too many of those who represent our sovereign
in the new world, then may he, in the insolence of his
mood, deny me even to look upon the wondrous empire
which I have sought out at so much peril.
This reflection brought with it a new resolve. Once
more his eyes gazed upon the mountain. The stars were
sleeping over head. The winds gently swept down the
precipitous sides of that barrier, which, reduced in the
imperfect
starlight to his eyes, seemed easy of ascent, and
almost stooping to his feet. His ear fancied that the
murmur
which he heardthat of the breeze at dalliance with
the lofty firs along the steepwas the solemn murmur of
the contiguous ocean.
I will ascend it while they all sleep. It cannot be
many hours ere I reach the topere dawn I must; and
none then may deprive me of the sight. Why should I
pause? It is not for me now to sleep. I feel no weariness,
but that of this delay; and have no fears. St. John, of the
Wilderness, be my strength and guide! Help me, thou that
hast so long given me thy help, so that this goodly work
of mine, which thou hast greatly favoured, may be made
secure at last! Let me behold the glowing empire which
shall make me forget the scorn of women and the
persecutions
of menwhich shall enable me to triumph, so that I
may look on the messenger of fate with a smile, and at
least give to Spain the empire which she will not let me
keep! I will go forwardthis night, at least, is my
own.
The tread of a light footstep behind him, touched his
ear, and arrested the soliloquy of the speaker. He turned
and beheld the youth Pedro, his secretary.
Ha! boy! Is it thou? thou shouldst be at rest. Art
thou not weary? thou shouldst be! I have seen thee do
better service this day than it seemed to me possible for
thy slender arm to accomplish; and it was my resolution
to rebuke thee for a forwardness against which thou hadst
my counsel in the morning. Why didst thou adventure
thyself so rashly?
I but followed thee, Seor Vasco. Thy example was
of more authority than thy precept, when the blood was in
fever, and the arrows of the Indians were goading the most
timid forward. Could I have thought at such moment of
thy morning counsel I had not so erred; but, in truth, the
hour of thought had gone by, and I found myself in action,
and the action over, ere I thought again. I trust, as my
offence was involuntary, that it will be forgiven me.
Courage is any thing but a fault in the eye of the
courageous
,
and the answer of the chief was approving.
But thou shouldst be weary now, Pedrowhy dost
thou not seek thy rest?
It is, seor, because I have something of thy yearning
to-night which keeps me wakeful. I heard from the guide
given us by Ponca, that yonder summit would give us
glimpses of that great southern sea, and though I deemed
not we should gaze upon it this night, I yet desired to
place my feet upon the mountain which stood in our
pathway
.
And how knowest thou, boy, that we shall behold it?
replied the chief sharply, didst thou hear my words ere I
saw theedidst thou hearken to my secret speech?
The answer of the youth was prompt and rather rapidly
spoken. There was something in the tones of his voice,
which seemed to denote vexation at the suspicion which
his coming had incurred.
I heard thee, seor, but with no intent to hear. I
knew not that thou wast near me, till I heard the sound of
thy voice, and I then drew nigh that thou shouldst see me.
I heard nothing but thy expressed determination to ascend
the mountain this night, and thought to pray of thee
permission
to go up with thee.
The entreaty of the boy to accompany him in his
proposed
adventure, at once opened the eyes of Vasco Nunez
to the full extent of the wild undertaking which he had
contemplated.
What! he said, thou hast heard then that mad
resolution
.
I were a boy, Pedro, like thyself, of little wit,
were I to go on this adventure or suffer thee to do so. The
impatient, yearning spirit got the better of the sober reason;
and, perchance, hadst thou not come to awaken my wiser
thoughts, I had in truth, set forth on a journey over ways
unknown, perchance thickly spread with abysses and
cavernous descents, the wild tiger at my head and the
brown serpent with his deadly venom at my foot. Now
that thou cravest the adventure, I see all its danger. We
had fallen in the dim light among pitfalls to which day
never comesamong dens of savage beasts, and nests of
coiling reptilesand this danger, for no sort of necessity
or use, since the dawn of another day will bring with it the
triumph and the prospect which we cannot now lose, and
which we should but imperfectly behold at night. It is the
boyish impatience of my blood which would have led me
to a folly such as might be becoming in thee, but would be
inex cusable to one having my experience, and the charge
of all these brave soldiers on my hands. Let us to our
rest, boy, subduing our yearning passions for this long
night as best we may.
At the cool and bracing hour of daybreak, the little army
of Vasco Nunez was in motion. The steeps before their
eyes which the chief, in the heated mood of his spirit,
would have undertaken without guide or companion in the
past night, frowned rudely and discouragingly upon them;
and the toil, for men already so much wayworn, promised
to be neither light in burden nor limited in extent. The
gloomy forests which, in the starlight of the previous
evening seemed small, if not softened, now opposed a
continual succession of difficulties to their forward
progress
.
But warmed by the encouraging hopes set before
them in the glowing language of their leader, they
persevered
amid their difficulties, and about ten o'clock in the
day, they emerged from the close and difficult forests, and
found themselves upon a level and lofty region of the
mountain. Here the guides pointed out an eminence
beyond
them, from which they declared the Great Sea to be
visible. Upon this, in the language of the historian,
Vasco Nunez commanded his followers to halt, and that
no man should stir from his place. Then, with a
palpitating
heart, he ascended above the bare mountain top.
On reaching the summit, the long desired prospect burst
upon his view. It was as if a new world were unfolded
to him, separated from all hitherto known by this mighty
barrier of mountains. Below him extended a vast chaos
of rock and forest, and green savannahs and wandering
streams, while, at a distance, the waters of the promised
ocean glittered in the morning sun.
The heart of Vasco Nunez was in the same instant
lifted and humbled within him. Lifted, as he felt his
triumph, at least secure, and the dream of his soaring
genius
realized at last. Humbled, as he surveyed the mighty
and magnificent maze before his eyesthe tangled and
unbroken forestthe boundless and waveless ocean, given
as it were by an indulgent Providence, in compliance with
the prayers of a mortalone still governed by earthly
desires
,
and those vain and vexing passions which seem so
utterly unbecoming to the heart whose ambition grasps at
the golden honours of immortality.
God! I thank thee! he exclaimed chokingly, as he
sank upon his knees and pressed his lips to the now
consecrated
earth. I thank thee that thou hast honoured me
thus, in giving to my eyes the first look at a realm of wild
and ocean, never before vouchsafed to European.
Merciful
and mighty Father, thou hast favoured and blessed me
with a wondrous favour, and most base and wretched were
my spirit should it henceforward turn away from thy paths
and be traitor to the sacred trusts which thou hast confided
to my care. Here, I pray thee, Father of the heavens
and of the earthof the new oceans and lands, no less
than of those long known to thy working peopleI pray
thee so to strengthen me in thy grace, that I may
faithfully
perform my trusts, and deliver them up without hurt
or blemish, whenever it may please thee to require them
at my hands. Here, alone, in thy presence, with my
people
afar, I pray thy forgiveness for all and sundry the
errors of my thoughts and heart; those errors wherein I
have suffered, nay, counselled them, to follow me, when
perchance, it was my better part, as in duty bound to my
earthly sovereign, to have awaited his messenger in Darien
and forborne this labour of greatest peril but still greater
triumph. Let it be, I pray thee, Father above all, still a
trust given to my hands, to perfect this mighty conquest;
toiling still in that spirit which shall tend the more
perfectly
to thy honour, to the majesty and greatness of my
country, and to the human improvement of the miserable
heathen who runs savage through this land.
Such are some of the sentiments, expressed in more
specific
language, which were preferred to the throne of grace
from that wild mountain peak of Darien. Never was the
true religion of peace and goodwill to men, and humble
allegiance to the only true sovereign, more completely felt,
and more devoutly and earnestly expressed, than by that
single hearted conqueror, in that solemn presence
standing
above the waters of that strange oceanan ocean
whose slumbers the eye of the European had never before
seen, nor his footsteps brokenwhich had striven for ages
with the tempest, or given back unnoted melodies to the
lingering zephyr, without a single murmur of its waves
falling upon the ears of those whose busy prows
penetrated
to all other waters, and whose angry thunders
affrighted the slumbering echoes of every other land.
Having
prayed, Vasco Nunez turned once more to his people
and summoned them to approach him from below.
Behold, my friends, said he, that glorious sight
which we have sought so long, and with such great toil.
Let us give thanks to God, that he hath vouchsafed this
great honour and advantage to us. Let us implore that he
will still guide us in our path of conquestthat he will
give to our arms the sea and land which lie before us, and
in which Christian has never yet set foot to preach the
VOL. II. 10
Evangelist. For yourselves, be you, as you have hitherto
been, faithful and true, and, by Christ's favour, ye shall
become
the most fortunate Spaniards that have yet beheld the
Indiesye shall have the advantage and eternal glory of
all that is here discovered, conquered, and made convert
to the holy Catholic faith.
Solemnly the Spaniards promised to follow their gallant
leader to death. The priest lifted up his voice, the people
knelt as by an unanimous impulse, and with one voice
chanted aloud the usual hymn of Spanish discovery
Te
Deum Laudamus
. A cross, hewn from a gigantic tree,
was raised upon the spot whence the ocean was first
beheld
,
and in the name, and for the promotion, of the holy
religion he professed, Vasco Nunez took possession of the
lands he stood on and the seas which he surveyed, as part
of the dominions of the sovereigns of Castile, to whom he
renewed his oath of allegiance in presence of all his men.
All the usual forms practised by Europeans in making
great and unwonted discoveries, were rigidly performed on
this occasion, by which the authority of Spain was
supposed
to be rendered legitimate in the regard of other nations.
A mound of stone was raised, inscriptions set up against
the venerable trees of the mountain, and a record made of
the solemn event, and signed by all present. This great
discovery took place on the 26th day of September, 1513,
and was the most memorable event that had yet occurred
in the history of the new world. The imagination,
says Irving, with a pencil that appropriately adorns
whatever
it touches, and of the guiding lines of which we have
freely availed ourselves in the progress of this illustrative
romanceThe imagination delights to picture forth the
splendid confusion of their thoughts, as this boundless field
of conjecture opened before the wondering Spaniards.
Was this the great Indian Ocean, studded with precious
islands, abounding in gold, in gems, and spices, and
bordered
by the gorgeous cities and wealthy marts of the East?
or was it some lonely sea, locked up in the embraces of
savage uncultivated continents, and never traversed by a
bark, except the light pirogue of the Indian? Time has
solved this inquiry, but imagination has a wing more fleet
and vigorous, more daring and more upward, which ever
advances before the slow but certain progress of time; and
worlds beyond, and empires of a civilization no less
perfect
,
but unlike that of the European, grew up before the
eyes of the Spaniards who surveyed that glorious ocean,
bordering its tributary waves, and sending abroad their
fleets of wealth, their stores of treasure, gems of a strange
brightness, jewels of unnamed character and richness,
bartering
with rival nations in trade, or striving with them for
supremacy. The no less excursive but better taught vision
of Vasco Nunez, saw much more of the truth, and through
a medium no less glorious and inviting. Alreadythe waters
of that new sea scarce beheldhis daring spirit meditated
to embark upon them. Already the realms of Atabalipa
were unveiling their splendours to his piercing gaze,and
Imagination, the great surveyor and architect of man,
passing
the broad realms of ocean that lay between, and
throwing
open the golden mansions of the sun, had taken her
seat upon the lofty throne of the Incas.
Nations! nations! strange nations, and a wondrous
people; not savagesnot slaves,yet both. How they
pass,how they rise before me. Wings now,wings
now, Francisco,these are all,all that we wantto win
empires more wonderful than all that Colon ever gave to
Castile.
The hand of the conqueror was outstretched, as he spoke,
towards the golden regions of Peru. With gloating eyes
the savage soldier Pizarro, who stood beside him the while,
followed the direction of his finger, and listened to the
enthusiastic
outpourings of a thought, which he remembered
in long days after, both to his glory and his shame.
Yes, continued the chief, speaking to the astrologer,
could we now fly, Micer Codro,could we but follow
the swift thought and the delighted fancy, what wonders
should we winthe spoils of time, locked up in the
solitude
the
wonders of ages, unnoted in the waste. But,
even though it be not given to us to win these worlds, this
ocean is ours. This, at least, is mine. It cannot be
denied
me this crowning glory, and whether I stand or fall,
whether I live or die, whether my enemies overcome me or
I baffle them, the royal Ferdinand himself, misled by the
malice of Fonseca, cannot wrest this possession from my
grasp. The name of Vasco Nunez belongs as firmly to
this mighty rock on which we stand, as the rock to the
mightier sea, that sleeps like a giant at its foot. My heart
is light, my friendsvery light,for the triumph of my
soul is sure! Give me your hands, Micer Codro,
Francisco
,
Colmenaresand you too, boygive me your hand
too, Pedro. Forget you the last night, boy, and your
dreaming folly, and mine? Let that be secret, Pedro.
Men would laugh in mockery did they know what
children
we had been, though for a moment only. Give me
your hands, my friends. We shall all sleep soundly and
happily to-night.
CHAPTER XI.
NEW AUGURIESTHE MALIGN ASPECT.
But
the conqueror did not sleep that night. How could
he sleep? The creature of his sleep,the vision which
had haunted him so long, and kept him wakeful when he
would have sleptthe vague but unvarying hopethe rich
expectancy of fancythe dream, the shadowthe
ambition
of a long lifewere all realized at last. He could
now triumph over the scornful and the hostile. He could
now retort the sneer and despise the assailant; and oh!
who can describe the proud feeling in the heart of him
whose wholesome hope and vast design, have brought
upon him the epithet of the visionary and the dreamer,
when, by the resolute endeavour, and the calm, immovable,
yet active thought, he has made his fancy a form, and
given to the image in his mind the substantial attributes of
a thing in theirs. Much had his proud, yet sensitive heart,
suffered from the unfeeling malice of the vain and
ignorant
.
He had, though not always, borne patiently the
sneer and the sarcasm, in which the witless commonly seek
to revenge themselves upon the great for the consciousness
of inferiority. His plans were not canvassed ere they had
been denounced, and, if canvassed, his judges had been pert
pretension, and flippant, undiscriminating conceit. Even
the worthy had been blinded to his merits, by the
judgments
of the vain; and with the inevitable fortune which
attends true genius every where, he had succeeded rather
against the spite of man, than by his support or
countenance
.
He stood no longer in need of either for the
support
of that judgmentthat geniuswhich had been the
mockery of all. He could forgive, in his crowning triumph,
the hostility which had denounced at first, and baffled his
10*
hope so long. He could forget, as the noble mind for ever
strives to forget, the petty malice, and the witless sneer in the
consciousness that his mind and its aims were no longer
subject to the control of theirsin the proud conviction
that it was now in charge of that highest human court
known to men and nationsposterity.
I have written my deeds upon this rockmy name
must live so long as these waters roll.
How easy for a man with such proud fancies to forget
all the toils, all the trials, the small troubles, though
vexing
,
and the jealous strifes and unfriendly wrongs which
formed so great a portion of all his previous endeavour.
He who is conscious that posterity has his deeds in
keeping
may well smile at his own feeble generationmay well
forgive the little enmities of the vanishing crowds around
him. Vasco Nunez had forgiven all. He was not
conscious
of one feeling in his bosom which did not declare
peace and good will to all mankind. But this benign
consciousness
of soul did not make it the less sleepless.
Virtue
itself may sometimes keep awake in the sweet
consciousness
of a new conquest; and that ambition, which,
struggling for the good of man, is also virtue, kept our
hero wakeful. He went forth, when all slept, or seemed to
sleep, in that solemn stralight. Once more he ascended to
the eminence from which, at midday, the mighty ocean had
first met his eye. There it lay, glimmering in the
imperfect
light, murmuring along among the tracts of reedy
forest upon its margin, and making a fitting midnight
chorus
with the continual voice of the restless wind among the
distant woods. Never had the skies appeared to Vasco
Nunez so bright with stars. No cloud obscured the
prospect
whether upon land or sea; but thin, gray mists, that
seemed transparent as the gleam of infant stars, rose from
the distant mountains, and floating away in spiral wreaths,
hung at last, like a pale white mantle above the ocean,
where, mingling as it were with immensity, it rolled on
far beyond the piercing gaze of the conqueror. There was
an awe-inspiring presence in the massive silence around
him; and the feelings in his soul amply corresponded with
the gentle melancholy of the scene, making it holy. Alone,
standing upon the shores of that new-found sea, vainly
conjecturing
of the thousand empires and nations beyondthen,
with as rapid a flight of thought, winging his way to that
old world from which his human destiny was to comehe
stood as it were in the presence of two worldsof the past
and the futurehis own being reduced to a point, but that
point a pinnacle, surveyed equally from the gigantic sister
seas, now for the first time revealed to the knowledge of
each other. The feeling of his own great eminence,
destined
so soon to be as conspicuous to the world as it was
now to himself, possessed his heart with a sense of awe
and humility, and he was ready to exclaim with something
of the inspiration of the ancient prophetWhat am I,
Lord, that thou hast chosen me for this mighty work
wherein am I worthy of this, thy crowning confidence?
Why hast thou saved me, over all others, for this great
service? Who shall describe his sensations at such a
moment! A change of spiritwhich years never could
have wrought nor the counsels of man, nor the fears of
enemies, nor the quest of wealthsuddenly came over him;
and, from the mere soldier, in the instant of his wonderful
discovery, he became the sage. He was no longer the
creature
he had been, when, in his boyish mood, all things had
been things of promise, and every promise brought with it
delightwhen, amid the throng at evening, his happiest
employment had been to bearken to the sweet
melancholy
of the young maiden's song, or join with her in
the lively dance;or, as the years followed in the
unrelaxing
progress of the hours, which brought him the
strifes of manhoodto seek more fell employments in the
field of battle, ever rashly adventurous, grappling first with
the tawny Moor, then with the forest savage, a kingdom,
in either case, not unfrequently depending on his arm.
The light-hearted and the ruthless mood, so foreign to
each other, yet so nearly allied to the sanguine and
sleepless
temper, had all departed from the warrior in the
realization
of his great conquest; and in their stead came a
higher thought to his mind, a holier hope to his bosom,
which made him happy even with the sleeplessness which
they occasion. His adventurous spirit felt its own wing at
last, and knew its strength, and was prepared to soar into
the heavens. Eagle-like, brooding upon the verge of that
skiey pinnacle, he meditated with the first blush of
morning
,
to dart into the voidto descend into the region of
conjecture and farther conquestto launch upon the strange
waters, gleaming and flashing in the dim distance at his
feet, and wing his flight,he knew not whitherbut
surely to empires which the sun, lingering last upon, must
love the longest, and endow with the richest treasures of
his smiles. The waking dreams of Vasco Nunez were not
yet over, and with thoughts and feelings, beneath the awful
majesty of which, his frame trembled, he sat down upon
the peak of the mountain, and drew unmeaning strokes
with his sword-point upon the ground. Micer Codro came
to his side unheard, while he was busied in this
employment
.
The hero became conscious of his presence only
with the sound of his voice.
Thou here, my father? said he, to the old manbut
I should have known it was not for thee to sleep at this hour
any more than myself. Thou hast too deep a feeling with
me of the wondrous fortune which has crowned our
enterprise
,
not to grow watchful in its contemplation. Strange
and beautiful, indeed, is the scene before us,so strange
that, ere thou camest, I had begun to question its reality,
and to persuade myself with fear and trembling that I was
deluded by a vision of sleep. Yet, thou art beside me;I
hear thy voice, I see thy formand there, below us, afar
if it be not a delusion of water, such as wins and vexes
the wayfarer in the desert of the Arab,there lies a mighty
ocean,glimmering clearly beneath the starlight, and
sending
up a voice which seemeth to reach me here. Of a truth,
Micer Codro, my soul is oppressed with its own
convictions
there
is a pain that thrills my heart, in the very joy
of my spirit.
It is thineit is thy triumph, my sonand glorious
indeed shall be the renown of thy name in this and all
succeeding
ages. Thou hast wrought even beyond my own
faith in theethou hast won thy forune in despite of thy
enemies, and even against the fears of thy friends. I am
proud to look on thee, my son, and to think of thy past
strifes and sufferings!
Jesu! but they should now be over. Micer Codro, it
would scarce be in the power of Fonseca to harm me now.
Spain would cry aloud against the wrongEurope herself
would speak with a single voiceand the whole world of
Christian man would upbraid, if Ferdinand suffered the
malice of a priest, or the hatred of a rival, to do harm to
the warrior who hath yielded him a new empire of the sea
and land, henceforward to be the care of Christ, and of his
missionaries on earth. Methinks, I should now dismiss
the doubts which have vexed me in this matter.
The astrologer answered with a sigh:
So should it be, Vasco Nunez, and such might be the
confident hope in our hearts, were it not that we know the
blindness of royal favourites, and the madness of royalty,
which so often wounds itself through the bosom of its most
deserving subjects. There is danger to thee, my sonI
read it this very hour in the starsthere is danger to thee,
though it may not come from thy sovereign.
The cavalier smiled as he replied in gentle language:
Vex not, Micer Codro, if my faith in the stars hath
found some diminution. It is strange to me that thou art
still so firm in thy confidence. Should not my fortune, as
as it hath already gone against thy frequent predictions
should it not teach thee to doubt also?
Sometimes I have doubted, my son, replied the other
with humility. There have been signs which seemed to
contradict themselves, and the doings of men on earth and
their fortunes have been at seasons far other than they have
seemed to me in the heavens
As in the wreck of the Maragnon,as in my weary
bondage in the cave of the iron mountains, hidden from the
pursuit of Obando, and threatened with death for a crime of
which I was no less innocent than the unborn babe,
replied
the other, interrupting the speaker.
Yet never, perhaps, my son, spoke the stars more truly
than at those moments.
Ha! but thou speakest strangely.
Nay, let us reason upon their language, and thou wilt
find that the misjudgment lay in our minds, and not in
their voices. They said that the day of thy glory and thy
greatness was approachingit was our weak imaginings
that declared the means of thy greatness to lie in the ship
that the seas swallowed. They promised thee the triumph
upon which thy soul was set, and which thy mind so nobly
counselled. But they said not that thou wert not to have
sorrows, and strifes, and many losses. They declared thy
approaching glory, but they said not that it should be this
day or the next; and that they have spoken truly, thou
seest, since here thou art, on the desired eminence, with
the mighty ocean before thee, in search of which thou hast
toiled so long. It was in our narrow judgment that we
found defeat of fortune, in the loss of the little goods which
man too much regards as fortune. What mattered it to
thee hadst thou lost ten thousand ships, yet still attained the
triumph for which thy ships were built, thy stores bought,
thy soldiers and mariners provided? Here, in truth, has
thy fortune been made ready to thy hands. Hadst thou
been left to thyself, had the Maragnon still survived the
hurricane, perchance, at this very hour, instead of standing
where thou dost, with thy great conquest at thy feet, thou
hadst been striving at dagger-point with the wrong-headed
Alonzo de Ojeda, or the vain but courtly Nicuesa. The
stars have driven them from thy path, fighting in thy behalf
and against them, even as they fought against Sisera, and
in behalf of God's chosen. Thou hast been God's chosen
in this great work. I have seen the golden writing from
the first, written with his eternal finger, where I now see
it, on the eternal walls of Heaven. Look up, my son.
Verily, there is that which deeply affects thee in those sad
but lovely characters which glitter overhead.
What dost thou see? demanded Vasco Nunez,
looking
up as he was bidden, and not unimpressed by the
reasoning
which he had heard, and the solemn manner of the
speaker. The other paused for a brief space, and when
he again spoke, his voice had grown very tremulous with
its increasing solemnity.
My son, he continued, when we last were at
Moguer
,
thou wilt remember how fondly thy old mother
sought of me to know thy fortunes. Thou wert already
known to fame, and she delighted to speak of thee in the
language of all around her. Full of the great successes,
which her heart, governed only by its hopes, assured her
should be thine, she prayed that from my art I should
confirm her fond predictions. This I could do safely; and
satisfied that thou wouldst grow even more famous than
her own warmest fancies had promised, she pressed me
nothing farther. I told her not of the evils, the sorrows,
and the dangers, which were before thee. It had been of
little use and most unkind to do so; but even then, I
beheld a sign which led me to tremble for thy safety, and
moved me to long and painful study of thy scheme of
nativity
.
On thy voyage out, when thy course was shaped
to Salvatierra, I traced thy fortunes more closely, and
gathered, amidst many conflicting mazes and doubts,
much of the truth as thou hast since found it. Every step
which thou hast since taken, whether in peace or war,
whether in court or camp, in peril or in ease, grew visible,
if not clear, before mine eyes. I saw thee trace thy
journey
through the wilderness, though it was beyond my art
to speak of means and appliances, and those minor agents
of fortune, which help men to the consummation of their
ends. But the ends I saw, in thy final, full success, up to
this very moment, when the incessant waters at our feet
are given to thy sway, and murmur with a voice for the
first time audible to Europe, the glory of Vasco Nunez de
Balboa; giving thee the praise of that genius, whose
piercing
eye sees the hidden ore in the rock, the fine spirit in the
cloud, the pure, pale blue jewel in the deep. Here then,
are we both now, and thy fortune, even as it has been
read nightly by these aged eyes, is all confirmed in this
thy wondrous conquest.
And now, now! What dost thou read now?
exclaimed
the warrior impatiently. Let me know all, Micer
Codro. If I hold not thy art so certain as thyself, I do
yet esteem it. Let me hear then what thou hast to show
me. Fear not to speakspeak boldlyand think not
that thy words shall make my heart shake or my knees
tremble. There is no fate nowthis securewhich I
cannot battle with a smile, and with a spirit long
accustomed
to the conflict with wild seas and wilder men. Give
thy thought words, old man, and let the future stand before
me, though it wear only frowns upon its face and carry
nothing but a threatening terror in its hands.
The reply of the magician was prompt in compliance
with the demand.
When I read thy fate in the gathered stars, there was
one hostile aspectone remote and solitary lightwhich
gleamed ever upon thy planet with a malignant eye. Of
this I have ever warned thee, though I read, that, while it
kept station after from the western heavens, it had no
power of harm upon thee. But when, with daring flight
it made its way to the gray circle, from which evening
suspends
the golden lamp that hangs above the chambers of
night, then the hour should become dark to thee with a
bloody perilnay, death itself was before thee with an
awful sign of the axe and scaffold.
Ha! sayst thou!the axe! the scaffold! Well.
The axe and scaffold. Once, twice, already, have I
seen this malign planet posting on with hostile spirit to the
western mansion. Once, the night when Garabito fell by
strange hands, did I see it shake a hand of bloody augury
above thy breastthe sign of a dagger in its grasp. Thy
fortune triumphed and the baleful aspect fied back to its
foreign station. There it has hung, threatening, but
motionless
until the day when thou met'st with Quarequa. In
the morning watch of the night before that battle, it rushed,
speeding onward to the west, and my soul trembled when
I saw it glaring upon thy star with all the malevolence of
hate, exulting in the hope that the hour of his blow had
come. The fight was won, and again was the evil eye
baffledand again, though for a brief space only, did it
recede
from thy path. It threatens thee once moreit is even
now within the rim of that halo which circles the star of
thy nativity; and though thy better fortune may once more
baffle its hostile rage, as it has baffled it already, it still
threatens thee with a danger which should task all thy
calm strength, and thy thoughtful, deliberate courage.
Let me look upon that hostile aspect, said Vasco
Nunez. I have never shrunk from the face of mortal
enemy, and shall gaze with spirit unawed upon this
inhuman
one. Guide mine eyes, Micer Codro, to this evil
planet.
Look forth into the west, said the astrologer, while,
with his finger, he strove to direct the eye of the cavalier
to the region, where, mingled with myriads of shining
dots, hung the small red orb that teemed with such
malignant
fires. Dost thou not see one light, keeping a place
as it were apart from all others, though immediately among
them? It seems single, as it gleams with hues which the
pure orbs of heaven never partake. Thou wilt know it
from the redness of its rays, and the subtle yellow fluid
that seems to environ it like a halo. Such it ever wears
when it seems most nigh to the destruction of its victim.
I see it, said Vasco Nunez, but I have no instinct
that tells me it is fearful. I look on it without
apprehension
.
I see nothing to warn me of an enemy. Surely,
Micer Codro, this is but a common star, one of the
thousand
,
all seemingly alike, which crowd together, as if
seeking communion when the night is dark.
It is more, yet less, than a star, my son. To thy
eye and that of most men, it may seem no other. But it
is no less than an evil spirit. Thousands float nightly
through the firmament, shining in places, not fixed, but
moving according to their hostile moods; sometimes
gliding upwards, audaciously, even into the highest
mansions
;
sometimes descending to rest upon pinnacles of
earth, misguiding the wayfaring mortal whom they hate,
till he falls among evil places, and miserably dies. Such
is this that thou lookest on now. They are not of the
class in the midst of which they yet shinetheir lights
are unlike those among which they burn, nor have they
the same blessed and benign influence over the things of
earth, as it is appointed that such shall always have which
God hath made stationary in man's behalf. Yet hold
they a power scarcely less great, though for evil only, over
earthly things, over man and the creatures that follow and
obey him. Being ever at war with God, they seek for the
annoyance of his creaturesimpede their fortunes, or
encourage
them awhile, as this may have done with theeso
that when they hurl them down to the abyss at last, they
may fall from a height most perilous. The gentler lights
of heavenly providence, shrink from them as from a most
foul contagion, so that they stand separate from all the rest.
Over some a power is given themwe know not
wherefore
,but
we behold them, almost nightly, flung from their
high spheres by these malignant spirits; their pure lights
parting from them as they fall; losing themselves at last in
abysses of the deep, more fitting to their diminished lustre
than the pale brightness of the mansions they have lost.
In like manner, a power over men have these evil aspects,
as they, like the erring stars, shoot out from their destined
places. Over thee, my son, this malignant spirit now hangs
with a threatening brow, and hath marked thee for its
victim
.
Jesu be thy friend, my son, and keep thee still, as he
has kept thee ever, secure from the fearful presence.
Amen! exclaimed Vasco Nunez, rising from the
spot, and speaking with a manner which, though solemn,
was any thing but apprehensive. I have heard thee,
Micer Codro, and believe that there may be truth in what
thou hast said. But thou tell'st me of nothing worse than
deatha bloody deathand that I have confronted boldly
with the Moor of Grenada, and with the more tawny and
savage Carib of the west. It is no new terror which thou
VOL. II. 11
portrayest to my thought; and death is nothing, surely, to
him who has taken bond from fate, for a life which is
eternal
,
sealed on these impenetrable rocks, and witnessed by
yonder unfathomable and rising waters. Still, he
continued
,
after a brief pause, I confess to thee, Micer
Codro, though I fear not death, I yet love life. I would
not dienot yetnot, at least, till I have launched my
bark on yonder ocean, and sought the wondrous shores
which my prophetic spirit assures me lie beyond it.
To-morrow
will I descend to those waters, and assure myself
by feeling, no less than sight, that they are realthat they
live and movehave breath and being, and, with each rising
and sinking of their billows, lave far-distant and rival
continents
.
That done, what matters it whether death
approaches
me in the gentle guise of slumber, or with the
harsh visage and sharp stroke of the royal headsman?
Death must needs be welcome when the great work of life
is done.
CHAPTER XII.
LIGHTS AND SHADOWSTHE MINGLED DRAUGHT.
With
the dawn of day, Vasco Nunez prepared to
descend
the mountains, and accordingly divided his little
band into three several bodies for the discovery of the
easier routes to the sea. The whole country lay in the
tangled intricacy of the original forest, undefiled by the
axe, and totally uncleared for the footsteps of the wayfarer.
The task was still no easy one to reach the ocean, which
lay yet in sight. But these difficulties were soon
surmounted
by the enthusiasm of the chief and the buoyant
spirits and hardy frames of his followers. The marvellous
discovery was held to be complete when Vasco Nunez,
marching waist-deep into the waves of the ocean, claimed
its possession and dominion in behalf of the sovereigns of
Castile, Leon, and Arragon, Don Ferdinand and Donna
Juanna. It is not our present design to trace his farther
progress among the wild lands and wilder nations of
savages, which he deemed it necessary to overrun and
subdue, in order to the better confirmation of his
conquests
.
These events belong rather to historyto the
history of the times, and of the Spanish nation,than to
the great man by whom the expedition was led; and in
what we have written, our object has not been so much
the illustration of known events, as of the peculiar
fortunes
of the person by whom they were achieved. It
will be sufficient for our purpose to state in brief that
Vasco Nunez returned to Coyba, sick but in safety;
having survived a thousand disasters, having baffled as
many dangersovercoming all the savage tribes which
opposed him, and winning golden spoils at every step in
his progress. Here he found the simple devoted Indian
damsel awaiting him with an anxiety fitly proportioned to
the extent of her fears at the perils he had undertaken, and
in which, greatly against her desire, his tender regard would
not suffer her to share. Her love, subdued by the superior
awe which she felt in the presence of his greatness, would
not permit her to return the fond embrace which he gave
her, but she sunk down at his feet and clasped his knees
in her arms, and kissed, sobbing all the while, the warlike
hand of which she had possessed herself. Having rested
for a few days at Coyba, he re-embarked for Santa Maria,
and reached the river of Darien on the following day.
Great was the delight of the inhabitants at his returna
delight not a little increased when they beheld the
profusion
of wealth which he brought, and which they were
allowed to share equally with the adventurers whose valour
had procured it. It consisted of gold and pearls, mantles,
hammocks, and many varieties of wrought cotton, chiefly
intended for garments, and many captives of both sexes,
with whom the conqueror contemplated the prosecution of
certain plans of colonization which were to disarm them,
by means of appropriate labour, of their more rude, savage,
and, not uncommonly, cannibal propensities. A fifth of the
spoil was set apart for the royal treasury, and the rest
shared equally among the adventurers.
Thus, says the historian, ended an expedition which
may be considered one of the most remarkable ever
undertaken by the early discoverers. With a handful of
men, its hero had penetrated far into a wild and
mountainous
country, filled by tribes, all numerous and warlike, and
tenacious to the last of their savage independence. His
skill in their constant defeat, no less than in the
management
of his own followersstimulating their valour when
it flagged under fatigues and privations that seemed to
justify
discontent; soothing or compelling their obedience,
when suffering moved them to insubordination; and still,
under all circumstances, attaching their affections to
himself
as their friend and fellow, no less than their
commander
;amply
attested the surpassing merits of his
generalship
.
Add to this, that his personal courage and
resolution were no less conspicuous at all moments. For
ever first in danger, he was still the last to leave the field.
He shrank from no toil, avoided no difficulty, feared no
perilwatching, fighting, fasting, and labouring, equally
with the meanest of his men, he secured a place in their
affections no less firm than that which he held in their
esteem
.
Frank affability, the invariable companion of true
greatness in every character, marked his deportment to all
around him, without disparaging his dignity or impairing
in any respect the energy of his resolves. He forgot no
follower whom he had ever known, but consoled him in
misfortune, visited him in sickness, and soothed him by
gifts and friendly offices, which win the heart more than
any gifts. Nor, though in battle, realizing all the terrors
of the warlike mood as described by Shakspeare, can the
sin of unnecessary bloodshed be laid at his door, if we
consider the character of the age in which he lived, the
peculiar barbarism of many of the foes with whom he
fought, and the perils of his condition, which seemed to
call for and to justify it. That the savages themselves
acquitted
him of the stain of cruelty, may be fairly presumed
from the singular and unbounded confidence which they
reposed in him, by the firmness of their friendship, and
the affectionate homage which they offered him, once
known to them, wherever he came. Nor is he to be
considered
the merely skilful and successful soldier of fortune.
Justly considered, there was a nobleness in his aim, a
grandeur in his geniusin his persevering pursuit of the
one great objectin its first conception, and in the elastic
resolution which never suffered him to waver in moments
when all other men had been lost.
When Vasco Nunez surveyed the piles of treasure
which had been set aside from his spoils for the royal
coffers, he flattered himself that whatever might have been
the previous judgment of the avaricious monarch against
him, his decision would be altered at a sight of such
unusual
magnificence, and at tidings of so much greater
importance
which he was prepared to send him.
Have I not, said he, speaking to the astrologer on
this subject, have I not give a new ocean to his crown?
Cristovallo Colon gave new lands only!and how
many tributary shores and empires lie within that gift? I
have outspread the Spanish flag to the embraces of a foreign
breeze, that comes, blossoming in its odour, from gardens
of the orientspicy realms, that give token of their being,
though a thousand leagues of sea yet lie between us and
11*
their sight. It cannot be, Micer Codro, when they hear
of these tidings in Spain, that Ferdinand shall mete out
harsh judgment against me. It were against reason to
believe
it. No! no! I have nothing now to fear.
That day he prepared his despatches, in which he gave
a full detail of his expeditionsetting forth all that he had
seen or heard of the great southern sea, and of the rich
countries that lay upon its borders. In addition to the
royal fifth, he prepared from his own share a present for
his sovereign, consisting of the most precious pearls which
had been collected. These he sent by Pedro de Arbolancha,
an intelligent follower and tried friend; and having thus, as
he thought, presented to his monarch a claim to his
favouring
consideration, which could not be set aside, he resolved
to dismiss from his mind all anxiety about the event. The
emissary, after a delay protracted to a length most injurious
to the fortunes of his superior, appeared at length in the
royal presence, and announcing the successes of Vasco
Nunez, laid before him the rich treasures which he had
brought, the gold and the pearls, which attested alike the
value and the truth of his discoveries. King Ferdinand,
says the historian, listened with charmed attention to this
tale of unknown seas and wealthy realms added to his
empire
.
It filled, in fact, the imaginations of the most sage
and learned with golden dreams, and anticipations of
unbounded
riches. Old Peter Martyr, who received letters
from his friends in Darien, and communicated by word of
mouth with those who came from thence, writes to Leo X.
in exulting terms of this event. Spain, says he, will
hereafter be able to satisfy with pearls the greedy appetite
of such as in wanton pleasures are like unto Cleopatra and
sopus; so that henceforth we shall neither envy nor
reverence the nice fruitfulness of Trapoban or the Red Sea.
The Spaniards will not need hereafter to mine and dig far
into the earth, nor to cut asunder mountains in quest of
gold, but will find it plentifully, in a manner, on the upper
crust of the earth, or in the sands of rivers dried up by the
heats of summer. Certainly, the reverend antiquity
obtained
not so great a benefit of nature, nor even aspired to
the knowledge thereof, since never man before, from the
known world, penetrated to those unknown regions. All
Spain rang with the name and glory of Vasco Nunez, and
he, who but a few months before had been adjudged a
lawless
adventurer, was now lifted to the same eminence with
Columbus, and lauded as his most worthy successor.
Ferdinand repented of his hasty judgment, and
commanded
Fonseca to find a mode for rewarding his transcendant
services; but while these honours were preparing for him
in Europe, Don Pedrarias Davila, whom, at the instigation
of Fonseca, the king had appointed governor of Darien,
was speeding far and fast over the ocean, and rapidly
nearing
the province which had been thus prematurely assigned
him. With a fleet of fifteen sail, and a splendid and
well-equipped
army, consisting chiefly of the accomplished and
graceful young cavaliers of Spain, the new governor, who
was a man of a proud, ostentatious temper, contemplated the
overthrow at once of every thing like opposition on the
part of the hardy warrior he was sent to supersede. He
was accompanied by his wife, a noble lady, who would
not be left behind in Spain, and who was probably moved
to the journey by the contiguousness of her daughter
Teresa, whom the reader will remember to have left at
San Domingo, and whom she had not seen for years. It
may be that Pedrarias was presented to the mind of Fonseca
as governor of Darien, as well because of his connexion
with the new world, as because of the partial favour in
which he was regarded at the court.
Meanwhile, equally unconscious of the honours
preparing
for him in Spain, and of the approach of that
armament
which had been commissioned to consign him to
punishment or obscurity, Vasco Nunez, throwing aside
the habits of the soldier, devoted himself, with paternal
solicitude, to the cultivation and improvement of Darien.
Already, under his master-mind, the town contained more
than two hundred houses, with a population of five
hundred
Europeans and fifteen hundred Indians. Orehards
and gardens had been laid out and filled with fruits and
vegetables, native and European. One leading object of
the chief was to render the settlement independent of
Europe
for supplies. Spaniards and Indians worked equally
in the fields and upon the dwellings, and the toils of the
labourer were relieved by the sports of the cavalier and
soldier. He devised various means to enliven the
tediousness
of a life, no longer passed in exciting and hourly
adventure
.
The national pastimes were accorded them on
frequent holidays; and tilting-matches, of which the valiant
Spaniards of those days were extravagantly fond, were
studiously encouraged. A general communion was opened
with most of the Indian neighbours, and so successful had
he been in securing the friendship of the savages, that the
roving Spaniard was no longer solicitous of his weapons
when he wandered away into the forests. Zemaco, baffled,
beaten, and dispirited, had buried his shame in the sullen
fastnesses of his distant mountains.
Vasco Nunez was thus employed when, in the month of
June, the fleet of Don Pedrarias Davila appeared in the
Gulf of Uraba. The heart of the conqueror swelled within
him, at the sight of this armament, with conflicting
emotions
.
Was it the messenger of reward or punishment?
Was this powerful array sent in compliance with his
entreaties
,
or in opposition to his rule? He was not suffered
to remain long in doubt and anxiety. The Spanish
cavaliers
who came with Davila were eager to land and see the
wonders of the place, but the governor, who had been
warned of the resolute character of Vasco Nunez, and
could readily understand the difference between his own
silken followers, and the `iron men' who had followed
the fortunes, and shared in all the miseries which had
befallen
Ojeda, Nicuesa, and Vasco Nunez, was cautious
enough to restrain their desires, and instead of
approaching
,
in compliance with their clamours, he anchored his
fleet at some distance from the settlement. He then
despatched
a messenger to announce to Vasco Nunez his
arrival and authority. At the first intimation of the truth,
his friends gathered about the chief, and the veteran
warriors
who had followed him so long, seizing their weapons,
surrounded his dwelling, and swore to maintain his cause
in defiance of any numbers. They prayed him to resist
the summons of Pedrarias, and, in their clamours against
the injustice which he suffered, did not spare their
sovereign
.
Their officers goaded them by their exhortations,
and Francisco Pizarro was the first to propose that they
should display themselves at once, and resist the landing
of the enemy. The astrologer looked on with a moody
silence
,
while the youth, Pedro, grasping suddenly the hand
of the chief, while his eyes flashed fire, and his cheeks
were kindled up with enthusiasm, exclaimed
Oh, seor, you will not surely give up to this insolent
demand? You will resist,you will send back defiance;
and there is not a man in Darien that will not maintain
your battle. Shall it be that you have taken these toils and
perils, only to reward the idle creatures of the court? It
must not be. It were shame and sorrow to think so.
Nay, Pedro, you mistake, replied Vasco NunezI
have not taken this toil and peril for others. They may
take from me the government of Darien, but know, boy,
that no injusticeno tyranny can take from a man the
reputation
of his great deeds. These are mine, that Pedrarias
cannot takethese are mine, that I cannot lose, though I
lose all other possessions.
But a strange struggle took place in the warrior's
feelings
as he approached the veterans who surrounded his
dwelling, and strove to compose himself while he spoke to
them. Their arms sank down as he stood forwardtheir
clamours were suddenly stilled; as suddenly as the cries
of inferior forest tribes, when the lion, rising from his lair,
suddenly walks forth from the jungle. Vasco Nunez had
already come to his resolution, but there was a strong
human
impulse which he found it difficult to subdue, and
which still continued to war against it. He did not the less
feel the injustice for which his followers, with less
discretion
,
would have had him become a rebel to his sovereign,
though he had determined patiently to submit to it, leaving
it to time, that calm reviser of man's judgment and injustice,
to do him right, though it might be after the delay of many
days. There is a majesty in patience which is superior to
the greatest display of passion; and Vasco Nunez lost
nothing of his dignity, in the regards of his people, when
he declared his intention to submit to the authority set
over him.
Go back, he said to the messenger of Pedrarias, who
stood trembling at his side, the witness of a fury on the
part of the enraged soldiery, which, at one moment,
threatened
to destroy himgo back to Don Pedrarias Davila
tell him that Vasco Nunez, for himself and his
followers
,
assures him of their welcome and his own. Say that
I congratulate him on his safe arrival at Darien, and am
ready, with all here, to obey his orders.
A deep groan burst from the crowd as they heard this
message.
Wherefore doth this resolve displease ye, my friends?
demanded Vasco Nunez, while the big drop gathered in
his eye, as he beheld it in the eyes of many around him.
Is it so uncommon a thing for the soldier to suffer
injustice
from the sovereign he has served, that ye should
behold
my wrong beyond all others, and hold it so very
grievous
?
Let it not be thus, I pray ye. King Ferdinand hath
surely right to choose his own governor and the governor
of his people, and neither ye nor I should complain of this.
In submitting to Pedrarias, you submit only to our
sovereign
;
and the love I have borne ye, and the toils through
which I have led ye in safety and good fortune, give us
no right to defy the authority of our king, and him whom
he sends to command in his place. Let it be our prayer
that he shall command ye, as it has been my desire to do,
to the prosperity and the glory of all. So shall ye always
triumph, in all times and in every country. Be not angry
with me, my friends, in the moment when the tie is
severed
that hath bound us so long together. It may be that,
when the royal Ferdinand shall hear of our doings, and
shall know the truth, he will again suffer me to lead you
to other no less wondrous discoveries that crowd upon
my thought even now. Freely do I give ye up to
another
,
but not with joy. My heart is even more sad than
yours.
It is done! were the words of Vasco Nunez, as he
retired to his apartments, secluded from all but the devoted
Indian damsel, who watched with trembling emotion, but
without speech, the varying shadows of his countenance.
His eye was suddenly fixed upon her anxious features, and
a keen, painful memory of Teresa Davila, forced itself upon
his mind.
Truly, he murmured, there may be something of
truth in those words of Micer Codro, and the evil genius
of Vasco Nunez may yet prove a woman. Should this
haughty knight, Pedrarias, of whose pride they speak such
things, look on me with ill favour, it were fuel to his wrath
to know that I have striven for his daughter. Careta! he
exclaimed, after a brief interval, come hither! I had
forgotten
thy lessons in the troubles of other things. My heart
feels weary and sadit will turn me from heavy thoughts
to give ear to thy childish prattle.
My lord is sadlet him not give himself care of the
poor girl of Darien. Let him lie down in the hammock,
and she will put the fever balm upon his forehead, and
sing him a song of Coyba, which shall make him sleep.
Sleep! sleep! would I could sleep for a while; but
no! I must go forth and meet this man who bears with
him my destiny. Careta, my child, should any harm
happen to me in Darien, thou shalt make thy way back to
thy father in Coyba. The old man, Micer Codro, whom
thou seest with me so often, will help thee to a means of
flight.
Harm to theeharm to my lord! exclaimed the
damsel in language more broken than usual from the
rapidity
of her present utterance, what means my lord, by
harm?
Should my enemies make me captive and send me to
Spain, Careta.
I will go with my lordyes! yes! Careta will go
with my lord wherever they send him.
Should they hate meshould they kill
Ah, no! no! no! they will notthey cannot. My
lord has strong warriorshe numbered them at sunset
they were many. They will do battle for my lord.
But, should mine enemies prevail, Caretashould
they put chains on my hands and put me into the
dungeon
Careta will hold up the heavy chains, and sing to my
lord in the dungeon.
But if they doom him, Caretaif he dies.
Careta will die too.
Truly, there is mercy even in the wrath of God, and
sweetness amid all the bitter of evil. Wherefore should I
be cast down because of the loss of this earthly power,
when I have a power over men's heartswhen not even
the decree of a monarch can take from me the affections of
these wild warriors, and the love of this simple savage.
Come to me, Careta!he stooped and pressed his lips
upon her forehead,I trust we shall escape both the
prison and the death. I trust to live so long as thou shalt
love me.
Her eyes brightened up as she threw herself into his
arms, exclaiming
I will love my lord for ever and ever.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE CONQUEROR IN CHAINSTRUTH OF ENEMIESTREACHERY OF
FRIENDS.
The
veterans of Vasco Nunez, the old soldiers of
Darien
,
hardened, in the language of Peter Martyr, to abide
all sorrows, looked on the approach and splendid array of
Don Pedrarias with faces which did not conceal their
vexation
.
But whatever may have been the emotions of the
conqueror, they were all suppressed, and he met his
successor
with profound reverence, without the least show of
disappointment or disquiet, and promised him implicit
obedience. His habitation, thatched with straw, was given
up to his guests, and a banquet of the simple fruits and
vegetables which the country produced was spread before
them. The modesty of his carriage surprised Don
Pedrarias
,
who looked for nothing less than violent resistance
and brutal hate, from a man who had been represented by
his enemies in Spain as an outlaw and desperado; and a
long conference which the two had together, seemed
calculated
to produce a more respectful and better feeling of
regard in the minds of each for his opponent. But the
frank and confiding nature of Vasco Nunez was ill
requited
by his successor, who began the conference by a
falsehood. He assured the conqueror, that he was
instructed
by the king to treat him with all favour and
distinction, to consult him on all measures concerning the
colony, and seek from him, in preference to all others, the
desired information relative to the surrounding country.
Suspecting no guile, the conqueror threw aside all that
reserve which had been the natural result of his position
and of the injustice done him, revealed all that he knew,
and at the expressed desire of Pedrarias, put in writing
not only the circumstances of the colony, its resources,
strength, alliances and wants, but his own conjectures of
the neighbouring provinces, seas, and rivers, and the
detailed
plans which he had formed for exploring and
possessing
them. Among the particulars given, he described
the route by which he had traversed the mountains; the
discoveries made upon the coast of the south sea and the
gulf; the situation and reported wealth of the island from
which had been taken those rich pearls which had dazzled
and charmed the eyes of the Spanish monarch, the rivers
and ravines most productive of gold, and the names,
disposition
and strength of the numerous cassiques with whom
he had formed intimacies or treaties. Having, after
repeated
examinations, in all of which he preserved the
most friendly countenance, beguiled from the unsuspecting
warrior all that he deemed necessary to the prosecution
of his conquest, the perfidious Pedrarias dropped the mask,
and to the astonishment and indignation of all, proclaimed
a judicial scrutiny into his conduct. Seor Vasco, he
said, giving a signal to his guards at the same moment,
you have done well and have served worthily, if your
own statements were only and altogether to be relied upon.
But know you that there are serious offences of tyranny
and abuse of power charged against you, for which you
are held to answer. Meanwhile, I must see that you be
kept in security. Juan de Ayora, do your duty.
Though wounded too keenly by this conduct not to
speak his indignation, the proud spirit of the conqueror did
not utter aught that might have tended to soften the severity
of his enemy. With a natural burst of indignation,
starting
to his feet as he beheld the officer approaching, he
exclaimed:
And wherefore, Don Pedrarias, have you spoken
smoothly with me until now? Why, if you held me traitor
to my sovereign, have you foreborne his justice until this
moment? Know, seor, if it was for the poor knowledge
which I possessed, for which you have so far forgotten the
dignity of truth, I could have spared you this degradation,
and the unworthy toil of deception. Were the block before
me, and the sword uplifted, I had declared this knowledge
which you deem needful to the interest of my sovereign,
unmoved by the injustice of his minister, as freely as I
declared it but a moment gone.
VOL. II. 12
Away with him, and see that he be kept safely, till
the alcalde mayor shall decide upon his cause, was the
angry command of Pedrarias, who gave no other heed to
the bitter speech of his victim.
So! exclaimed the secretary as he beheld his
employer
hurried away to prisonthe stroke falls at last,
and by another hand than mine. I could have slain him
many timesby day, by nightat night when he would
have climbed alone the high mountain looking on the sea;
and when, the mountain gained, he went forth at midnight
to fill himself with the sight of his conquests. Little did
he thinkhe and the old astrologerthat a foe stood
watching
behind them, with a sharpened dagger, of whom the stars
said nothing. Why then did I forbear to strike? His
armour
was thrown asidethe iron escaupil no longer
covered his defenceless body; and one bound, and one
blow, would have sealed his conquests in blooday, and
spared him this degradation. Why did I stay the blow?
why did I spare the victim I had sworn to slay? In truth,
my oath has been too easily forgotten. I heard his sweet
deep voice,I hearkened to his proud, and eagle-lifted
thoughtsand my cheeks crimsoned with a scalding heat
I could not strike the heart that seemed so little human
in its greatness. It matters nothing now. The doom
which Micer Codro read for him in the stars, awaits him
the headsman and the scaffold. I read it in the eyes of
this new governor, whose cunning alone equals his
vindictive
malice. Well! it is a blow spared me and a peril.
He takes the labour from my hand, and the blow is no less
certain. And yet!would he had not slain my brother!
the elder bornhe whom my young heart yearned so to
follow through the world. He has made me desolate
wherefore should I grieve that he is destined to the
ignominious
death?
Pedroboy!
The harsh tones of Pizarro's voice reached the ears of
the youth. He turned, and the other stood beside him.
Hitherto, the unwitting wound which had been given to
his vanity by the unconscious secretary, had rankled in his
bosom, leaving its traces in his features visible enough
whenever they had encounteredbut now the lips were
smilingthe features soothed into hypocritical sweetness,
and the eyes full of kindness, as the desperate soldier
addressed
him.
Well, Pedro,these are rare doings. The Seor
Vasco stands in peril of a sudden dismissal to Saint Peter;
and you are in office no longer. These bright, shining
cavaliers from Spain put us old soldiers of Darien out of
countenance. Think you that they will wear their colours
so gayly in the face of the wild warriors of Zemaco? I
trow not. What think you?
The boy, wondering at the unusual condescension of one
who had never been careful to conceal his hostility before,
was not less disgusted at the levity with which he spoke
of the probable fortunes of the chief who had ever
bestowed
upon the speaker a large share of his confidence and
kindness.
This man, he thought to himself, is no less base
than malignant. Even I, the sworn enemy of Vasco
Nunez
,
feel no triumph and no joy at his doomstill less can
I feel indifference. And he, who has found but friendship
and favour from his captain, speaks without feeling of his
wrong, when his sword should be among the first to leap
from the scabbard to avenge it.
To these thoughts, however, he gave no expression.
Concealing his disgust as he best could, he replied
evasively
,
affecting a dulness on the subject of his patron's
position
,
which Pizarro well knew did not comport with the
usual intelligence and aptness of the youth.
Hark ye, boythere's some business for you which
may give you better pay than the secretaryship, which you
may look upon as an office lost for ever. I can help you
to favour in the sight of Don Pedrariasnay, get you the
place in his employ which you but lately held with Seor
Vasco; but there is service to be done for this. Pedrarias
is not the person to bestow his favour without
consideration
.
Come, what say you?
Will the Seor Francisco speak out what he would
have?
Ay, that I will, Pedro, when I once know how you stand.
I trust you are not one of those fools who let idle feelings
of regard for a falling man prevent them from making
favour
with him who hurls him down. We soldiers were
poor knaves indeed, to follow fortunes which no longer
keep the sun. It is your policy now to look to Pedrarias.
If your eyes seek the Seor Vasco, lo!they rest upon
a gloomy prison.
That is true, Seor Francisco, replied the youth, but
can it be that you have thus soon found the sunny side of
Don Pedrarias?
Ha! would you dive, boy! replied the other with a
laugh, though colouring the moment after;let that
give you no concern. Enough, that I can help you to his
favour whether I myself enjoy it or not. Are you willing
to be in the sunlight, Pedro?
It is the soldier's policy, Seor Francisco, as thou
sayest, and there is wisdom in it. I see not how it can
do me harm, or Seor Vasco harm, to have the smiles of his
enemy.
Hum! there may be some doubt about that, Pedro,
butwhat need to beat about the bush? What I unfold to
thee, boy, must be secret. Do I have thy promise?
After a moment's hesitation the boy gave it.
Nay, that is not enough, said the other, thou shalt
swear upon the holy cross, presenting the hilt of his
dagger
as he spokeand on the same cross I swear to thee,
Pedro, shouldst thou betray what I now reveal to thee,
thou shalt taste three inches of its blade in the choicest
places of thy bosom. Thou knowest meI am not the
man to fall from my oath.
Nor I one to depart from mine. I will keep secret
what thou tell'st me, replied the boy, with a calm dignity
which surprised the rough soldier, and reminded him of
his former captain.
By the holy shrine of Santa Maria, Pedro, but thou
hast dwelt so long in the presence of the Seor Vasco,
thou hast caught some little of his favour in thy
countenance
.
But come with me asidethere be too many
loungers in the Plaza to-day.
The youth followed the soldier, until, reaching a clump
of woods which lay on the edge of the town and secured
them from sight, the latter began his revelations.
Thou knowest, said he, or should know, that the
Seor Vasco is shut up on charges which go to affect his
life. Pedrarias holds him guilty of usurpation, tyrannical
abuse of power, and disaffection to the sovereigns of
Castile
.
The licentiate, Gaspar de Espinosa, has it in
commission
,
as alcalde mayor, to convict him of these things
and he will do so if he can prove them. Now, when I
tell thee it is the wish of Don Pedrarias that such proof
should be found, thou wilt guess what I would have of
thee.
The soldier paused, but the youth would not comprehend
the unexplicit suggestion, and he was forced to resume.
Thou art less apt than I thought thee, Pedro. Know
then, that it is looked to thee to establish many, if not most,
of these facts against him.
Me! exclaimed Pedro, with an astonishment which
was quite as unmeasured as it was unaffected.
Ayyou! replied the other coolly. What's the
wonder in that?
But, Seor Francisco, how can I establish facts of
which I know nothing?
Pshaw, boy, thou art fighting against good fortune and
common sense. Thou knowest enough to prove all these
matters. Thou canst prove that Vasco Nunez instigated
the colony against the Bachelor Enciso and the Seor
Diego. It will go near making the Seor Vasco
answerable
for his death if this be shown.
But these things happened, Seor Francisco, long ere
I came to Darien. If these charges be true, there are
many soldiers in Darien who will be better able to speak
from their own knowledge.
Ay, aythou art keen as a notary, Pedro; but
thou shouldst know that these old soldiers of Darien
are the last persons in the world to say what shall harm
Vasco Nunez.
But thou thyself art one of them.
Yes, replied the other, but there are reasons good
why I should not appear in this business. The Seor
Vasco has been my friend.
And mine! repeated the youth gloomily.
Ay, Pedro, but thou holdest no such place in the
regards
of men as I. It would lose thee no esteem among
the old soldiers of Darien to speak what thou knowest of
Vasco Nunezit would take from me, whom they follow,
all respect and consideration.
And what I know of the Seor Vasco, if spoken so
loudly that the royal Ferdinand himself should hear, would
do him far less hurt than honour.
Dull, foolish boy! exclaimed the other passionately.
12*
Dost thou think I ask of thee to speak only what thou
knowest?
And what else should I speak, Seor Francisco?
That which will prove these charges of Don Pedrarias,
which will convict him of treason to his sovereign,
tyranny to the subject, wrong to his better, fraud,
peculation
,
and a thousand other offences, the least of which will
bring him to the block.
And Pedrarias is resolved on this? inquired the
youth in accents of increasing gravity, as he listened to
this bold avowal of villany.
Ay, fixed as the hills of Darien.
The youth was silenta crowd of thoughts were
struggling
in his mind, and one rose pre-eminent over all the
rest. Truly, thought he, fate delivers my victim
unto me. But a few moments past, and it was my
reproach
that I had suffered my vengeance to be taken by
another. This desire of Pedrarias puts the dagger into
mine own hands. My lips may yet declare his doom. A
fierce but brief struggle followed in the mind of the boy,
but the noble spirit triumphed. No! he said inly
let this cold-hearted, malignant, base-minded and brutal
soldier, stab by a lieI will not. If they have thus
resolved
to destroy Vasco Nunez, it will be easy for them to
find many in Darien to swear falsely against him. But,
though he never perish, I will not join with these.
Seor Francisco, he said aloud, I am not the
person
you think me. I cannot do you this service. I have
eaten of the bread of Vasco Nunez, and have hearkened
to his confidence. I am not the man to betray it.
Hark ye, boy, speak not too quickly. Be counselled.
You have none to shield you now in Darien from the anger
of Don Pedrariasnay, humble though he be, from the
hate of Francisco Pizarro. Vasco Nunez can serve you
no longeryou have nothing now to hope at his hands.
Wherefore should you refuse this service to Don Pedrarias,
seeing that it helps you to fortune and protection, both of
which you need. Take a wiser thought to your mind, and
speak as I counsel you.
Never, Seor Francisconever! I will not speak
falsely even of mine enemy.
You are not resolved on this?there is yet time,
Pedro. Bethink you. Don Pedrarias will at once take
you into his service.
I thank him, Seor Francisco, and thank you; but my
resolve is already spoken.
The keen, fierce, fiery eyes of the soldier were fixed
steadily upon those of the youth, but they turned away
baffled after a protracted stare, in which hostility and
inquiry
were mingled equally. They saw no fear, no
faltering
,
no uncertainty in the glance of the boy. Hoarsely he
spoke after this brief examination was over, and while he
turned from him in angry disappointment
You are resolute on ruin. Beware! He shook the
unsheathed dagger as he went, and the last word which
came to the ears of the boy was, Beware!
A burst of uncontrollable anguish issued from the lips of
Pedro, when the other had retired, and showed the
humiliating
and chafing feeling ever present in his soul, and
the prompter of many of his wayward moods.
Why, oh! why, he exclaimed, are my limbs
feeble? Why, with a spirit proud and impatient as is
mine, are my arms sinewless, and the muscles more soft
and yielding than the woman's? Could I wield sword or
dagger with hope, would this brute soldier have dared
assail
mine ears with his base offer and his threatening
insolence
?
Would it were!But no!let me not, by vain
regrets, proclaim the weakness of my soul to be no less
great than that of my body. I must bear with these
shames as I may. How much greater are those of this
great man, whom I must hold an enemy, but whom I
cannot
hate:taken in the toils when his discovery had
insured
him honours, and betrayed by his most trusted
followers
at a moment when even the sworn foe of his life
feels sorrow at his misfortunes. Would it were that I
could wish that he might live!
CHAPTER XIV.
THE HEART SICK WITH HOPE DEFERREDTHE EAGLE PINES IN
HIS PRISON.
But
Vasco Nunez was not altogether deserted by his
friends, in the gloom of his evil and overshadowing
fortunes
.
With the first intelligence of his situation, the
faithful
astrologer sought, but was denied, access to his dungeon.
The harsh mandate of Pedrarias had consigned him to utter
solitude, no less than imprisonment. Indignation filled the
soul of the venerable old man, but reflection as to the
modes of redress and relief only taught him his own
helplessness
.
There was but a single resort left him, and that
lay in an appeal to Quevedo, the chief church dignitary in
Santa Maria, who had been sent from Spain as Bishop of
Darien. Some conferences had taken place between them
already, and a sort of intimacy established, which led the
astrologer to hope for some favour at his hands, and that
he might move the interference of the prelate in behalf of
his friend. Nor was his hope unfounded. His eloquent
yet unvarnished narrative of the great deeds of Vasco
Nunez
,
his perspicuous array of the noble virtues of his mind,
and the great courage and hardy energies of his body,
awakened the admiration of the bishop, and aroused all his
sympathies. He took the matter in hand, went instantly
to the petty tyrant, who had already shown so much
hypocrisy
and injustice in his brief career of authority, and
demanded
,
as a right, those indulgences for the prisoner,
which could not be withheld, without wanton cruelty, from
even the convicted felon, and which placed on the same
level with him, one who, according to his showing, was not
only not likely to be unconvicted, but actually deserving
the highest rewards in the gift of the Spanish monarch.
Beware what you do in this business, Don Pedrarias,
said the bishop, continuing his exhortation, if this which
I tell you be true, you cannot wrong this gentleman, or
wrong him with impunity. You cannot keep him in
bondsyou must liberate him,nay, moreit may
become
needful that you should do him honour.
The governor was troubled by what he heard, but his
pride would not suffer him to make such a concession. He
made that one, however, which was demanded of him, and
granted permission that the friends of Vasco Nunez should
visit him in his confinement. The good prelate did not
stop here. He carried his friendly offices still farther, and
having considerable influence over the Licentiate Espinosa,
to whom, as alcalde mayor, the investigation was confided,
the examination of the case was commenced in a manner
most auspicious to the hero. The judge went largely into
the subject, reviewed all his discoveries, and put on record
a true representation of the nature and extent of his great
services. The good bishop was delighted at the
confirmation
of his statement, and declared his exultation to the
governor, to whom the facts brought nothing but vexation
and alarm.
This examination, said he, proves hourly more and
more favourable to the Seor Vasco. Truly, it is my wonder
that mortal man could have done so much, under the most
favouring circumstances; and he hath done it against the
most adverse. You will do well, Don Pedrarias, to
discharge
the Seor Vasco from custody, for, I tell you, this
investigation will lift him beyond reach in the admiration
of the king, who will regard with corresponding ill-favour,
the man who hath treated him so hardly.
Never! exclaimed Pedrarias, almost furious with rage
Thou art deceived in this man, Quevedo. He is a base,
black-hearted, malignant traitor, whom I will confound.
Thou hast heard but half the storybut one side of it.
Thine eyes shall be opened ere many days, when thou wilt
regard him as I doas one deserving of the axe, which he
shall surely feel.
Don Pedrarias, replied the bishop, mildly, but with
solemnitythou speakest in the language of passion and
hate, rather than of justice. Be warned; all this I will be
required to repeat of thee in Spain, if wrong be done to
this brave man.
The warning, though it prompted the governor to more
reserve in his anger, did not lead to any abatement of it.
Alarmed at the course which the inquiry was taking,
and fearing, as the prelate assured him, that, when made
known in Spain, it would only redound to the elevation
and honour of the man he had resolved to ruin, he
stimulated
with increased earnestness that dishonourable course
of conduct, of which a sample has been given, in the brief
interview recorded between Pizarro and the secretary.
Through the means of this and other agents, he suborned
certain base followers of Ojeda and Nicuesa to give
testimony
against their late commander, of the kind required.
But this testimony failed entirely, being triumphantly
answered
and rebutted by the unsolicited evidence of a
hundred
others. The dishonest testimony was spurned by the
alcalde and the bishop, and the active course pursued by
the governor, in his interference with the designs of justice,
brought down upon him the rebuke of the bishop and the
solemn protest of the alcalde. They acquitted Vasco
Nunez
of all the crimes which had been laid to his charge.
The fury of Pedrarias at this acquittal knew no bounds.
Haughty and insolent by nature and education, and
pre-resolved
against the noble gentleman whom he succeeded,
the opposition of the court which tried the prisoner to the
evident will and wish of his oppressor, aroused all his
anger
,
which did not keep within bounds even in the presence
of the reverend prelate.
You have decided that this man is innocent, when I
have shown you by good proofs that he is guilty. Think
you I will confirm your decision? No! I will keep the
beggar, where he should be, in chains, until the brigantine
sails for Spain, when I will send him thither to receive the
reward of his crimes.
Do so, and you destroy yourself, Pedrarias, replied
the bishop, mildly;send him to Spain, you send him
to triumphput chains on his limbs, and Ferdinand
himself
takes them off, and may put them on the limbs of him
who dared to do so monstrous an offence, no less to
greatness
than to humanity. The clamour of the nation, once
possessed of the facts which may be given-them by the
licentiate, or myself, or an hundred others, will compel the
king, if he would have it otherwise himself, to restore
Vasco Nunez to the government of Darien, and give him
higher honours than you could possibly deprive him of.
Do thus madly if thou wilt, and thou committest a suicide
of thy own sway, and destroyest thyself for ever.
The angry governor was startled by this new aspect of
the matter, which he could not deny was a reasonable one;
and an unlooked-for ally came to the assistance of the
Bishop in his prosecution of the claims of the hero. This
was no less a person than Doa Isabel, the wife of
Pedrarias
and mother of the capricious coquette of Santo
Domingo
,
the lovely but heartless Seora Teresa. Doa
Isabel, who had received from the Bishop a true version
of the deeds of Vasco Nunez, and had listened with more
faith and charity than her lord, felt nothing but respect
and sympathy for the discoverer. She joined her prayers
and pleadings to those of the Bishop, and, though
unsuccessful
in effecting his release, her interposition had some
effect in mitigating the probable severities of the governor.
Unwilling to set him free, and equally afraid of the
consequences
of punishing him or sending him to Spain, in
opposition
to the decree of the court which had acquitted him,
the perplexities of Pedrarias ended in leaving him where he
wasin prisonuntil other events forced upon him a
different
policy, in which it will be difficult to say whether the
good or evil star of the conqueror prevailed.
Meanwhile, however, secure in what had already been
obtained from fortune, the soul of Vasco Nunez remained
serene, and though sad, it may be, at the denial and
restraint
put upon its energies, it was at least as untroubled
by fear as it was utterly unconscious of any guilt, such as
had been charged against him. When the result of the
trial, and the resolution of Pedrarias, by which he sought
to baffle its acquittal, were made known to him by the
astrologer, the communication scarcely awakened any
emotion
none
at least, was visible.
The malignant sign is in the ascendant, Micer Codro.
he answered with a smilethen, with features instantly
changing to an expression of intense gravity, he concluded
by asking for Careta.
She only awaits my permission to come to thee.
How! thou hast not refused her, Micer Codro?
No!I have but restrained her. Thou knowest we
were all refused by Pedrarias, and but for Quevedo we had
not had permission now. But for him, indeed, thou hadst
been condemned. The alcalde is a youth of feeble spirit
and vain temper, and fickle as the wind. He had gone
against thee but for the authority of the bishop.
Ay, ay! it matters notbut wherefore keep Careta
from me? Thou knowest, Micer Codro, that she hath
none to help her in Darien but Vasco Nunez; and the
poor Indian would find but small kindness from Pedrarias
and the brawling cavaliers about him, if they but knew how
close is the tie which I hold with her.
It was this thought which moved me to restrain her.
Wouldst thou have had her go to Pedrarias for permission
to share with thee thy prison as thy wife? however
wanting the decree of the church, still, my son, in the
eyes of God and of thy own heartthy wife.
Now God forbid that she should declare this thing to
Pedrarias, was the devout exclamation of the cavalier.
The astrologer misunderstood the character of the
exclamation
and the fear from which it arose.
Ay, he had spurned her with his foot, said the old
man. But, at that moment, the only thought of Vasco
Nunez, by a strange and mysterious will of his nature,
that rose in utter defiance of the dictates of his reason, was
of Teresa Davila. It was from Pedrarias, as the father of
the proud beauty, and not as the tyrannical governor of
Darien, that he would have withheld the knowledge of his
commerce with the Indian damsel; and, if this secret could
not be kept, at least, the avoidance of any obtrusion of it
upon his notice.
She followed thee to the prison door when she first
heard of thy arrest, but Ayora drove her from the entrance.
She would have gone thence to Pedrarias but that I stayed
her on the way. Truly, my son, she hath been as one of
the most wretched among the wretched, until I bade her
await my return this morning, and then I would bring her
to thy dungeon.
Poor Careta! It were an evil hour for thee, that which
beholds me on the scaffold. Micer Codro hast thou seen
aught of the boy Pedro?
Little. He hath been wandering among the hills. He
loves not the crowdthese gay flaunting cavaliers from
Spain have their sports and tilts daily, yet the boy looks
not on them. He is ever in the solitude of the rocks and
forests.
He is another who would lose were I to perish. And
thou too, Micer Codro
Speak no more of sorrows, my son, replied the old
man, thy heart grows sad with their contemplation, and
thou should'st hope, as thy friends strive always, for the
better days of fortune. In thy death I should feel my own
as desirable if not nigh. In thy loss I lose the chosen
object
of my old and lonely affectionsthe one companion
to whom my heart has clung, only, for many years. Then
should the doom be a welcome one, shadowed out by the
living stars, many years agone; and mine eyes should turn
down the path whence the grim spectre of death should
come, with a painful solicitude that he might come
quickly
and bring me to the final place of rest.
Thou hast seen thy own death in the stars, Micer
Codro?
Ay, my son, as clearly written as if the hand was
even now upon the wall beside thee. Many times have I
beheld the scene which mine eyes are to survey ere they
close upon the things of earth for ever. A green and
lovely islet shall yield me rest in my dying moment. The
sea shall roll around me with a falling chime and a murmur
that shall soothe me into the sacred slumber, even as the
low song of the mother calms the feverish mood of the
infant. Under the shade of the palm-tree will my form
repose, and the wing of a bird shall pass before mine eyes,
wheeling around me at a great distance in the heavens. It
is my fancy, my son, that thou, and the image of this noble
bird, shall be the same; for now do I know, that thou
shalt go before me into the dim world of gigantic
shadows
.
Ha! thou
knowest
this then? exclaimed the hero,
in tones softened almost to a whisper, while his hand
rested gently upon the arm of the astrologer.
Ay, Vascoit is writtenI know that thou wilt die
many days before me.
The astrologer was conscious only of an increasing
pressure of the fingers which rested on his wrist, but the
subject of this destiny neither started nor betrayed emotion.
VOL. II. 13
His eyes were fixed with a calm attention upon the white
venerable beard of the astrologer, and the natural thought
in his mind was one of wonder that a man of his great age
should speak with so much confidence of surviving a
youth and vigour such as he felt alike in soul and person.
It may be as thou sayest, my father. Indeed, my
present position would seem to confirm thy prediction. He
has little security for life from hour to hour, under the
sway of one who is as little moved by justice as by fear
and affection. But
he
is always secure against the sting of
tyranny who is above the fear of death. Enoughmy
father, wilt thou suffer this poor girl to come to me now?
My heart chides me with her apprehensionsmy own
troubles have led me to give but little heed to hers; and,
by the Blessed Mother, the girl hath but too much need of
care, she a Pagan, among those who treat a Christian as if
he were one. She were better at Coyba, and, with the first
show of a better fortune, thither shall she go. Micer
Codro, I would see thee at evening. There are thoughts
working in my mind of mighty import, and of these I
would speak to thee. If Pedrarias suffers me to live, he
cannot long keep me in bondage. He will need me ere
long. He is no commander for this people, and he brings
none who can hope to be successful. My deliverance is
sure from this dungeon ere very long, whether my chains
be removed by the friend or the executioner; and if by the
friend, then will it be less easy for Pedrarias to keep me
from conquest than to keep me from freedom. Of this,
to-night. It is a marvel Pedro seeks me not:the young
love not ill fortune:yet, suffer Careta to come to me.
She is trueay, and innocent, and should not be
forbidden
.
The tumult of joy with which the poor Indian girl
bounded into the presence of the conqueror touched his
heart to the centre.
My poor Careta, how they have made thee suffer.
Hast thou feared for me? Didst thou think they had
taken me from thee for ever? What didst thou fear?
The inquiry of the conqueror brought her back to all her
terrors and griefs.
Oh, my lord, she exclaimed, looking around her, as
if she dreaded the presence of an enemy at every turn,
they will not do thee harm now. The wise man, who
looks by night from the hill-top at the starshe loves thee
toohe says they will do thee no more harm. He tells
me, they will bid thee go out of the dungeon very soon.
And then, my lord
She paused, and again looked around her with an air of
apprehensive caution. Her words, spoken in whispers,
were renewed:
And then, my lord, we will steal away by night time,
and go to Coyba. We will hide where the Spaniards do
not come. There are hollows among the hills at Coyba,
and high places, where the water tumbles. There the
woods are thick. The tangled briar is around itthe wild
grape is knotted every where among the small shrub trees,
and the soldier cannot see between the leaves of the
thicket
,
and thou wilt lie in the shade, and pluck the blue sweet
berries that cluster over thy head. When they come to
seek thee in anger, thou shalt hide in those places, and I
will bring thee cassava, and the oily nuts, and tell thee
when thy people are gone. Oh, my lord, it will be a sweet
place when we are there, for thou wilt be safe, and the
poor Careta will be with thee to watch thee all the while,
and to be happy in thy love.
The plan of the Indian girl, expressed in her imperfect
Spanish, at once touched the heart and amused the mind
of Vasco Nunez.
I think thou lov'st me, Careta.
Oh, do I not, my lorddo I not? Oh, I was so
foolish
,
like some idle bird that had nothing to do, but to sing
in foolish song, until I loved thee; and nowand now,
my lord, it is so sweet even to weep, and I care not to sing
now any more; and my heart is happy only when I can
think of my lord, and be sorry when he is sorry, and
be ready to die when the bad men are angry against him.
But when they set thee free, we will not fear the bad men.
We will fly from them to Coyba, and my people shall be
thy people, and they will serve thee better than thy own.
Fondly the chief caressed her, while he replied, in
mournful language:
Nay, Careta, thou shalt fly to Coyba, and I will come
thither to see thee at seasons. But I must not leave my
people for thine. I must live with the Spaniard, even
though he hates and may seek to destroy me.
Ah! replied the girl, with a tender reproachfulness
of voice and manner,did not Careta leave her people
for the people of my lord? Careta loves my lord more
than all the people of Coyba. She will not leave him.
When my lord would send away the poor Indian girl that
loves him, let him bid the soldier smite her with the sharp
sword. It will be then good for her to die.
Thou shalt stay with me to the last! was the reply.
Victim or conqueror, chained or free, thou shalt stay
with me, Careta, while it shall please thee to do so. Thou,
at least, art true. If thou art so willing to die for me, it will
be the kinder fate to suffer thee to die with me.
But we will not diethou wilt not die;the old man
who looks upon the stars,he tells me thou shalt very
soon be free.
Death is freedom! was the reflection at that moment
of the gloomy chief, but he suffered it not to be heard from
his lips. The hopefulness of heart which the astrologer
had encouraged in the simple Indian, seemed to make her
so happy, that Vasco Nunez felt that it would be cruel
to impair the impressions which she had received on
this subject: and his words were uttered to strengthen
her hope, though, wearied by his own mental excitements,
and that restraint which is the most humiliating of all
influences
to the restless and impetuous nature, and made
somewhat
gloomy by the predictions of the astrologer to
himself
,
he had little faith in any of his own promises. Still,
she lacked the art of seeing into his. Her own heart, like
the rivulet that runs along the wayside, revealed all its
depths at a single glance to every eyewas it strange that
she should be satisfied with the surface of all other hearts?
We smile at the guileless and unsuspecting nature, and yet
it has always the best chance of happiness, since the
enduring
jealousies of a distrusting heart are always a greater
evil, than the disappointment and sorrow springing up in
the betrayed one. Sorrow may be subdued by time, and
circumstances may soften even grief into sweetness; but
distrust hardens with years, and the heart becomes a mass
of petrifaction, ere the body falls into that corruption which
the melting tendernesses of the affections could alone make
endurable to life. With the inconsiderateness of a child,
the Indian girl forgot all fears for him, and all her own
griefs, not to say all concern of the future, while she hung
upon his neck in the dungeon. Vasco Nunez was not
insensible to her caresses; but though he looked fondly in
her face, and spoke in a tone of mournful sweetness to her
ears, yet his eyes watched, with an inevitable constancy,
the iron bars of the windows; and his ears detected, for
ever more mingling with the accents of her love, the heavy
tread of the soldier in the court of the prison, and the
occasional
ring of his arquebus on the rocky earth. The eagle
may not heed the scream of his mate, as she proclaims her
freedom among the hills without, while he is vainly
dashing
his wings against the bars of his cage.
13*
CHAPTER XV.
THE FREED EAGLEHOFES REVIVED AND BAFFLED.
One
of the predictions of Vasco Nunez was soon verified.
The colony soon found occasion for his services. In the
absence of his genius its fortunes sunk, its enterprises
miscarried
,
and a pestilence which fell upon the people during
the oppressive heats of summer, contributed to fill the
measure
of its misfortunes to the brim. Pedrarias lacked
nearly all the necessary qualities for a great commander.
Though treating the conqueror with such severity, he yet
availed himself of many of the plans which his wily
hypocrisy
had extracted at his first coming from the simple and
unsuspecting confidence of the other; but he adopted them
only to mar them; and many of them were left
unattempted
through the pressure of calamities which contributed
among other apparent evils to humble in some little degree
the vain insolence and pride of heart, which made the
governor
so utterly regardless of truth and justice. The
malaria
of Darien prevailing in the heat of summer, carried off,
in the brief period of one month, no less than seven
hundred
of the gay and youthful cavaliers that composed his
armymany of them fled to Cuba and Spain; and
Pedrarias
,himself
sick, and thus desertedwas reduced to the
humbling necessityafter vainly attempting to lead his
troops in his own person in several expeditions which
proved fruitlessto release Vasco Nunez from his chains,
and yield those enterprises to his hands which had suffered
nothing but miscarriage in the hands of others. His
generals
had traversed the country explored by Vasco Nunez,
and in the wantonness of their power had practised a
thousand
excesses, which soon converted all the friendships
which he had formed with the natives into bitterness and
hate. Their wives and daughters were seized upon, and
subjected to the most brutal abuses, while their prisoners
of every sex and age were equally subjected to the most
cruel tortures in order that they might reveal the secret
places of their fancied or reported treasures. Among these
victims were many of those Indians whom the humane
policy of Vasco Nunez had altered from savage foes into
faithful allies; but who now, goaded to desperation, rose
in unanimous warfare on every hand, and baffled at every
point the ruthless invaders whom they did not always fail
to destroy. The old scarred soldiers of Darien now spoke
out with boldness on the subject of the wrongs of their
late commander. They pointed to the invariable defeat
of all those who had followed him over the ground on
which he had been as invariably successful. Their
reproaches
and sarcasms had probably much more effect
upon the irritable Pedrarias than even the necessities of
his condition; and he resolved to employ the man who
was so much the idol of the people, in such a manner as
should do more to lessen his popularity than to ensure the
success of his services. A perilous expeditionone which,
tried before, had already more than once resulted in the
defeat of the Spanish arms,was proposed to the
discoverer
,
who was only too happy to obtain his release
from a prison in which his soul sickened, to make any
serious objection to the terms. The rich mines of
Dobayda
the
golden temple of that Indian provincehad
long been a subject of fruitful anticipation among the
Spanish
cavaliers, and the discovery had been once attempted
by Vasco Nunez himself without success. The enterprise
was invested in the imagination of the time with more than
ordinary dangers. The savages who held the country
were as adroit as valiantwell practised in the arts of
stratagem, and fought quite as well on water as on land.
Their country was particularly favourable to their
ambuscades
and various modes of warfare. It was intersected
with bays and rivers, dreary fens and morasses, which
were also infested by every species of reptile. The
vampire
bat lurked around the soldier while he sleptthe
cayman
plunged through the water, and assailed man and
horse with equal audacity; clouds of gnats and musquitoes
were ever on the wing, and every where; while, rendered
obtuse to their attacks and invulnerable by custom, the
savage
lurked in the same abodes with these natural enemies of
the European, forming ambuscades with his fleet canoes at
the mouths of lagunes and rivers, from whence he launched
the sudden death on the flinty tongue of his venomed
arrow
.
Nor, as if these terrors were not enough for the
discouragement of all ordinary adventure, did fable
withhold
its marvels and monsters. The dragon and the harpy
were also the supposed tenants of Dobayda, and the
guardians
of those golden treasures in search of which Spanish
cupidity and courage proved in the end more than equal to
all the perils involved in the adventure.
Vasco Nunez only smiled when his friends strove to
dissuade
him from the command, which, it was well
understood
,
had been proposed to him by Pedrarias rather in hate
than affection. He was too anxious to escape from the
pining solitude of his prison, and the cankering cares of
inactivity
,
to regard the presence of dangers to which he had
been long familiar; and with the natural confidence of true
genius, he was too well assured of his own powers to
apprehend
other than the most favourable results to an
enterprise
of which he had the entire conduct. But, it was his
misfortune not to have the entire conduct of the adventure.
The jealous Pedrarias, when he discovered the readiness
of Vasco Nunez to undertake the enterprise, associated
with him in the command one Louis Carillo, a creature of
his own, who, in addition to his utter want of character,
laboured under an equal deficiency of ability, and served
only, as doubtless Pedrarias calculated, to embarrass the
purposes, and finally defeat the exterprise of his associate.
When this after-resolve of the governor was made known
to Vasco Nunez, his ardour was chilled, and but that he
had passed his word, he would freely have withdrawn
from the command. His honour, however, was now
concerned
in the successful prosecution of the enterprise, and
he resolved to go through it with his accustomed
cheerfulness
and spirit. But before departing he had a conference
with the youth Pedro of whom he had seen but little while
in his dungeon.
Thou hast almost fled me, Pedrothou lovest not the
air of a prison. Thou art wise, but thou shouldst not
desert thy friends.
I do not, seorit may be that I have served thee
without
better than if I had sought thee within.
Perhaps soit is not unlikely. It had been of little
help to thee or me in the eye of Pedrarias, to have made
thyself familiar in my prison. I doubt not thy friendship,
Pedro, and would try it farther. Wilt thou be faithful?
If it be with me, seor, thou wilt find me in the
moment
of death the nearest to thy side.
Enoughhear me. I have but little hope from this
expedition now. This Carillo is a fooland no less vain
than foolish. His presumption already moves him to
confound
my commands, and this presumption, natural enough
to the man, is strengthened and increased by a knowledge
which he has of the treasured hostility of Pedrarias to my
fame and fortunes. He will probably defeat the enterprise.
Against this I would be prepared. I would be free from
Pedrarias. Here then is goldit is the small remains of
my spoil on the Southern Sea. Thou shalt take this to
Cuba and procure for me a brigantine, well armed, and
with seventy resolute men. With these I will leave
Darien for the South Sea, and explore the country beyond
it without fear of this petty tyrant.
I will do it, Seor Vasco, replied the youth.
It was surely unwise, said the astrologer, after the
other had departed, to give so great a trust to one so
young.
Alas! Micer Codro, replied the conqueror, thou
speakest as if Vasco Nunez had his choice of warriors
among a thousand. The youth is young indeed, but he is
thoughtfulhe is feeble but he is bold; and far better is it
to trust the thoughtful boy than the thoughtless graybeard,
and more sure is the strength of the heart than the strength
of the body. The small dog pulls down to the earth the
heavy bull, and the little bird with a fearless heart speeds
with an arrow's swiftness upon the big but trembling fowl
that wanders near the dwelling of his young. This boy
hath a generous spirit and a good mind. Even were it
otherwise, as I have told thee, there had been none but
thou
I had gone for thee, son Vasco.
No, no, Micer Codroit is not fitting at thy years
that thou shouldst toil for youth, in such labours as should
only fall to the lot of youth. I had thought of Francisco
Pizarro; but I have remarked that he hath been frequently
in command under Pedrarias, and his eye looks not into
mine when we speak together. He hath ever been true to
me I think, yet I like not this. He too hath, I fear, but
little love for friends in a dungeon.
He is a brave, bad man, said the astrologer, who
hath no such nature as thine, and will only be thy friend
when it helps his fortune to be so. Still, he had done
better than the boy.
Nay, I know not that, replied the other as if willing
to dismiss the subject. I have faith in that youth, and it
needs not valour nor strength to buy brigantine and hire
soldiers. He will do well I doubt not.
The enterprise of Vasco Nunez failed; he reached the
province and river of Dobayda, but was not destined to
win the golden temple. His small fleet of canoes was
surrounded by thousands of savages in vessels of the same
description, which they were taught to manage with more
skill than the Spaniards. The fight was long and bloody.
The savages fought with a degree of desperation as singular
as it was successful. They assailed the invaders with lances
and arrows, which were sent with a force which impelled
them through buckler, escaupil and body, and only failed
against such Spaniards as had the good fortune to wear
mail coats. While one swarm of warriors carried on the
combat with these weapons, others plunged boldly into
the river, grappling the canoes of the enemy with their
hands, and dragging them beneath the water; stabbing with
their short spears the struggling Spaniards who vainly
strove at the same moment against their implacable
opponents
and their own weighty armour. One half of the
Spaniards were slain; among them Carillo, to whose
rashness
the surprise was wholly due. Vasco Nunez, himself
wounded, succeeded in beating off the enemy and retreated
safely to Darien, amidst horrors and privations, which fully
confirmed the worst features of the dreadful tales which
they had heard of this fearful region. Pedrarias and his
partisans exulted in a result which they had alike desired,
and taunted the friends of the hero with his defeat. But
they had their sufficient answer, when they mentioned the
name of Carillo, to whose blind insolence, the surviving
soldiers of the expedition ascribed its unfortunate
termination
.
Vasco Nunez himself was silent amid all these
discussions
.
His spirit seemed depressed and cowed in the
consciousness of evil fortune, and, with hourly increasing
reverence, he nightly looked with Micer Codro at the
aspect of that evil planet which still hung with threatening
augury within the horizon of his own. The expectation
of the vessel from Cuba, and the hope of better tidings from
Spain, alone cheered him up against the oppressions of his
tyrant on earth, and those predictions of evil which seemed
written against his fortune on the dim curtains of heaven.
There was a time when, the summit of his greatness being
won, it seemed to him that death would have been a small
evil; and such was his conviction when he stood upon the
peak of Darien and watched the living waters flowing at
his feet below. His thought now, like that of all great
minds, was, not of what he had done, but of what yet
remained
for him to do. The height was gained, it is true,
but the illusive glory lay beyond it still. Other heights
were to be reachedother seas crossedother nations
overcomeand then, the employments of ambition are yet
to be begun. Weary with watching, sad with many and
conflicting thoughts, he turned from the astrologerhe
turned from the few soldiers, the scarred veterans whose
eyes declared the sympathy which it had been unwise to
speak in more emphatic languagehe turned from all
men, and from all the schemes of men, as fruitful only in
affliction, and yielding no other increase than strife; and
sought his only consolation in the unobtrusive but
watchful
devotion of the Indian damsel. The care which wasted
him was also busy at her heart; and his departure from
her presence, and his return, brought her equal anxiety.
She knew enough of his position in the colony, to be now
aware of his dangers, and when her knowledge failed her,
her apprehension underwent due increase. To the ignorant,
the unknown is always full of dangers, and the ignorance
that loves is always the most timid of creatures.
Oh, my lord, she was always ready to exclaim when
she saw him returnand while her fingers played with his
long, brown hair, which intense thought and many cares
were prematurely sprinkling with grayshall we not go
to Coyba, and hide among the hills? There is danger to
my lord in Darienthere is death here. Will not my lord
fly with the poor Careta, where safety sits in the bushes
among the hillswhere the cruel Spaniard cannot come?
Ay, Careta, there is danger here and deathbut where
are they not? Coyba is not more secure than Darien
thou hast heard my thunder among its hills, and the
Spaniard
will dwell in Coyba as in Darien. There will be no
part of this wild land which can be secure against his
warriors
.
But I would send thee to Coyba, to thy father, my
poor Careta, if this were in my power. If harm comes to
Vasco Nunezif death
No, no, no! no death for my lord.
Bethink thee, my girl,if death comes to me, what
will become of thee? Where wilt thou hide thee? What
wilt thou do? Thou wilt be at the mercy of this tyrant,
who hath but too well shown to me what are the mercies
of the wicked.
A smile faintly overspread the lips of the damsel, as she
gradually comprehended the speech of the conquerorbut
she made no other answer. None other was necessary to
show at that moment the feeling in her soul. The subject
was one which she did not care to examine. It was enough
for her to know that in his death, her own cares of life
would all be extinguished.
CHAPTER XVI.
VICISSITUDES: NIGHT AND DAY STILL COME TOGETHERA STORM
BREWING.
The
failure of Vasco Nunez in his late enterprise,
furnished
an excuse for his non-employment, of which
Pedrarias
readily availed himself; and, though freed, the
unfortunate
hero laboured under the obloquy and discredit which
naturally enough followed the hostility of the ruling powers.
He saw Pizarro and Morales, his own officers, despatched
on enterprises to the shores of that ocean which his
eaglewing
had explored; and he saw them return, baffled and
beaten by the savage tribes whom they provoked by
wanton
indignity and wrong to desperate hostility. In vain did
the good bishop of Darien, who still continued to be
warmly
his friend, labour to change the unaccountable and bitter
hatred of the governor. In vain did he dwell upon the
shame and the dishonour which rested upon him in
consequence
of his injustice. The sole effect of this interference
was to save the hero from those positive indignities, and
that harsher treatment, which the envious spirit of Pedrarias
would not have forborne, but for the prudent fear which the
resolute expostulation and occasional threats of the bishop,
continued to inspire in his mind. Arguments of even more
solid policy, tending to produce a change in his treatment
of the hero, were equally ineffective.
Look, said the bishop, at the condition of the
colony
,
and you will see that this man alone can save it. You
have tried your own and his best officers, and they have
failed in every adventure.
He himself hath failed, said Pedrarias.
Speak not of that, replied the other significantlyit
VOL. II. 14
had been a blessed and wondrous miracle had he done
otherwise with such a wretched creature as Carillo on his
back. But look at the miserable band brought back by
Pizarro from his expedition to the Pearl Islands. Sixty
veteran warriors reduced to sixteen; and this terrible
massacre
of the force led by Becerraone hundred and eighty
menall slain by the poisoned arrow of the Indian, and
but one left to tell the story. The defeat of Ayora by
Tubanama
,
who hath made banners, after his own fashion, of
the bloody garments of the Spaniards he hath slain, should
be to thee sufficient warning of the fate awaiting us, unless
thou restore to command this captain, who, with a force
infinitely smaller than any which the savages have lately
destroyed, traversed the same paths of terror in the same
country, and by arms or artswhich are no less worthy of
the warrior than armsmade friends where thy lieutenants
have found but enemies. And now, what is our condition
in Darien? The savages, grown bold by our constant
defeats
,
beleaguer us in our dwellings. Our people stir not
forth but to see enemies, and rise at midnight to meet the
harassing assault. They see foes in the long grass of the
plains, and countless canoes rise up on every wave of the
ocean. Do as thou wilt, Don Pedrarias, but I hold it my
duty, as in a season of great peril, to cause prayers to be
put up, and proclaim fasts, that the calamities hanging over
the people of God's church, like storm-bringing clouds,
may pass away. Thou wilt be able to say to thy sovereign
whether thou hast taken the best means for the safety of
his people and dominion.
But the heart of Pedrarias hardened within him, and
his neck grew more stiff amidst the misfortunes of the
colony
.
To yield to the solicitations of Quevedo in behalf of
Vasco Nunez, was, in fact, only to admit in brief the
tyranny
and gross injustice of his conduct; and for this the pride
of a small mind was unprepared. But, about this time,
events were in progress which were calculated to effect a
change, either for good or evil, in the fortunes of our hero.
A vessel arrived from Spain, bringing important despatches
to the governor which stung his vanity, mortified his
pride, and filled his soul with new rage and an increased
hatred for the rival he had so unworthily treated. In a letter
from the king, he was instructed to consult Vasco Nunez
on all public affairs. To the latter, a letter was also written,
in which he was constituted governor of the provinces of
Panama and Coyba, with the swelling title of Adelantado
of the Southern Sea. The base Pedrarias withheld the letter
from his rival, and strove to keep the knowledge of its
contents
,
and the purport of his own despatches, from the
public
.
But the seamen who came in the vessel which brought
the tidings, were unrestrained by any such motives as
prevailed
over the honour of the governor, and the important
intelligence soon reached the knowledge of the parties most
interested in it. With a soul burning with honest
indignation
,
the courageous bishop ascended the pulpit, and
denounced
the conduct of the governor as an outrage upon
the sovereign no less than the subject.
This public exposure drove the governor to other
measures
,
and he called a council of his public officers, to
whom, making a merit of necessity, he opened his
despatches
.
The bishop at once demanded that Vasco Nunez
should be invested with the dignities and power which the
king had conferred; but this proposition was resisted by
the alcalde mayor, who had been brought over to the party
of Pedrarias, and who, making a pretext of the late
inquisition
into the conduct of Vasco Nunez, which still remained
unfinished, strenuously insisted that the offices ought in no
wise to be given to one, whose public conduct was still in
some sort the subject of official investigationnot, at least,
until the king had been apprised of the nature and results of
the inquest. The other councillors, who were all creatures
of Pedrarias, held the same language, and the bishop stood
alone in his opinion. But, though alone, he neither lost
heart in his cause, nor suffered any diminution of boldness
in his tongue. His vehemence and strong language effected
more than his arguments.
I will denounce ye, Don Pedrarias, as disloyal to your
sovereign, inasmuch as you deliberately defeat his desires,
and refuse to obey his commands. He asks ye not to
qualify
his judgments, and to rectify them where they failit
is he who shall correct your judgments, and, let me add,
shall punish them too, when it shall be that they err as they
do now, from passion and prejudice, and the most rank
injustice
.
I tell ye no more but thisFerdinand shall know
from me, not merely of your disobedience, but of the evil
malice from which your disobedience springs. A malice
which, in seeking to destroy a man, hath come near to the
destruction of the whole colony, and hath too certainly
destroyed
a thousand men. Look to it, seoresye are all
the officers of the kinghe shall know from me, if you
amend not your judgments, certainly and soon, what hath
been the character of your loyalty.
The resolute indignation of the bishop produced its effect,
but did not altogether reach the end it aimed at. Pedrarias
well knew that if the jurisdiction, implied by the titles given
to Vasco Nunez, were once vested in him, it would leave
his own government of Darien but a very insignificant
command. He adopted a middle and more cunning
policy.
Let Vasco Nunez give security that he will not attempt
to enter upon his jurisdiction, until the king hath
knowledge
of the inquest upon him, in the business of the Seor
Diego de Nicuesa and of the Bachelor Enciso, and the titles
shall be conferred upon him forthwith. Thou mistakest
me, Quevedo, if thou think'st I would wrong this man, or
withhold from him any right, however little I may deem
him deserving of it. I have striven against him only as I
held him worthy rather of punishment than favour.
Be it so, replied the bishop, with a scorn he was
unable
entirely to conceal. The Seor Vasco can have no
fear in submitting his cause to the king. Indeed, he hath
long since submitted it, and these honours and this power,
which ye are so reluctant to bestow, are his final
judgments
upon the cause. But, as thou wilt. I will go forth
and greet the Adelantado of the Southern Seas with his new
and deserved dignities.
The title was caught up and found a thousand echoes in
Darien. The old soldiers of Vasco Nunez crowded around
him with applauses and shouts of exultation, which galled
the angry Pedrarias to madness. He looked with a
jealousy
,
the parent of innumerable fears, to the high place
which his rival maintained in public opinion, and began to
apprehend the presence of an enemy, who was destined to
usurp his power and overthrow himself. It was while
these fears and feelings were uppermost, that Francisco
Pizarro sought him in secret, and furnished a new source
of disquiet to his mind, and a new motive for injustice.
The adelantado is already busy, Don Pedrarias, said
the ambitious soldier, who well knew that his own elevation
was retarded only by that of one so superior as Vasco
NunezLook forth, seor, upon the harbour,thou wilt
there see as handsome a brigantine as ever swam in salt
water. See,she comes not to the quayshe rides
securely
at a distance, some six leagues off. But there are
tidings already in Darien which speak of her objects, and
for whom she comes. A messenger hath left her for the
shore, and is even now in close conference with the
adelantado
.
The adelantado!demonios! But speak out, Seor
Franciscowhat are their objectswhat brings she?
Arms and soldiers!
Ha!
As I live,true, seor. There are men and arms on
board,I know it from the Seor Vasco himself. Look
to it! He hath many in Darien to follow his banner, and
if, as I doubt not, the soldiers in the brigantine be
numerous
,
then will he have a force at his bidding to which
thou canst oppose nothing. Look to itthou hast yet
time to do allan hour may leave thee without strength
for any thing.
The governor grasped the hand of the traitor with a
cordial
pressure.
Pizarro,I thank theethou shalt be remembered for
this. Ho! there!
A servant appeared.
Away!to the Seor Ayorabid him instantly attend
me.
The officer stood before him in a little while after, and
the vindictive governor at once gave him his commands.
To the dwelling of Vasco Nunez with an hundred
picked men, and arrest me that black-hearted traitor. Do
thy bidding without hearing plea or prayer, and cast him
at once into the dungeon from which he was so lately and
unworthily set free. Away.
The adelantado was conversing with the youth Pedro,
who had so well executed his commission, when the officer
of Pedrarias with a strong guard entered for his arrest.
At the first sight of the soldiers, Careta, the Indian damsel
who sat near the entrance, screamed aloud. Hearing her
voice, Vasco Nunez who sat within the chamber, behind a
curtain which half covered the doorway, and who saw
nothing of the soldiers though he heard their tread, started
to his feet, and caught up the sword which lay on a table
14*
before him. The next moment Ayora entered the
apartment
followed by a force which rendered unavailing every
offer at defence.
What means this intrusion, Seor Ayora? demanded
the adelantado.
Your arrest, seor,I am commanded by Don
Pedrarias
to convey you to prison.
How!Don Pedrariasit cannot be! On what
pretence
?
Nay,I know not that, seor,nor is it for soldiers
to ask the why and wherefore of their commanders. I
must obey only, as, I trust, wilt thou.
Surelythere must be some mistake in this. Nay,
Careta, be not foolishmake no plaint,Don Pedrarias
will soon find his error, and I will return to thee directly.
Pedro,thou wilt be careful to keep things as I leave
them.
There was a meaning in these parting words of the
chief which Ayora did not see, but which was readily
understood
by the person addressed. He followed the party
to the Plaza near which stood the prison of Darien.
Now, said he, in hurried soliloquy as the door closed
upon the chiefthere is no farther charge upon me to
serve Vasco Nunez. The business I have taken for him
in hand is done, and he hath declared himself well content
with my performance. Surely, I have toiled for him
sharply, and as one who loved him. I forbore to slay him
when he was striding on with the pace of a giant to the
wondrous triumph which he achieved; a secret blow at
that moment, had been base like the shaft of the peasant
who lies in the cleft of the rock and strikes the mighty bird
when he is towering over the mountain. Wherefore did I
delay when he had made his triumph securewherefore
do I delay now, when his good fortune no longer attends
him?
A well known and harsh voice at his side interrupted his
soliloquy. The boy started, and shrunk back with a
feeling
of loathing, which the other interpreted into one of
fear. His grim smile betrayed something of triumph in
his mind at such a conviction.
What! thou hast not forgotten, Pedrothou art
resolved
to remember old grudges. A truce to thy folly,
boy, and hearken to sober sense. Thou seest the fortunes
of thy old master. They will be thine if thou heed not.
He hath gone to the prisonhe will go from thence to the
scaffold. Thou startest, but I tell thee truth; and thy own
danger is to come. Pedrarias knows not that thou hast
been the agent of this new treason of Vasco Nunez. He
knows not that it was thou who gottest ship and soldiers
for him in Cuba, that he might overthrow lawful sway in
Darien, and rise in rebellion against his sovereign. A
word from me will give thee to the same fate; and I will
speak that word, unless thou dost my bidding.
The sallow cheeks of the youth grew red with
indignation
.
His lips quivered and the gleam of his eye was
darkened by an expression of such unusual ferocity that
even the brutal Pizarro beheld it with silent surprise.
But the feelings in the striving heart of the boy were
checked with the conviction in his mind, that such a man
was to be encountered by art only; and stopping the angry
defiance which his first impulse had carried to his
quivering
lips, he changed the temper of his reply in an instant.
And what would the Seor Francisco have me do?
Thou art willingit is well. Thou shalt declare all
these things to the alcalde when he shall sit in judgment
on the Seor Vasco.
What things dost thou speak of Seor Pizarro?
What things? Have I not said? Hast thou not taken
money in his behalf to Cuba, and brought him hither a
vessel filled with armed men that he may overcome
Pedrarias
and possess himself of the command.
Nay, Seor Francisco, thou errestthe adelantado
hath had no such object; and there are but seventy men
in the brigantine.
Nay,thou shalt swear there are seven hundred, and
it is needful thou shouldst also swear his object to be as
I have declared it, and as thou knowest it to have been.
Thy own safety rests on thy readiness to do this.
Let me have time to think of it, Seor Francisco,
said the youth temporizingly. A new feeling rose in his
mind, and a new resolution, which, friendly to the fortunes
of the oppressed conqueror, sprang rather from his dislike
to the man who strove to suborn him to perjury against
him, than from any more becoming sentiment of justice.
He saw that the myrmidons of Pizarro were at hand, and
a word from their master would have thrown him into
fetters also.
Thou shalt have till to-morrow noon, was the reply
meanwhile, know for certain that the Seor Vasco cannot
escape the anger of Pedrarias. Even shouldst thou fail
him, shouldst thou do, as it were thy death also to do, there
is sufficient proof of his treachery. Beware, boythy fate
hangs, in this matter, on a slender thread; and thou
partakest
of the crime against which thou wilt not boldly
declare
thyself. More than this, thy compliance will bring
thee rewardthou wilt win the favour of him who can
protect thee, in lieu of that which thou losest, and which
is of little worth to any now.
And if such be thy base policy, murmured the youth
as he sped from the presence of the malicious traitor,
such is not mine. No! If thou that hast followed him
in the day of his prosperity with the smiling sycophancy
of the selfish slave, turn'st upon him in his misfortune like
the base cur that yelps at the heels of the wretched, it is
reason enough for one who did not strike his enemy in his
hour of pride, to avoid and utterly reject the counsel of
which thou givest him so fitting an example. I will not
lift my voice against him when all others shrink from his
side, and such as thou art every where his foes.
But all had not shrunk from the side of Vasco Nunez,
and every voice was not lifted against him in the day of
his evil fortune. While the youth sped along the
thoroughfare
,
and whenever the voices of a group reached his
ears, he heard nothing but murmurs against the new act of
tyranny which the governor had committed. Angry
censures
were spoken out with little caution, and the
professed
followers of the adelantado did not forbear to
mingle threats with their execrations. That sympathy
with greatness which had hitherto operated to discourage
the youth from putting into execution his vow of
vengeance
,
even when the opportunity was frequent, and had
made him labour faithfully in behalf of his destined victim,
now served to move him to yet farther performances, of
greater peril to himself, and of like generous tendency. A
sudden impulse, a thought rapid as the lightning, rushed
through his brain, and he stopped short among the
speakers.
The secretary of the adelantado!So, Seor Pedro,
what news is this of the Seor Vasco and of Don
Pedrarias
?
Shall the old soldiers of Darien be always made
footstools
of these new-comers with their fine coats? What are
we to have next?
What you please! replied the youth. Ye are men
strong menand as ye know your own wants and wishes,
so also should ye, by this time, know how to obtain them.
Lo, you! Have you not arms, and fear you these
silk-shodden
gentry? You are scarce less numerous, and, a
word in your ears; see you yonder vessela signal rings
her in two hours to the shore, and another signal adds an
hundred stout soldiers to your ranks. Put yourselves in
readinesssay nothingarm secretly and gather behind
the pillars of Santa Maria del Antigua two hours hence.
So shalt thou know what can be done for the adelantado.
Arguello will meet you there and be your leader.
Ha, Seor Pedro, dost thou swear thishow shall
we believe you.
By the pillar and the cross, I swear. I go now to
Arguelloand to make signal to the brigantine. Keep
your counseltrust none that ye know notkeep your
lips shut and your hearts firm, and meet me where I
tell you, in two hours, with lighted matches.
From group to group the enthusiastic youth sped with
all the haste of one warmed with a new and agreeable
employment
.
A single word to one, a sentiment to another, a
judicious hope held out to a third, and a flattering speech
to a fourth, sufficed to give vigour and concentration to
those floating feelings of indignation, which the renewed
ill-treatment
of their favourite commander had inspired among
the greater number of the old soldiers of Darien. There
were others of a higher order of intellect, if not of feeling,
to secure whom Pedro was not less mindful. One of these,
whose interests he well knew to depend very much upon
the release, as well as the favour of Vasco Nunezone
Hernando de Arguellohe sought out with arguments
equally convincing and provocative. This man, though
no soldier, and a notary merely, was yet popular in the
colony, and was possessed of a considerable private fortune.
Much of this was invested in certain agricultural schemes
of Vasco Nunez, and in the erection of a new town called
Acla, which the latter had founded at a port to the west of
Darien, which, in compliment to the Indian damsel, had
been called Careta. To alarm him on the subject of these
interests, the youth well knew, was the most easy way to
bring Arguello into the field.
Let Pedrarias convict Vasco Nunez of treason, and all
his property is confiscated. Your interests are so hidden
among his, that they go together in loss, equally as in good
fortune. Who knows, besides myself and ye two, that you
are equal owner with the Seor Vasco of all the fields of
Santa Maria?who knows that your wealth has raised
from the base more than two-thirds of the houses at Acla?
But you can prove these things, Pedro, before the
alcalde
,
replied the other in alarm.
I prove! Ay, and what would be the value of my
proof in the ears of Pedrarias, when it is his desire to get
this property into his possession? It were as much as my
head were worth to give such testimony. I should look to
be found guilty of the same honourable crime with the
adelantado
,
and be despatched after him, as a secretary that
knows quite too much for the good of better people. No!
no! Seor Hernando,your hope is to save the adelantado
from the jaws of the denouncing governorin his safety
you are safe, and I tell thee if Vasco Nunez dies as a
traitor
to King Ferdinand, then, the bare suspicion that thou
hast a claim upon property held as his, will go far to
bringing
you guilty of the same crime, and will ensure you the
benefits of a like sharp judgment.
But to take command of these soldiers for his rescue is
treason.
Ay, but strong treason is always respectable, and makes
its own terms. Weak treason is a cur that barks without
teeth. Already they regard you as such a cur, and the
Seor Vasco is himself not without the imputation. If,
indeed, he had been less loyal, Pedrarias had not suspected
him of treason. Had he but shown his teeth at the first
indignity of this governor,I tell thee he had this day been
sole master in Darien. It took from my admiration of the
Seor Vasco, that he was so patient, and so loyal, under all
his injuries. It is for him and his friends, nowit is not too
lateto show that they have teeth, and will not wait for
too much provocation.
Thou art wise beyond thy years, Pedrothou shouldst
have been a soldier.
The boy looked down at his own shrivelled limbs, and a
bitter smile passed over his features.
Ay, ay,but I am not, and what is worse, can never
bebut, Seor Hernando. I have teeth, and can show
them too when there is need. There is need for thee to
show thine now.
I do not fear, Pedro, as thou knowest; but, in truth,
I am as little soldier as thou. I cannot array men for
battle
It shall be done to thy hands, seor; I will be at
thy side and will prompt thee. Fear not that I lack. I
tell theeand I tell thee with sorrow rather than with
pride,I have looked on war and battle with a strange
pleasure,a pleasure that was ever dashed in the next
moment
with a bitter grief, that I could only be a looker-on.
But enough of this. We are bound for speed. The men
gather at the Pillar of Santa Maria, and the signal is
thrice made for the soldiers of the brigantine. Get thee
thy weapon, seor,and be surely at the Pillar within a
proper time. Thou art a lawyer, tooit were not amiss
if thou conned'st some flattering speech for the soldiers.
Thou canst tell them of the gold and the glory, of which
thou well know'st how small is the share which they ever
get. But this latter is a truth scarcely wholesome to be
said by those who need their succour. They will take
thy promises on trust, and ask for no proof such as would
trouble thee to procure, satisfactory to them as well as to
Pedrarias. Seor, thy fortune rests on thy speed, and by
our Lady of the Pillar, I tell thee, as in truth I believe, thy
head hangs on thy shoulders, when that of the Seor
Vasco
is off, only by thy modest forbearance to claim any
interest
in his forfeited possessions.
I will be there, PedroI fear not Pedrarias. Thou
art sure of the temper of the men?
Would thou wert as sure of thine arm, seor.
Nay, mistrust me not. This Pedrarias shall feel me.
He hath dealt foully with the Seor Vasco,nay, I know
he strives only at his possessions; but there shall be blows
in that bargain. Thou hast said nothing to Pizarro?
Pizarro! No! Beware of him,he is a thrice black
traitor to the Seor Vasco, who hath kissed his lips when
he carried poison on his own. I tell thee, if any hath
counselled Pedrarias to these doings, other than his own
vexing spirit, that other hath been Francisco Pizarro. Keep
thou from his sight, seor, until thou tak'st the lead of thy
men, then if he approach thee, as it will be but seemly in
him to do, with a traitorous speech of friendship to thee
and to Vasco Nunez, give him thy dagger in his mouth for
an answer, and let a short cord lift him to a high tree.
There is not a blacker heart in all Spain, than works in the
bosom of Francisco Pizarro.
Thy phrase is that of an old soldier, Pedro. Thou
wilt be a captain yetnay, I will make thee my lieutenant
now. See that thou fail me not at the Pillar,I shall have
little wisdom to command without thy help.
Be thou there, seor. I will no more fail thee, than I
will fail the Seor Vasco in the last moment.
CHAPTER XVII.
STORM SUBSIDINGGLEAMS OF SUNSHINE.
The
first intelligence of the second arrest of Vasco
Nunez
brought the astrologer to the dwelling of the bishop of
Darien, and the latter, immediately after, to the presence of
Pedrarias. The good bishop was not less astonished than
vexed by this new indignityone that seemed as utterly
unaccountable as shocking. He resolved to keep no terms
with the governor, but to denounce his conduct to his
sovereign with all the harshness which he thought due to
offences
that he now could only ascribe to a mean and reckless
jealousy of the superior talents and popularity of his rival.
He found the governor in a fury of wrath, which savoured
much more of madness than of even extraordinary
indignation
.
Before he would hear the bishop, his lips broke forth
into clamours which for a while prevented any conference.
Thou hast pleaded for this arch-traitorthou hast
stepped between him and the just punishment to which,
but for thee, I had doomed him long agoand now see what
has come of it. This virtuous man, this loyal captain, this
great hero and wondrous geniusthis lamb whom the wolf
was seeking to destroyhe whom, in the warmth of thy
benevolence, thou hast styled thy sonthy noble son!
ho! what canst thou say for him now? what is thy new
plea? what thy pretence? Methinks thou shouldst now
be silent, Quevedo, and forbear all thy opposition to the
course of justice. Thou wilt surely now give me way to
do with this traitor what I please.
Of a certainty I will do no such thing, Don Pedrarias.
Even were it not hostile to the general purport of justice,
VOL. II. 15
that thou or any man should do as it pleaseth him in
his evil mood to the prisoner in his bonds, or the
subject
within his sway, thy ungovernable temper at this
moment
would be sufficient cause to move me to resistance to
thy will. With such a mood upon thee, it were impossible
for thee to do justicenay, it were not possible for thee to
do aught, with this spirit, which would not be the most
rank injustice. What is it now that thou hast, in the
fever of thy hate, brought against this persecuted man?
It is even as I thought. Still, thou thwartest mestill
thou givest help and countenance to the traitor. What
will convince thee, my Lord Bishop of Darien? What
evidence wouldst thou need for the conviction of Vasco
Nunez? Wilt thou have the blessed angels from heaven?
Will Michael and Gabriel and Raphael suffice? Perchance
the Blessed Virgin might answer theebut, surely, nothing
short of miracle will avail against thy forejudging favour in
this disloyal man's behalf.
Beware, Don Pedrarias, that thy madness leads thee
not to blasphemy. It may be that I shall be compelled to
show thee a commission which gives me, as a brother of
the holy office, power even above that of the Governor of
Darien.
Dost thou threaten me too, Quevedo, in behalf of thy
favourite?
I warn thee, PedrariasI warn thee against thy own
passions, which lead thee to wrong me no less than this
man. He is no favourite, only so far as he deserves
my favour. Show me that he merits punishment at thy
hands, and I will speak no more in his behalf. Until
this be done, the passion which thou showest in
speaking
against him, is a proof of thy hate and not of his
crime. The judge who pronounces sentence against the
prisoner, having a burning wrath in his heart such as now
works in thine, is the devil's officer and does the work
of hell only. Thou darest not sit in judgment on Vasco
Nunez, hating him as thou dost.
The energetic language of the bishop at once awed and
irritated the governor anew.
By the blessed cross, my lord bishop, thou wouldst
have this man change places with me. Thou wouldst
make me criminal like him. What! Can it be that we
may not hate the offender because of his offence? If I
loathe this Vasco Nunez, it is because of his deeds.
I fear me, because of his good and great deeds, Don
Pedrarias, since I have seen no other of his performance,
and thou tell'st me of none. Wherefore hast thou again
thrust him into prison?
For a newly-discovered treasonone greater than all
the rest. What if I tell thee that he hath secretly
despatched
his secretary to Cubathat he hath brought an
armed vessel into port, and, but that I had timely warning
of his designs, had ere now, perchance, raised the banner
of open treason in Darien, and seized upon the province?
A province which thou, in thy sovereign's despite,
withhold'st from his command. But who gave thee this
timely warning?
Nay,this matters nothing. Enough that the proof
is to be found in the fact itself. The vessel is already in
the river of Darien, filled with arms and men, who wanted
only the lead of the traitor to seize upon the government.
But his head or mine before that hour.
Thou hast moved rashly, Don Pedrarias, and greatly
do I fear that these doings of thine cannot soon be amended.
Some evil counsellor, who hates Vasco Nunez, and thou
no less, is busy to use thee for his destruction. Hast thou
seen this brigantinehast thou numbered the men she
brings? Thou dost not deny to the adelantado the right
to bring a brigantine into Darien, having proper objects!
Ay,there it is,but the objects, as I have shown
thee, are not proper. Have I not told thee that he
purposes
to seize upon the government?
Thou hast said this thing, but this I believe not. Thou
hast been misled, and but that thou fearest this chief, thou
hadst not so readily hearkened to a story which the facts
themselves disprove. This brigantine is a little bark
scarce large enough to bear an hundred men, and what
would such a force do with thy command in Darien.
Truly, Don Pedrarias, such fear as this shows unseemly in
a commander of such repute in valiancy as thou.
The swarthy cheeks of the governor grew fiery red as
he replied
Dost thou think I fear this man, Quevedo, or is it
fitting
that the teacher of peace should taunt the warrior with
words of such scorn as thine? I tell thee, Quevedo, that
but for the duty which I owe my sovereign, which forbids
that I should expose his subjects to unnecessary risk of life,
it were my pleasure to set this traitor free, to bid him
bring on his hireling soldiers, and, foot to foot and face
to face, challenge him to make good against me in mortal
strife, the skill and prowess which it is the boast of his
followers are so much beyond the possession of all other
Spanish cavaliers.
I were loth, Don Pedrarias, for thy own sake, that
thou shouldst make so wild a venture.
I tell thee, cried the other, angrily, thou knowest
me not,and whatever may be thy fears, I have none.
This moment could it beha! what sounds are those,
Quevedo?Doth it not seem like the tread of martial
men?And those noises?they seem like the shouts of
soldiers.
A rushing sound, like that of a swollen and
upwardheaving
sea, came to their ears at this moment, and a
few minutes sufficed to answer the inquiry of the governor.
The cries and clamours below increased, and rushing into
the presence with their drawn swords his affrighted guards
announced the first outbreak of that movement in behalf of
the imprisoned hero, the first preparatory steps for which
we have already followed. Hastily putting on his armour,
Don Pedrarias, who lacked any virtue but courage, put
himself instantly forward, and commanding his officers to
their several places, prepared, as well as the sudden
necessity
would admit, to meet the attack of the antagonists.
Thou seest now! he cried to the archbishop, with a
scowl of bitter reproach. Wouldst thou have more proof
of this man's treason than those shouts contain? Dost
thou hear the criesthe insolent threats of these scum
ha!
But the bishop was not without his answer.
Nay, I see no treason of Vasco Nunez in thisI see
nothing but the indignation of his soldiers, driven to fury
at the injustice and the cruelty with which thou hast
treated
a popular favourite. It is my wonder that thou hast
not seen this spirit beforeI warned thee of its
presence
.
Thou wilt believe nothing! furiously exclaimed the
governor as he rushed below.
Pedrarias fearlessly put himself at the head of the troops
which had been hastily gathered to his help; and though
he beheld his dwelling environed on every hand, he had
no other thought than one of fight and defiance. The two
parties were nearly equal in strength. The insurgents
were less numerous, but they were menold soldiers, who
delighted in the prospect not merely of releasing their
leader, but of obtaining a triumph over the more gay and
gallantly-equipped soldiers of Pedrarias. Thus stood the
parties, both ready for blows,swords drawn-and matches
lighted, and the flame of civil war about to blaze up in a
colony, upon which the vengeful Indian looked down from
the surrounding heights, with the eager solicitude of the
vulture in waiting for his prey. The wisdom of the
archbishop
,
at this moment, interposed to appease the tumult
and dissipate the storm. He advanced boldly between the
two parties, and implored, with hands uplifted, a brief
pause, in which he proffered himself as a mediator between
them. This was granted, and he drew the still angry but
bewildered governor aside. He pointed out to him, not
merely the injustice of his proceedingswhich the other
would not admitbut the evil to the colony of strife
among its citizensa strife which, sooner or later, would
place both parties at the mercy of the watchful and
implacable
savages.
There is but one remedy for all thisset Vasco
Nunez
free.
Never!His head or mine.
Madness, Pedrariasthis is the very insanity of hate.
Hear me. Why persist in driving a man to become your
deadliest enemy, when it is in your power to bind him to
your side as your firmest friend.
Impossible, Quevedo! This man hates me, and has
ever hated me from the first, and will always hate me as
one who hath superseded him in office and driven him from
power.
This is thy jealousy, not his. It was my wonder that,
at thy first coming, he offered thee no resistance, which he
might well have done and safely, since, as it appears
afterwards
,
our sovereign approved of his authority. This was
thy wonder also. But there are some facts lately come to
my knowledge from the lips of the venerable man, Codro,
the astrologer
A traitor no less than him he serves.
15*
Nay, hear me through. This Micer Codro, whom I
hold to be a good though visionary man, hath advised me
of certain facts in the history of Vasco Nunez that fully
account to my mind for his singular forbearance towards
thee.
What facts?
Know you that he hath once sought your daughter
Teresa in marriage?
Ha! Well! Thou know'st this?
Ay, ere Ojeda went on his last voyagehe sought her
in Espaola; and, as it is said to me by this man, Codro,
he sought her with a passionate admiration having no
bounds, heedless of all interest while in the pursuit, and
sacrificing fame and fortune, and leaving them at waste and
riot, in the sole solicitude of that love which he held for
your daughter.
Can this be true?
I nothing question of the truth, since it so well
accounts
for the wondrous forbearance toward thee amid
repeated
wrongs and indignities, of a man known to be no
less daring and valiant than cool, ready, and determined.
Besides, it is the assurance of Codro.
And what is thy hope from all this?
Thou hast sent thy commands to thy daughter to meet
thee here in Darien. Ere this she is on her way hither.
Give her in marriage to this man whom thou countest thy
enemy, and thus bind him to thy interest and side, thy
friend for ever. You will then, continued the bishop,
have a son-in-law of great merit and popularity, an
hidalgo
born, and a favourite of the king. You are old, he is
in youth and vigour. While you repose from the toils of
the command which you yet enjoy, he will carry on the
enterprises of the colony, and your family and name must
necessarily share in all the successes and the glory of his
arms. Thou hast no wiser course, Pedrarias, than to give
him Teresa Davila.
Can this be done? She hath rejected him, thou sayst.
Holds he his favour, think you, for one who hath scorned
him? Methinks, Quevedo, if rightly I comprehend thy
thought, thou wouldst have me, the father of Teresa
Davila
,
proffer her maiden hand to one, who will only rejoice
to fling it back from him with disgrace.
Thou knowest neither the lover nor the man. Vasco
Nunez is a being too noble to regard woman with other
than noble homage; and he who hath ever loved, as it is
assured me this man hath loved thy daughter, will gladly
forget the rejection and the scorn in the compliance which at
last yields the prize that he hath sought. Be thou not afraid
of this. Suffer me to direct this matter, and peace shall be
restored to thy people, and thou, Pedrarias Davila, shall be
bound in friendship and affection with one, worthy of the
best affection, whom hitherto thou hast treated most
unworthily
as well for him as for thyself. Am I free to speak
in this business?
The stubborn father at last consented, since the plan
opened to him new views of safety from one, whom the
open admiration of the soldiers in Darien, evinced in their
present rebellious attitude, invested with powers too
dangerous
in a rival, and too valuable in a friend and ally.
The words of the archbishop, whom they knew to be well
disposed to our hero, quelled his angry followers. He
assured
them that he went to set Vasco Nunez free, having
the full consent, nor merely the consent, but the approving
favour and cordial kindness, of the governor, in his behalf.
The insurgents received this news with rejoicing, but when
the bishop called upon them to disband, the youth Pedro
whispered in the ears of Arguello, who was their leader,
not to comply until Vasco Nunez were released and present
to command them; and, resolutely maintaining their ground
and weapons, they patiently resolved to await the result of
the bishop's visit to the prison.
The bishop had done much towards pacification, but
there were some difficulties in the way of his object, about
which, like a wise man, he did not seek to deceive
himself
.
He had been truly advised by the astrologer, of the
nature of the intercourse between Vasco Nunez and
Teresa Davila, and of the intense admiration with which
that cavalier regarded her. Her rejection of his suit was
not shown to the bishop, without being accompanied by a
farther showing which fully revealed to him her cold,
capricious
heartlessness of character, and her utter deficiency,
in all those respects, in which a man, devoted and earnest
like Vasco Nunez, would chiefly desire that his wife
might be complete. The immorality of coupling together
two such persons, did not, however, appear so objectionable
to the bishop, when the policy of the proceeding, in a
public
point of view, was the subject of consideration; and the
chief difficulty to his mind, in overcoming the objections
of Vasco Nunez, seemed only such as might arise from
the mortified pride and wounded vanity of the latter, who
might not be so ready to forget his previous rejection.
To smooth his difficulties in this respect, the good bishop
took Micer Codro with him to the prison, though, as they
went, the venerable astrologer listened to the scheme of
his companion with a heartfelt sorrow which his lips did
not fail to declare. Their dialogue, as it unfolded the
arguments
for and against the measureregarded only as a
question of policy on all handsmay be briefly stated as
follows:
This woman hath no affection for Vasco Nunez, said
the astrologershe hath scorned his prayer in the hour
of his adversity, and is utterly unworthy to be his wife.
What trust can be put in her hands that she would
maintain
.
She would betray him to his enemies, and be
hostile
to his friends. Truly, Quevedo, I fear me, that it is a
firebrand thou wouldst bring for soothing.
Nay, Codro, thou speakest of the follies of a giddy
girl with too much solemnity. At her age no woman
knows her own mind, and the thing which is her utter hate
to-day, is her cordial love to-morrow. Woman is a thing
of change, proverbially fickle as the moon. If Teresa
refused
Vasco Nunez when he was in adversity in Espaola,
lo! you, she accepts him now when he is in no less
adversity
in Darien.
Ay, but there is a policy in it here which had not
governed
her action there. It is Don Pedrarias that accepts
Vasco Nunez, not his daughter.
Well, let me tell you, Micer Codro, the damsel who
heeds her father will be very apt to heed her husband also.
The woman is a good woman enougha foolish jade, no
doubtbut young enough to grow wiser, and sensible
enough to grow better. Besides, what avails this
discussion
?
I see nothing better for our friend, and if he has
ever loved the damsel he will be satisfied surely. If this
plan of mine be not taken, what follows? He lies in
prison under suspicion of treason, which, thy own sense
will perceive, is strongly grounded. Lo! his men in arms
headed by his copartner in schemes of fortune, and
counselled by his secretary. A vessel suddenly, and at
the very moment of the outbreak here, comes into port
filled with soldiers, acknowledging no authority but
that of Vasco Nunez, lying off from shore as fearing or
intending harm, and, as if counselled by himself, her
troops secretly land, join their arms to the insurgents, and
even now clamour in open rebellion around the dwelling
of the lawful governor. I tell thee but for this, Micer
Codro, we had defied Pedrarias. His hate and suspicions
have now some reasonable grounds, and were he now to
send Vasco Nunez to the block, these events would be
ample justification for the deed before the royal council.
Thou wilt say, there must be blows struck ere it come to
thisthese old soldiers will not tamely suffer their leader
to perish. Be it soand what then? Will it give thee
or me pleasure to see these miserable people cutting each
other's throats. The troops of Vasco Nunez may do harm
to those of Pedrarias, but they cannot serve their chief.
One signal from the governor, and his guards will fling the
head of that brave man into the ranks of those who now
strive for his rescue.
There was too much staggering truth in this
representation
to be withstood by the astrologer.
Yet, he spoke musingly, have I read it in the stars
that his chief danger came from a woman.
The bishop put his hand upon the arm of the old man
while, smiling, he replied
It needs not the stars, Micer Codro, to reveal this
truth to any son of Eve. Thy prediction is history, and
may be read for every man that ever walked beneath the
stars. But if there be reason for thy fear in particular, how
shouldst thou know that Teresa Davila is the woman
signified
.
At present she is the star of his safety, not of his
destruction, and thou wilt do well to second me in the
goodly work of making peace through her medium between
these two leaders, without which there can be nothing but
war and bloodshed in the land. Thou dost not surely
prefer
that these soldiers should strive with each other in
deadly combat, that the murderous ambition of their chiefs
should be gratified with an elevation obtained through blood,
and which, if war be chosen, can only end in the death of
one or both. Thou wilt see how greatly the chances are
against him who is already in chains, and whose life hangs
upon the merest whisper of his enemy.
The astrologer sighed, but made no other answer, as
they went forward to the prison. Long and arduous was
the conflict in the mind of Vasco Nunez, ere he could
be brought to yield consent to a measure for which, at
the same timestrange weakness of the strong man's
heart,every pulse and feeling in his bosom yearned.
The indignation which the levity of Teresa had aroused
within him, the pang following the rejection of a suit
which she had seemed to encourage, were all forgotten in
the strength of that passion with which he had
contemplated
her from the first. The sure suggestions of the
bishopthe annunciation by him of the arrangement
made with Pedrarias, by which Teresathe
long-worshipped
object of his affectionswas finally offered to his
acceptance, and at his disposal,at a moment, too, when
in prison, at the mercy of his bitter rival, he felt
hopeless
even of lifeproduced a tremulousness of heart and
nerve which left him for a time speechless. But if the
scorn and levity of Teresa ceased to be remembered in
the renewing gush of his early loveif the worthlessness
of the object was forgottenthere was yet an obstacle
in the path of the conqueror that he dared not
contemplate
.
The thought of the poor, devoted Indian damsel
rose in his mindher form stood before himunder the
instant touch and prompt arrest of his conscience, he
saw the upbraiding sorrow in her eyes, and felt the keen
justice of those reproaches which he fancied were rising
to her lips, but which yet they did not utter. Long and
weary was the strugglevainly protractedsince the
man was overthrown. Passion triumphed. Life, death!
were before him, and the alternative so presented to his
mind, his heart, his ambition, alike, that he yielded to that
which seemed his fate. To have refused the terms offered
him of freedom, to reject the hand of the woman whom
still he loved with an ungovernable passion, was, in fact,
to invite the stroke of the executioner. To accept, was
at once to spring to freedom, to power, to those conquests
for which his soul pined.
Do with me as you please, he cried to them, do
with me as you please. I need scarcely declare a will,
since I am moved about by fateits miserable puppet
wholly insecure, at any moment, of the possessions of the
past.
The conqueror was freed, but when his eye met that of
the Indian damselwhen, ignorant of the conditions of
his freedom, her eye encountered him with a rapturous
expression of delight, which the screaming joy of her lips
equally attestedhis eye sank before her glancehis lips
were glued together, and the high-soaring Christian
conqueror
quailed with a conviction of shame in the presence
of the almost adoring, and unsuspecting savage.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE AVENGER STRENGTHENED FOR THE STROKE.
The
marriage-contract between Pedrarias on the one
hand, for his daughter, and Vasco Nunez on the other,
was formally drawn up and signed in presence of the
good bishop, who having, as he flattered himself,
completed
the work of peace between the parties, set sail
shortly afterwards for Spain, leaving the colony in a
condition
of quiet and hopeful promise, which it had not
known for many months before. Behold now, says
the worthy chronicler, Fray Agapida, behold Vasco
Nunez
once more in the high career of prosperity. His
most implacable enemy had suddenly been converted into
his dearest friend; for Pedrarias, now that he looked upon
him as his son-in-law, loaded him with favours. The
favours of highest satisfaction to such a mind as Vasco
Nunez were, however, those only which gave it
employment
.
To carry on the conquest which he had begun,
to explore those waters from which he had taken off the
seal of ages, and, with that insatiate appetite which
distinguishes
the soul of genius, to leave nothing to the
unknown
which man might know, were now the grand
desires
of his heart: and in their prosecution we find him
the moment that he was freed from the tyranny of
Pedrarias
,
and secure, as his future son-in-law, in his
confidence
preparing
to build, at vast pains and labour, an
armament for the navigation of the great southern sea.
The spot chosen for this labour was the port of Careta,
already known to the reader, and named after the Indian
damsel. A town had been founded at this port called
Aclahouses were built, a fortress raised, and the civil
interests of a flourishing community, already active in all
respects, under the justly governing influence of our hero.
Two hundred men, under his sole command, enabled him
in a short time to do that which Pedrarias, with a thousand,
had failed to do in the weary space of protracted months;
and the labours of Vasco Nunez were carried on with a
degree of industry that derived no little impulse from
another cause than that of his ambition. There was a
gnawing and reproachful thought in his mind which he
vainly strove to banish. The consciousness of wrong
haunted him and kept him sleepless. Every glance at the
Indian maiden, whose humble but devoted affections he
had betrayed,however necessary to his safety seemed
the wrongstung him with a sorrow that drove him to
labour as to relief, and prompted him even in search of
danger, that he might escape the worse goadings of his
conscience. Meanwhile, the poor girl herself, was the
most happy of the happy. She knew nothing of the
terms by which Vasco Nunez had been releasedshe
did not dream that she herself was the sacrificebut she
knew that he was no longer in danger from a power
which had harassed him from the first with every sort
of oppression; and in this conviction she was satisfied.
With the privilege of one who loves entirely, she chided
his downcast looks, his reluctant eyes, and the lethargy
which stifled the free tones of his voice and the graceful
life which had once distinguished every movement of his
limbs.
When my lord was in the prison, she said, it was
a time for him to be sad. But wherefore is his sadness
now? Is he not freehath he not warriors to do his
bidding
?and
the governor, who was once his enemy, is he
not now his friend. Let not my lord look sorrowfulthe
heart of Careta trembles with fear when my lord looks
not upon her with love.
Be not afraid, Caretawhy should you be afraid?
But the mind of the speaker was evidently wandering as
he made this answer; and the coldness of the tones, and
the lack of all expression in his eyes, as he looked upon
her, conveyed far more fear to her heart than his language
brought consolation. He noted this effect, and making a
commanding effort, thus endeavoured to soothe her
VOL. II. 16
Have I not many toils and many cares, Careta?
Behold my laboursthou seest that I rise ere the dawn,
and my toils are not finished with the night. Thou also
knowest that I meditate adventures across the mountains
and the new sea with my vessels,it is such meditations
as these that look like sadness in my face. Let not
Careta behold them. Let her believe that I think, not
that I grieve.
Ah!did not my lord think when he first came to
Coyba? Then he had the great mountains to cross that
stood between him and the southern seathen he had
few warriors, and many enemies among the warriors of
Darien, who are now his friends. My lord had
meditations
then, but his steps were light, and he smiled upon
the poor girl of Coyba, and he laughed aloud, and he
looked up to the hill-tops, and not upon the earth at his
foot. Ah! the thoughts that trouble my lord at Acla, are
not the thoughts he had at Coyba, and when he crossed
the great mountains to the southern sea. The heart of
my lord is changedit is sorrowful within him;will he
not tell Careta of his sorrows that she may be sorry too?
Be you not sorry, Careta, because I am thoughtful.
These thoughts that trouble me will pass away, and thou
shalt soon behold me smile, as I used to smile when I first
came to Coyba. But I have been troubled as thou
knowest. Thou hast seen me stripped of power, and
thrown into chains, and threatened with death, and these
things have brought gloomy clouds over my face, which
are not yet dispersed.
But my lord has power more than beforehe is free
from chains, and the governor that threatened him with
death, now loves him and seeks to do him honour.
Careta thinks it strange that he should love thee of a
sudden, when he once hated thee so badly, but her heart
is glad that it is so. My lord, there is one thing
She paused, and looked up, with a sad earnestness, into
his face.
Speak, Careta, he replied encouragingly.
When my lord was in prison he was not so sad as
now when he is free. When the governor said he should
die, he laughed, and said to Careta`Fear nothing,
Careta, I shall not diehe dare not slay methou shalt
lie in my bosom many long years yet to come.' Such
were the words of my lord, when the chains were on his
hands, to the poor damsel of Darien.
No more of this, girlno more, Caretathou madd'st
me, I tell thee. Leave meleave me. Why shouldst
thou tell me of all this now? The time is pastthe
chains are no longer on my hands. Seest thou not that
I am free?ay, free! Thou art glad of my freedom art
thou not? Well! Thou knowest nothing of its price,
else, it might be, thou wert not half so glad.
The girl, stunned by the sudden and vehement
language
of the chief, shrank back in silence, not utterly
unaccompanied by fear. But there was nothing brutal in
the character of Vasco Nunez. He saw that his manner
gave her pain, and in another instant, recollecting himself,
his tones were changed to those of tenderness, as he
spoke again.
Come hither, my poor Careta.
The smile upon his lips, but, more than all, the tear
within his eye, which was clearly visible to her, unsealed
the fountains of delighted joy within her heart; she
rushed forward with a scream and threw herself into his
extended arms. He pressed her warmly for an instant
to his bosom, then released her, and rapidly hurried from
her presence.
Ay, he muttered to himself as he moved from the
dwelling where this scene had taken placeay, I have
indeed bought my freedom from chains, and my security
of life, at a grievous price to thee, Careta. Of a truth it
is a damning sin to sell this poor Indian's hope, as I have
sold hers, that I might look upon the sunlight, and prolong
the miserable hours of a life which has now so little left
for performance. And thou too, Micer Codro, hast
counselled
me to this! Thou, too, one ever pleading for the
poor Indianever hostile to the woman whose charms,
too powerful in my heart, have made me sacrifice one
whose soul is more true and lofty by far in its forest
ignorance, than is hers for which I yield it up, in all the
glow and glory of her beauty, in all the grace and
majesty
of her courtly skill and royal education:thou hast
moved me to this cruel barter which makes me tremble,
with the consciousness of wrong, even before the simple
heathen of the hills. There is an evil destiny in this. It
is the toil of the stars against the mortal. Vainly have
I brought to the game, courage and skill, fond and earnest
thought, cunning scheme, and adventure that has taken
counsel from the desperate wing of the eagle, soaring
aloft when the storm was gathering among all his hills
the cast of the dice has prevailed even against the plans
I have madethe defences I have set upthe skill, the
audacity, the hope; and my enemy hath forced conditions
upon me which, though they leave me life, leave me but
little honour. It is a snare of the foul fiend, and it hath
fastened upon my soul for ever.
His secretary stood beside him.
Despatches from Santa Maria, my lord, he said,
handing him letters. There is word of a new governor
coming out from Spain for Darien.
Ha! Say'st thou, Pedroa new governor from
Spainsuperseding Don Pedrarias! Strange! How
hearest thou this?
Lope de Olano, who comes as alcalde to Acla, brings
report. He hath sent you these advices, and will soon
report to you in person. It is farther mentioned that the
Seora Teresa, the daughter of Don Pedrarias hath just
reached Darien from Espaola.
A rush of weakness went through the heart of Vasco
Nunez at the name, and the papers were shaken in his
hands by the trembling fingers which grasped them
nervously. Teresa was then once more near himthat
scornful beauty! He should once more behold her:
nay, more, she was pledged to him as his. Love was to
be triumphant at lastand love was to be sacrificed.
The star of the haughty Christian, in love, as well as in
war, prevailed over that of the humble pagan!
Poor Careta! was the half muttered exclamation of
the adelantado, as he turned away to peruse the
documents
;
and while he read the page his thoughts were
wandering away to the heathen damsel, and all her
devoted
humility;the love that hopes much, and fears
much, and suffers much, grew visibly embodied to his
mind's eye, and rose more and more lovely to his thought,
as he remembered the haughty capriciousness of that
prouder beauty, whom his own heart had still been too
ready to receive as the price of that precious sacrifice
which he was about to make of her worthier, if less
beautiful sister.
The secretary contemplated the changing features and
sad, spiritless eye of his superior, with something more of
scorn than surprise. From the moment when Vasco
Nunez had accepted his life and freedom at the hands
of Pedrarias, he had sunk rapidly and greatly in the
estimation
of the youth.
I had thought this man perfectthe very model of
dominion, and a mighty spirit among men; and with this
thought, my own resolve to slay him was set aside, nay,
almost forgotten, in the contemplation of his greatness.
He hath indeed achieved a wondrous conquesta vast
discovery
;
but this baseness to the poor Indian, who deems
herself his assured wifeshe who hath clung to him with
a devotion like that which her people pay to their pagan
deitieshath stained the image in my mindhath
tarnished the pure lustre of his fame. Wherefore
should he buy himself from the bondage of Pedrarias,
when brave men stood ready to set him free?
Wherefore
,
to give freedom to his body, sell his soul and its
affections to a woman who hath already spurned him
from her feet? He hath too surely fallen from his great
eminence by this wretched baseness, and in his fall, I
too have become freed. Never was spirit more enslaved
than mine in the contemplation of this man's greatness.
I sought him with the resolve of one, who beholds in his
enemy a brutal and common stabber; yet, when I looked
upon him, I forgot the purpose in my mind, the dagger in
my hand, and the sweet revenge which I had sworn to
take upon him for a brother's murder. I forget them no
more. Vasco Nunez, thy weakness hath strengthened
me. I am awake, and henceforward I sleep not again
until thou art laid for thy final sleep. The oath is
renewed
,
though my lips speak it nothere, looking upon
theehere, with heaven looking into my heartI bind
myself to the spirit of the dead against thee, as the
unsparing avenger. Hadst thou kept thyself white
hadst thou not fallen into shame through a worthless
love of lifeI had not found it in my heart to have aimed
weapon at thine. But that is over,and now I only wait
my time.
Such were the reflections rapidly passing through the
mind of the youth as he stood before the adelantado. That
very day the latter set off for Darien, leaving the Indian
damsel behind him at Acla.
16*
CHAPTER XIX.
VASCO NUNEZ MEETS WITH TERESA DAVILA.
The
reception of Vasco Nunez by the Lady Teresa,
was such as might gratify any lover. That capricious
beauty had been sufficiently schooled by her father's
will; and the proud eminence to which the hero had
attained
,
whom once she regarded as a wandering visionary,
induced her now to hold him in another and a more
endearing
light. She had, with all that art which seems so like
instinct
in the bosom of the habitual coquette, banished from
her countenance and speech that levity which, even in
the moment of his greatest admiration, had somewhat
impaired, in his judgment, the excellence of her charms.
She appeared to him now the very perfection of modest
and unassuming grace, as she certainly was that of
imposing and commanding beauty. Her dark eye was
lowered beneath his glanceher lips scarcely parted
when they gave utterance to the trembling timid
accents
with which she greeted his presence and replied
to his salutation, and none of the most endowed of
those skilled in dramatic personification could have more
ably persuaded the spectator of the absolute truth of
her portraiture, than did Teresa Davila impose upon
the love-blinded understanding of one who held among
men the highest station for mental aptness and
intelligence
.
Few were the first words of the heromany
were his thoughtsstrange his sensationsa mingled
anguish and delight disturbed his spirit, and rendered
uncertain for a while the true feeling which possessed
him. Long he watched her, and doubts warred in his
mind with his own hopes and the assurances which had
been given him. The words of the astrologerone of
those vexing speeches which he had been so much
accustomed
to make in San Domingo, when Vasco Nunez
was first a hopeful loverseemed to ring in his ears
with solemn emphasis, even while he watched the maiden.
If you are famous, and achieve the greatness which
is now a dream in the estimation of all Espaola, then
will the Lady Teresa receive you gladly as her lord.
Fail in thisbe nothing but the wandering cavalier,
seeking service in the ranks of other captains, and she
will regard your homage as indignity, and meet your
adoration with scorn.
Can this be so? was the inward question of Vasco
Nunez. She hath surely been thus scornful in San
Domingo. Can I ever forget that nightthat night
when Garabito was slainwhen, in my agony of heart
and passion of supplication, she answered me with a
vain song? Ha! Am I to be laughed at thus? Shall
it be? No! She shall know me for one neither blind
to the indignity, nor insensible to the shame!Teresa!
Seor.
Teresa, it is long, very long since we have met.
Yes, seorvery long.
Dost thou indeed feel it to be so very long, Teresa?
Ay, seorwherefore dost thou ask?
It is no unseemly question, Teresait is no unwise
one. Dost thou remember that last meeting, Teresa
that night when I came to thee with a resolution only
wrought within me by utter despair of fortune? The
seas had swallowed up my hopeand, save my own
heart, and mind, and sword, I had nothing reserved from
the overwhelming rage of the hurricane. In that hour
I turned to thee. I said to my secret soul, `It matters
little what the tempest sweeps away.' I looked on thee,
Teresa, at that moment, and I smiled at the loss, as if
nothing had been lost, but all rather had been won. I
had borne thee from the ruins in that hour. My arms
had bound thy waist. Thy cheek lay upon my bosom,
and while thy heart seemed almost to cease its beatings,
mine throbbed with the convulsive pulses that seemed
only proper to thine. It throbbed with no fear, Teresa,
with no fear for myself, though there might have been
many for thee. It throbbed with hope and tumultuous
rapture, because thy own was pressed against it.
Ah, seor, I have been too long ungrateful. It is to
thee I owe it that I now live.
Nay, my strife to save thee was a selfish one. I had
known no greater pang than to behold thy death. But
I should not speak of this. I have brought back to
thee that fearful hour, to show thee that it was only
in the utter desperation of my fortunes that I dared to
hope. I sought theethou know'st the night!I sought
thee with the devoted fervour of a heart that beheld
nothing
but perfection in thine, as in thy form and face
my eye beheld, as did the eyes of all others, a like
perfection
.
Teresa!Dost thou remember that nightdost
thou remember thy answer to my prayer?
A streak of living crimson passed over the cheek of
the maiden, then, as suddenly receded, leaving it paler
than marble; and the emotion was unaffected with which
she replied, though the reply embodied none of the feeling
which gave birth to that visible glow upon her cheek
Ah, seor, thou shamest me with this recollection. I
pray thee to forget that hour of my folly. Wilt thou not
forgive the wayward temper of a childone too vain of
her power to fear its loss, and only reminded of her
weakness
in the flight and scorn of the person whom she
wrongedonly repenting of her folly when her
repentance
seemed unavailing.
Was it so with thee, Teresa? demanded Vasco
Nunez
in trembling but earnest accents, approaching her
while he spoke.
Alas, Seor Vasco, what shall I say to thee? Wouldst
thou have me confess to thee every woman weakness in
my heart?
No! no! no! exclaimed the too soon forgiving and
forgetting hero. Confess to me but onebut one!
Thou didst love me even then, Teresathen, when thy
wilful lips drove me from thee in desperation.
The answer of the maiden was contained in a deep
sigh, which seemed to escape her bosom unconsciously.
Her head sank still lower on her breasther eyes were
upon the floor, and her little foot played in sight, as if free
from the watchfulness and control of its mistress. Vasco
Nunez was on his knees beside her in another instant.
Teresa, he said, I believe thy silence much more
than I had ever believed thy language. Hadst thou spoken,
I had still doubted the lips that, speaking to me now of
love, had once spoken to me only of scorn. I am too
happy to receive thy sigh, thy look, thy silence, as the
sweet assuring answer, more grateful to my heart than
stronger sounds could have been, of the dear knowledge
which I seek. And yet, let me not forget. Teresa, it is
but fitting I should speak to thee with more resolution of
the manthat I should discard this weakness for awhile
nay, more, that I should seem to doubt thee still. Thou,
perchance, dost not know the strange events which have
brought me a second time to thy feet; and, the Blessed
Virgin forbid that I should avail myself of the necessity
of the father to command the affections of the child. It
may be, thou hast constrained thy heart to favour me,
even when thy affections are elsewhere set, because of
the command or the prayer of Don Pedrarias. Fear not
that I will wrong thee, Teresa. Fear not to speak to me
if this be true; for, I tell thee here, and now, with the
solemnity of one speaking before God, that, though I
know nothing half so precious to me as thyself, yet would
I rather lose thee for ever, and lose lifenay, yield myself
back to the chains of thy fathersooner than that thou
shouldst wrong one true feeling in thy heart. I hold no
power over thee, dear Teresa, from the pledge which has
been made me by thy father in thy name:I take no right
by what thy looks and thy sighs, rather than thy language,
have spoken. Be thou free as air, from this moment, to
love whom thou wilt, if it be that thou canst not, of thy
own free will, yield thyself to my solicitings.
Does the Seor Vasco desire releasewould he be
free?
The proud, artful beauty paused in her speech, but
never did look or accent more clearly denote the
dependence
of a humble hearta heart suffering sacrifice and
utter loss, in the very moment when it declares its
resignation
to its fate.
Teresa, no! Canst thou believe me thus faithless
thus fickle. Give thyself to me freely, and I take thee
with a joy inexpressible, as the most precious of all the
gifts of fortune.
Ah, Seor Vasco, I have no will opposed to thine.
And she sank in his ready arms, as these words,
tremulously
spoken, fell from her tongue, and the kiss which
his glowing lips caught that moment from hersthe seal,
as it were, of the precious bond between themseemed no
less sweet to his heart, than if it had been taken from the
lip of truth and innocence, in the world's morning, and
in the happy garden devoted to its yet unsinning parents.
Conscience slept awhile in the sudden, passionate sway
of all-controlling love; and the poor Indian damsel, pining
at Acla, and looking forth with woful anxiety for the hour of
her lord's return, was utterly forgotten by him in the deep,
stifling sensations of those sweet embraces which he now
shared with the Spanish beauty. The hour of her misery
was yet to come. Neither doubt, nor fear, nor suspicion,
yet approached her heart. She sorrowed for delayed
enjoyment
,
not for its loss. Strange that love, the being of
a thousand instincts and of a wondrous prescience, should
yet lack all foreknowledge of its own desertion. It
worships
and still confidesbelieves to the last; and only
doubts in the end, when nothing is left it but despair.
CHAPTER XX.
THE DAGGER AND THE SMILE.
For
three days Vasco Nunez gave himself up to all the
delights inspired by his new situation at Darien, and every
hour of increased converse afforded him new promises
of happiness in the contemplated connexion with Teresa.
That capricious beauty, maintained, in all this time, the
most equable humility of temper; and whatever doubts
her lover might have entertained before, in regard to the
love she bore him, were all dissipated by the gentle
confidence
which she now bestowed upon him, and the
devoted
pleasure which she seemed to feel in his society.
But the pressing emergencies of his settlement at Acla,
demanded the attention of the adventurer in that quarter,
and as the marriage was appointed to take place at a
remoter
period, it became necessary that he should forego
the happiness, however great, which he felt in Darien, and
hurry away to the scene of his labours. This he did
with a reluctance easier imagined than described; and
his regrets at separation were only surpassed by those of
the maiden. Tender, and frequently repeated, were the
assurances which she gave him of lasting fidelity and
warmest love; and whatever may have been his sorrows
at parting with so dear an object, they were all softened
by the fond conviction that she was at length securely
histhat his period of probation would soon be over, and
he, who, long baffled in all respects, had at length
triumphed over fame and fortune, should at length be
followed by no less success in his labours in the field of
love.
The new feelings of hope and love awakened in his
bosom by meeting with Teresa, could now, separated
from the object of his attachment, be quieted by
employment
only; and his first care on reaching Acla, was to get
in readiness for transportation over the mountains of the
isthmus the materials of the four brigantines which he
intended
to launch into the great south sea. The timber
was felled and hewn upon the Atlantic seaboard, then,
with the anchors and rigging, carried by human labour
over the land. The only roads were Indian paths, which
meandered through forests almost impervious, across
swollen torrents, through rugged defiles, and along the
sides of dangerous precipices. The labourers were
chiefly Indians and negroes. The Spaniards, though
more hardy than their employees, of better muscle, and
better capable of bearing fatigue, were yet few in
number
.
Together, however, with hearty goodwill, they
toiled forward with their massive burdens, ascending
with slow steps the bronze-like mountains, under the
glaring fervour of a tropical sun. Many of them perished
on their way, but the genius and perseverance of Vasco
Nunez triumphed in the end, and after a thousand delays
and disasters, which tasked all his patience to endure, and
all his genius to remedy, he had the proud satisfaction at
last of launching upon the great ocean he had discovered.
Piece by piece had he carried the materials for his ships
over a wild ridge of mountains, occupied by a savage
people that hung in hostility around his footsteps, and
amidst dangers, fatigues and privations, that might well
have daunted a less ardent spirit. The exultation of his
heart may be fancied by the reader, when he found
himself
for the first time upon the bosom of that wondrous
ocean, and in the very pathway, perhaps, to no less
wondrous
lands that lay along its borders. None but
Spaniards, says Herrera, with a pardonable boast,
could ever have conceived or persisted in such an
undertaking; and no commander in the new world but
Vasco Nunez could have conducted it to a successful
issue.
Of the cruise of Vasco Nunez in the southern sea, of
his visit to the Pearl Islands, and his conquests over
hitherto unknown as well as known Indian tribes that
rose in hostility upon his path, it is not within our
province
to speak. These matters may be found in history,
and are already recorded by Irving in his very interesting
chronicles. It may be stated, however, that but for a
change of wind, Vasco Nunez would in his very first
voyage upon the Pacific have discovered Peru,an
adventure
reserved for one of his followersthe least
worthy
,
though not the least brave, of any among them.
Providence, however, did not seem willing in his case,
any more than in that of Columbus, to permit him, who
led the way to conquest, to perfect its details. There is
a moral justice, perhaps, in reserving for succeeding
times and genius, those achievements which, by
increasing
the wonders in one man's performance, might
strengthen too greatly his claims upon the gratitude and
admiration of mankind, insomuch as sometimes to weaken
the hold of the Creator himself upon them. It is enough
for genius to lead the way at first;if it did not tend to
the evil result already contemplated, it might at least
subtract
from the renown of the discoverer, were he to carry
on his labours to the minute developement of all its results.
The ice once broken, the petty voyager may make his
way in safetyit is glory enough for Columbus and
Vasco Nunez, that they possessed the eye to see and the
wing to reach, in advance of all, the realms which they
respectively
gavenot to Castile and Leon, merely, as the
epitaph of the former idly expresses itbut to the world.
Let the humbler adventurer penetrate its rivers, dig its
mountains, and cast nets into its seas for the pale, white
jewels of the deep.
While Vasco Nunez was thus triumphantly riding the
billows of the southern sea, the youth, Pedro, watched
all his movements with a hostility duly sharpened by
each day's additional experience. When the former,
with that daring spirit which alone seemed to have
effected all his purposes, was pushing his way to
conquest
,
as it were, in very spite of fortune, the admiration
of the youth had been superior to his hate. His resolves,
and the influence by which he was wrought upon to
suspend
the stroke of his meditated vengeance, are already
known to the reader in the progress of this narrative. It
is also known by what circumstance he was prompted to
renew his oath of hostility, and to forget those more
generous sentiments by which he had hitherto been
VOL. II. 17
governed. An abstract passion for justice, stimulated
into feverish restlessness by the presence of a continually
goading enthusiasm, rendered him fanatical in his angry
mood; and the weaknesses of heart by which Vasco
Nunez had resolved upon an act which would sacrifice
the Indian girl who had confided in him so entirely,
provoked
the indignation of the youth anew. He saw
nothing
now but the infidelity and baseness of the man
whom he was sworn to slay for a crime which personally
wronged him. He now brooded with constant thought
upon his resolution; the difficulties in the way of
performing
which he never disguised from himself.
I know that I must perish, he would mutter to
himself
;
his arm would crush me at a blow; and even my
stroke, however well aimed, his unarmed hand could
parry if he beheld it. Thus should I lose life, yet fail in
my purposed vengeance. I must do it while he sleeps.
If the blow be justif the vengeance be due to the crime
then is the mode most fitting which is most certain and
most secure. There is no dishonour, as fools fancy, in
such a deed. Yet, would it were that I could encounter
with him as the strong man loves to encounter with his
fellow. But the wish is idleit may not be. This
powerless
arm!what could it hope against the muscle and
sinew of Vasco Nunez?
He surveyed the small and shrivelled member with a
bitter smile, and his skinny and childlike fingers relaxed
the hold which they had hitherto kept upon the dagger as
he uttered these words. The weapon fell upon the ground
at his feet. He stooped, and without lifting, sat down
beside it, and leaning forward with his elbow upon the
long grass, he looked forth upon the broad ocean
purpled
by the setting sun, and dotted in the far distance
by the white sails of one of the brigantines in which
Vasco Nunez was then coasting. They were then upon
the lovely shores of Isla Rica, in which the adelantado
had fixed his temporary abode. The waters of the
ocean were as serene as those of some mountain lake,
locked in by a circlet of protecting hills. The tide, rising,
threw its successive billows upon the bleached sands of
the island with a gentle violence that murmured only and
did not complain. A deep blue sky, almost as
transparent
as the waves which reflected its every aspect,
relieved
,
not impaired, by a few floating islands of white
fleece, hung above him; soft, bright, and beautiful enough
to declare the heavens behind, which it yet curtained from
his gaze. The scene impressed itself upon the spectator,
but did not alter his mood.
Even now, said he, gazing upon the distant
brigantine
as if he could behold upon her deck the person of
whom he spakeeven now he is looking forth upon
these waters, without a thought that they will change.
He beholds them soft, almost smilingscarcely less
beautiful
than the folding skies aboveto him more beautiful,
as they promise to carry him forward to conquests
greater than any he has yet achieved. His fortune, too,
has at length put on an aspect of peace and promise.
His bitterest enemy has become his best friendthe
woman
who had scorned, smiles upon him. On all hands
the hostile fates seem to have given up their warfare, and
to have folded their adverse wings in token of amity.
Grown confident of fortune he has now no fears, and he
would as soonnay, soonerlook for the hurricane in
yonder thin speck of fleece, as look for an enemy in me.
He would laughha! ha!he would laugh, were he to be
warned against my dagger. He would stretch forth his
arm, and smile as he surveyed it, and dismiss all fear of
mine. Let him not be too sure of his strength and of my
weakness. They must both be tried. This nighthe
resumed the dagger as he spokethis night will I seek
him where he sleeps. He hath no guard, and the Indian
girl only sleeps beside him. It were easy to pass among
the leaves which shroud them, yet awaken neither sleeper.
One blow, and thou art avenged, my brother. Thou shalt
chide me no longer with this profitless service in behalf
of thy murderer. Thou shalt haunt me no longer with
thy frowns.
It was night ere the brigantine drew near to land. That
day Vasco Nunez had made many discoveries, which
filled his heart with joy; but it needed not new
discoveries
to produce this sensation in his bosom, now that
he found himself in possession of the desired power, and
in the path of his desired conquests.
Lo! you, he said to Micer Codro, as in the mild
breath of that lovely evening they sat together by the
sea-shore, and looked upward and around, beholding in
sky and ocean no aspects but those of beauty and
repose
Lo,
you, Micer Codro, if I err not, that evil star
of which thou hast spoken to me so oft, still hangs red
and ominous within the rim of my good planet. Is it
not so?
It is even so, my son, replied the other with gravity;
the aspect is even more evil now than on the night when
I guided thine eye to it at first.
Behold then, continued the adelantado with playful
humour, the wisdom of those who would suffer such
predictions as thine to baffle them in their labours, and
prevent them in the performance of their most noble
works. Had I put faith in thy predictions, Micer Codro,
I had gone to my prayers rather than to my works, and,
perchance, had suffered the defeats and death which lay
within thy prophecy. Even now what error can be more
clearly shown than this of thine. Looking on that star,
which seems innocent enough to mine eyes, as surely it
hath so far shown itself harmless to my fortunes, thou
wouldst even now declare that I am in imminent peril of
my life;yet, here am Iwithin reach of all my wishes,
sound in health, the favoured of Pedrarias, with four
brigantines and three hundred brave men at my bidding.
Nay, morethe hopes of my heart, which had been so
long baffled and denied, now made secure in the
acceptance
and the avowed love of Teresa Davila.
It is in the calm that the storm has its birth, my son,
replied the astrologer with increasing gravitydeath
follows life like a shadow, and he only can fall far who is
uplifted high. I rejoice me that thou hast so far triumphed
over the fate which has lain in waiting for thee. It is
my prayer that it may yet be baffled, and that thou mayst
pass from triumph to triumph, and from joy to joy, with a
heart and hope growing younger at every step which thou
takest. But when thou thinkest the fate baffled which
has pursued thee, it may be delayed only. All day the
tiger, that ever-hungry beast, pursueth with hot haste the
affrighted traveller, till, as he reacheth him, he croucheth
low, and for the first time stays him in the pursuitnot
that he relentethnot that his limbs have grown weary,
or his tooth no longer gnasheth for the feast of bloody
flesh. No! he pauseth but to crouch, and he croucheth
but to spring. Even such is the pursuit of the hounds of
fate when once they are set upon the footsteps of the
victim
she hath chosen. Be not too bold, then, to thinkfor
that thou no longer hearkenest to their hungry barkthat
she hath relented of her hate, that she hath called them
in to the leash, and hath altered her resolution. If thou
hopest thus, yet be not so confident in thy hope, as to
forget thy caution, thy moderation, thy humility. He
who would be great enduringly must never forget that
he is human. To secure immortality, it is a condition
that we should also feel our state to be some time mortal.
Oh, Vasco Nunez, my son, think not that I speak to
discourage
thee. Though I warn thee, I would not thou
shouldst ever despond. If I speak to thee of gloomy
things, it is because I look on gloomy sights. Thou hast
grown doubtful of the language of those blessed signs
of heaven, which I reverence, and wouldst hear me with
a scornful smile, and give little heed, were I to tell thee
now that thy hour approacheththatha!
The adelantado would have spokenhe would have
said in the language of deprecation, that he did not scorn
the science which the old man loved;but the other
suffered
but a few imperfect words to escape ere he
interrupted
him with a vehemence, the result of a sudden
impulse, of which he did not himself seem to be
conscious
Ha! what is it that I see?the clouds rise, they part
a curtain is drawn asideI hear cries and clamours.
Holy Mother, Blessed Jesu! what may this mean?
what terror grows before mewhat danger waits? I
see it now, as once before, when I stood among the iron
mountains. The bloody signs are again before my sight.
Oh, Vasco Nunez, my son, my son!thou art again
threatened
with the smile and the dagger. The axe swings in
air above theethy knees bendthy neck is bare to the
stroke. Spare himFather of Mercies!be nigh to save
him. It is not too late. Let the arm be stayedlet the
cruel judge relentbid the headsman go down from the
altar-place of death. Jesu! the cloud rolls backthe
curtain fallsI am blindI can see no more. Dost thou
yet live, Vasco Nunezdo I see thee, do I feel thee yet,
my son? Ha! It may be that the danger has gone by.
Thou mayst yet be spared.
17*
Nay, Micer Codro, thou dreamestI am yet beside
thee.
Ha! ha! but indeed I saw thee not. That dreadful
sightthat sudden dangermy soul was tossed in
terror
my
mind was gone. But I see it no more. It was
a bloody vision.
Vasco Nunez arose from his recumbent position upon
the grass, as his ear caught the sudden and wild accents
of the excited astrologer. The transition from the grave
and temperate speech with which the old man had
begun
,
to the impetuous torrent of full and frenzied
rhapsody with which he concluded, absolutely stunned
him for the instant. He drew nigh, and would have
interrupted
him in the midst of it, fearing a sudden
paroxysm of madness; for never before, in all his
experience
,
had he beheld him in such a mood; but the other
heeded him not, and did not seem even to see him.
His looks were elsewhere,his soul seemed set on far
other objects. He sank upon his kneeshis eyes were
wild, staring and starting, as if the bloody vision which
he described was indeed at that instant passing before
them. His hands were convulsively shot out from his
body, as if in arrest of the threatening blow,his voice
raised hoarsely, almost shriekingly, as if dreading to be
unheardexcluded all other sounds but its own. Big
drops rose upon his forehead, and stood out clear to the
sight of his companion in the rich evening starlight. His
limbs shivered while he spoke, as some aged and
decaying
tree of the forest in the quick, keen blasts of
December
;
and, at the end, when the scene which his
imagination
beheld, seemed shut in from his sight, in the far
western
eminence of heaven, he sank and fell forward upon
his face, seemingly without life as he was without motion.
Vasco Nunez lifted him from the ground, and seated him
beside him upon the turf. His eyes were open, but the
expression was wild and vacant; the mouth was wide,
almost spasmodically parted; and the stiffness of all his
limbs was such as to induce an apprehension in the mind
of his companion that they had already become fixed in
the unrelaxing grasp of death. But at that instant,
without
speaking, the old man lifted his hand and pointed
suddenly to the quarter of the heavens in which he had
watched the star of his friend's nativity. The eye of
Vasco Nunez instinctively followed the direction. At that
moment, a cloud, which he had no where seen before
in the heavens, passed over the rival starsthe good
and the evil aspect alikeand completely shrouded them
from his gaze. The hand of the astrologer dropped
almost lifelessly beside him; and the strong man and
fearless warrior, however greatly his experience had
moved him to question the certainty of the astrologer's
prediction, was yet moved with a feeling of reverential
awe, which he vainly strove to dispel. He would have
spoken the language of mirth, or indifference, at least,
but his voice failed hima husky whisper escaped his
lips, and no more. The tongue clove to the roof of the
mouth, and a silence, like that among the stars, hung
over the two for the space of many minutes.
The old man resumed the conversation.
I cannot mistake these signs, Vasco Nunez. I tell
thee danger awaits thee. The fate which has so long
hunted thee still hangs upon thy heels:it is for thee
still, by diligent watch and calm wisdom, under God's
smile and sanction, to elude it, as thou hast done
heretofore
.
Thou hast still to watch and pray, my son:
watch for the foe, and pray for the deliverance. But my
soul is heavy in thy behalf, Vasco. Full fifteen years
have we sped together, and I have loved thee as my own
son. Thou knowest how I have loved theewith a
feeling
no less strange to age than to youth. Thou hast
seemed to me from the first, one commissioned to do
wonders, and I have yearned for thy greatness as if it had
been a greatness of my own. Would I had been called
at the blessed hour when we stood together on the peak
of Darien, and beheld for the first time the silver waters
of the strange sea below. I had been spared a constant
apprehension, which leaves me now, as thou seest, faint,
feeble and cast down, as with a nameless affliction. Give
me thy arm, my son. I need thy help even to the shelter
of yon tree, where I watch, rather than sleep, the starry
evening away.
Shall I give thee help, seor? demanded a voice at
the side of the adelantado, while he assisted the aged man
from the earth.
Ha! thou there, Pedro?
The astrologer looked on the youth with a keen,
piercing
glance of his light gray eye, and then remarked
Surely I have seen that face but nowit has passed
strangely before me to-night.
True, my father, replied Vasco Nunez, it is Pedro
thou shouldst knowthe secretary.
Ay, ay! that I know, my son, continued the old
man sharply, but methinks I have seen him elsewhere
to-nightI have not beheld him on the island.
A fear touched the mind of Vasco Nunez that the
thoughts of the old man wandered, and saying nothing
to provoke farther excitement, he assisted him to the
shady palm, under which his sylvan couch had been
prepared
.
Hast thou heard this old man's prophecy to-night,
Pedro? demanded Vasco Nunez, when they had left
Micer Codro to his repose.
No, my lord, answered the other hesitatinglyand
falsely. I drew nigh at the moment when he claimed
the help of thy arm. What is the prophecy, seor!
Nay, Pedro, if thou hast not heard, it will be of little
profit to thee now to hear. Away to Francisco
Compa
on,
Pedro, and bid him get the brigantines in
readiness
by dawn. The breeze will favour us at morning,
and the longest life were too short to see all the wonders
of this vast ocean. I would make the most of mine.
Away,
Ay! exclaimed the youth, as he proceeded on his
way to the brigantines where Compaon commanded
Thine will be shorter than thou thinkest. Yet, is it
not strange that this old man, Micer Codro, should hit
so rightly upon the danger of Vasco Nunez? True, as
he would say, never seemed fortune more favourable
to man than his at this hour to him. Should there be,
indeed, a language in the stars which one might read!
Yet why should it be thus imperfectly written? Why
should Micer Codro, if he beheld it, go no farther? He
spoke of a scaffold and public execution, yet of this
there is truly no danger. There was something of a
smile and daggerthe dagger is surely in my hand,
but, Blessed Mary! I have not smiled this season, nor
do I think I shall ever smile again. But here are the
brigantines.
Meanwhile Vasco Nunez proceeded to the pleasant
grove which had been assigned to Careta, and where, with
a fond but usual impatience, she sleeplessly awaited him.
A rude tent formed the sleeping apartment, in the front of
which, the free use of hatchet and axe had robbed the
primitive wood of another chamber, scarcely less
compact
and close. A narrow entrance through the dense
shrubbery was concealed by a heavy dark Spanish cloak
suspended from the branches, and no eyes but those of
the unsuspicious stars were able to penetrate the thick
enclosure.
Ah, my lord, thou art slow to seek the poor damsel
of Darien. When the great cannon of the big canoe
made thunder to tell of thy coming from the sea, I looked
for thee, but thou camest not.
But I am come now, Careta.
Ah, yes, my lord, and I should be happy, and should
now forget that thou wert ever gone, but that I fear,
thou lovest not the poor Careta as once thou didst. Thou
art ever in the big canoe, in which I fear to go, and if thou
comest to me at last, it is to leave me soon again.
The reproaches of the girl were not wanting in truth,
and they went to the heart of the hero, who, whatever
might have been the greater warmth of his feeling toward
Teresa Davila, was too gentle in most respects, and too
conscious of the right, even if he did not pursue it, not to
recognise the justice of her complaints.
The conscience that smote him for his treatment of her,
made him sometimes anxious to avoid her; and to a proud
man the very feeling which sometimes compelled his eye
to sink when it met the sudden glance of hers, was a
source of mortification too humiliating to be felt
complacently
,
or incurred without regret and disquiet. He
now sought her chiefly at night, when all his emotions
were concealed from all eyes. It was a pang still which
he could not quiet, when he found that there were eyes
in his own soul from which he could conceal nothing.
But now that I am come to thee, Careta, thou shouldst
forget all things but that I am present.
Oh, I do, I do, my lord; even when I tell thee of thy
delay, I tell thee with a smile upon my lips and a joy
within my heart. But now thou wilt not need to delay
so long. Thy ships are builtthou wilt stay here at Isla
Rica, or thou wilt go to Coybathou wilt go no more to
Darien, where thy enemies dwell.
Nay, I have now no enemies, Caretathou need'st
suffer these fears no longer. All now are friends to
Vasco
Nunez, here and in Darien.
At that moment the youth, Pedro, lifted the cloak at the
entrance, and slowly crawled within, sheltering
himself
among the leaves and branches of the outer
apartment
.
He heard the words and clutched the dagger
firmly, while he was conscious of a derisive smile that
passed over his features.
By the Holy Cross, this Micer Codro hath speech of
the devil. Said he not the smile and the dagger? Of a
truth they are here together. And his resolution of
revenge
derived strength in his mind from his remembrance
of the astrologer's prediction.
CHAPTER XXI.
LOVE BAFFLES THE SHARP STROKE OF VENGEANCE.
The
winds slept, and the waters of the sea broke in
gentle murmurs that night upon the lovely shores of
Isla Rica. The serene clouds lay smiling among the
troops of stars that gathered in watchfulness above the
secret lands which were soon to be revealed to less holy
eyes and less gentle powers than their own. No sounds
but those of the ever-sounding deep broke upon the ear
of the evening. The little island on which the warriors
of Vasco Nunez slept, scarcely felt the motion of those
cradling billows by which it was encircled; and to the
half-opened eye of the dreaming cavalier, some more
curious stars than the rest, as if deceived by the universal
silence on the shore, stooped down from their high places,
and swung in air just above the hammock where he
slumbered
.
The deep, sweet, half-suppressed breathing of the
zephyr came afar across the waves, even from the
gardens
of the Incas, and dropping odour where it lingered,
added the charm of mystery to the holier spell of silence;
and strangely sweet, indeed, to those who still kept
wakeful among the Spanish host, were the passingly
serene effusions of that solemn night beside the sea; and
late, indeed, was the deepening hour when they all slept.
A sensation of fond disquiet, that prompting hope of the
future and the doubtful, which is always a discontent
with the ambitious nature, prolonged the musing
meditations
of all; and, to a certain extent, the vague hopes
and expectations of Vasco Nunez,the dreams and the
fancies, such as grew up naturally in the mind of one
who had found so many wonders, and was now
professedly
in search of morewere also those even of the
meanest soldier under his command. The Spaniards of
that day, whatever may have been the avarice and
brutal
bloodthirstiness of their natures, were yet of a soaring
and swelling temper. There were few among them
utterly insensible to the desire of making themselves
famous among their fellow-men; and there was none so
humble of heart, or so lost to that desire to challenge the
moral echo which prolongs a favourite name among the
habitations of humanity, as to encourage no favourite
fancy, no chosen idol of his individual worship,
sometimes
,
indeed, even at the expense of the great idol of his
tribe. Each had his own faith in the particular influences
of fortune, and none of them despaired of the realization
of those dreams which, in another and a soberer hour,
they had themselves smiled at and derided. In a scene
such as that which they then occupied, in a night so
surpassingly
lovely, on an island surrounded by the billows
of that ocean but a little while before discovered, and
upon which they had just then launched for the first
timetheir prows pointed to strange lands, to the
dominions
of people of whom wonder already spoke in
winged and fairy accents, while experience stood silent in
no less wondersleep might well grow a stranger to
their eyes. It was in vain that their leader strove to
sleep. The very hopes in his mind and heartthe
successes
which he had achieved, and the wonders which
his imagination yet continued to create for him still to
conquer,grew painfully exhausting to the spirit which
they suffered not to sleep. Hour after hour had passed
by, and still he watched, with burning and impatient
thoughts, the twinkling lustre of the starlight, as the
dropping silver of its rays fell among the green leaves by
which he was surrounded. The damsel, in the innocence
and confiding fondness of her heart, already long since
had sunk into a pleasant slumber beside him. He gazed
upon her imperfectly-seen but lovely features with a
painful interest; and his conscience smote him with a
keen pang when he thought of his engagement with
Teresa. She was the more beautiful, but how true had
been the Indian damselhow faithful and how fond.
How she had clung to him when the danger from
Pedrarias
first threatened himhow she had rushed to him in
prisonhow she had declared her willingness to die for
him, as for him only she seemed to care to live. These
thoughts renewed the recollection of his own conduct and
the self-rebuke which was inevitable in a mind habituated
by education, and strong also in natural instincts, to love
justice
for its own sake, and to idolize virtue. He shrunk back
from the subject on which his heart did not seek to justify,
and failed utterly to excuse itself. Great as Vasco Nunez
was in the contemplation of the warlike and adventurous
world, he yet lacked that important essence of genuine
and enduring greatness, the rigid resolve, in spite of
passion
,
of prejudice, human fear or human hope, in all cases
to be just. The seductions of beauty, the clamours of the
crowd, the thirst for continued conquest, all combined to
make him set aside, if he was not utterly unmindful of,
the claims of the poor Indian; and with a guilty weakness
at his heart,a cowardice of which the shame that he
felt could not relieve himhe turned his eyes away from
the placid and sweet features of the confiding woman
whose head lay upon his arm, and strove, with closed
eyes, to shut out, in forgetting sleep, the obtrusive and
exciting thoughts, no less than the reproachful memories
which had kept him so long wakeful. At length he slept.
His deep breathing soon apprised the anxious and
revengeful
Pedro that the hour was come, and the victim
at his mercy. He put aside the tangled leaves among
which he had shrouded himself, with a calm and careful
hand. He advanced into the area of the sylvan
antechamber
,
and finally stood at the entrance of that into
which it led, and where Vasco Nunez lay. He stopped
at this spot. His grasp of the dagger, had taken hold,
along with the handle of the weapon, of a part of the long
sleeve of his doublet. He cautiously rolled up the sleeve,
and it was a subject of satisfactory surprise in his mind
that he felt himself so cool and collected. His limbs
seemed as rigid as if the flesh had been all muscle.
He stept, and felt as if his nerves had on a sudden been
hardened into steel.
This is as it should be, he muttered to himself. If
there be little strength in my limbs, there are, at least, no
tremors in them. If my arm be feeble, there is yet no
feebleness or fear in my heart. A single strokebut one
well given and well placedwill acquit me of this
sworn performance. Hold your lights fairly, ye stars,
that I may see where to rest the keen point of my
dagger
.
The same resolution attended him as he advanced into
VOL. II. 18
the chamber. Not a nerve yielded as he stood beside the
rude forest couch on which Vasco Nunez and the damsel
slept. The broad manly bosom of the adelantado, from
which the covering, in the warm summer night of that
bland atmosphere, had been discarded, lay bare to the
stroke. He stood above him, and his arm was uplifted.
Deep sleep was upon the warrior. His limbs lay
motionless
.
But an ill-directed strokea blow to graze the
breast, not reach the heart, would rouse him into
instantaneous
and dangerous life. For the first time, the
assassin
felt an emotion. It was not fear, but anxiety that
moved him. Not the dread of his enemy, but that failing
to strike fatally, he should be for ever after defeated in
his purpose. He would most probably fall before the
powerful arm of the stricken man ere he could strike a
second. His own breathing for the first time became
suspended. It was needful that his blow should be justly
aimed, and he stood between the starlight and his victim's
breast. He changed his positionthe full, broad chest
of the warrior, scarred already by many weapons, and
bronzed by frequent exposure to a fierce sun, lay open to
his sight and weapon. With an eye as clear, and a spirit
as free from any sentiment of fear or apprehension, as
might be found in the most obdurate of all bosoms, Pedro
prepared himself for the performance of his act of
vengeance
.
Yet, perilous as was delay in such a situation,
his nature was one of that contemplative character which
did not seem satisfied merely to strike. It was thought,
however erring, not impulsenot blind hate, or
unreflecting
passionwhich made him resolve to be an assassin;
and, indeed, but for this thought he had not proceeded so
coolly to his dreadful work.He, a mere boy, feeble of
limb, unfamiliar with deeds of strife, unskilful with the
very weapon which he wielded!
One blow, truly aimed, and this mighty man sleeps
for ever. This man that has conquered nations and is a
wonder to his ownwhose giant energies have
overpassed
and broken down all barrierswhose courage
has dared all dangers, and whose genius has left all other
wings behind himlies now at the mercy of the feeblest
follower of his train. What a blow will that be which
slays him. Acla and Darien will hear his last groan.
His fall will shake, not Darien only, but Spainand I!
Will they know me for the assassin,will they ever hear
that the arm which struck the man of most might in this
strange world, was that of one feeble as a woman? It
matters little to me what they know or hear. It matters
less what they conjecture. Enough that I am sworn.
Jorge, my brother, be nigh me at this moment and
approve
!
This blow avenges thee on thy murderer! Vasco
Nunez, the smile and the dagger meet above theethou
diest!
The bright steel gleamed suddenly upon the opening
eyes of the damsel. A wild shriek from her lips answered
his half-spoken soliloquy, while her hand, thrown up by
the prompt instinct of affection, caught and arrested the
arm of the assassin, ere the blow could reach the heart at
which it was directed. The dagger's point hung
suspended
above itits course controlled and defeated by
the two opposing hands.
Ha! my lord! awake! arise! Help, help for my lord!
was the rapid and renewed cry of Careta; but her words
were spoken in her native language. Forgetting her
imperfect
Spanish in that moment of her terror, she could
articulate none other than her own. And vainly, by its
fervent and frequent repetition, did she strive to arouse
the sleeping warrior. Her terrors increased as she
found that, in spite of all her clamours, and the struggle
going on above him, between herself and the assassin,
she could not break that apathetic sleep which enveloped
his person; and which, so tenacious was it of the hold
taken upon the wearied limbs of the chief, almost led her
to fear that some blow, given by the murderer ere she
awakened, had already taken fatal effect upon his life.
His deep breathing only reassured her at length, and but
once, amidst all her cries and struggles, did it seem to be
suspended. He turned uneasily for an instantmuttered
some indistinct words, and relapsed into a sleep as heavy
as before. Bitter was the exclamation which in her own
language she made, as the conviction reached her mind
that the assassin might escape from her grasp and renew
his assault, before her efforts to arouse the sleeper to his
danger could prove successful. Her prayer was now in
Spanish to that protecting mother whom she had been so
recently taught to invoke. Her own strength was fast
failing her, and the struggle was continued with renewed
violence on the part of the assassin.
Blessed Virgin! Holy Mother of God! strengthen
me!preserve my lord!
A whisper from the assailant reached her ear. The
voice was disguisedthe accents came to her with a
hoarseness that tended still farther to terrify her.
Pray rather that he may be destroyedhe loves thee
not, Careta.
Who speaks thus to Caretawho art thou?
The enemy of Vasco Nunez.
Ha! Then I hate thee. Ho! my lord,my dear lord!
Arouse theeawaken! There is an enemy beside thee.
A man who would slay
Fool! Thou takest pains against thyself. He loves
thee not. He loves and is to wed with Teresa, the
daughter
of Don Pedrarias, who is now at Darien. Give me
way, that I may avenge both thyself and me!
But his words tended only to impel the faithful woman
to renewed clamours and greater efforts. The struggle,
long as it may have taken to describe, so far had lasted
but a few moments only. The assassin vainly strove to
induce her silence, by whispering words of startling and
vexing import to her ears, and, failing in this, as he could
not hope that the warrior would possibly sleep on in spite
of the continued shrieks which she uttered, it became
necessary
on his part to make an effort, at least, for his own
release. The desperateness of his situation rendered this
effort effectual. He broke from her hold, not without
some difficulty, and then, as he saw that Vasco Nunez
still slept, and unwilling to forego the opportunity in
availing himself of which he had been so far baffled, he
prepared in the next instant to renew his attempt. But
the moment of his extrication from the grasp of the
damsel found her erect, between him and his sleeping
victim, and ready to receive in her own bosom the
weapon
,
if she was no longer able to baffle it. But her
clamours, though even then they had failed to waken the
destined victim, yet roused up others in the encampment,
less rigidly bound than himself in the chains of sleep.
Lights waved in the woods and glared among the leaves,
and the sound of approaching voices might be heard in
more than one quarter of the encampment. Cursing his
weakness of hand or perversity of fortune, the assassin
prepared to depart. A single imprecation escaped his
lips, as his eye glared with furious animosity upon the
woman who had baffled him, and upon the victim, who
still lay, so far as his own powers of resistance were
involved
,
completely at his mercy. But the moment had
gone by, and he was now compelled to think of his own
escapenot that life might be saved, for of that the
avenger had little carebut that his vengeance might
yet find an opportunity, and use it with better fortune.
Still collected and resolved, he made his way out of the
enclosure with equal certainty and stealth, by the aperture
through which he had entered; and in the uncertainty of
vision produced by the glare of the approaching lights,
Careta knew not that he was gone until, under the
guidance
of her now awakened lord, the search made after
him proved utterly unsuccessful. It was no small
addition
to her annoyance that Vasco Nunez ascribed her
terrors
solely to her fancy. He laughed at her fearsboldly
declared the assassin to have been the creation of her
dreamsfor
How idle, he continued, to suppose that such a
strife should take place over a soldier's bosomhe quick
to waken at the smallest alarm,and be prolonged, as
thou sayest, Careta, for such a space of time. Thou hast
dreamed a frightful dream, Careta; such as might have
troubled thee when I lay in prison at Darien. But thou
forgettest I am in Darien no longerthat my enemies there
are now my friendsthat
The tears filled her eyes, and her accentsfor she
interrupted
him at this momentwere tremulous with pain
and fear. A new recollection filled her mind, and one
of the events of the struggle already related, came
freshly to her recollection for the first time since it
occurred
.
It may be a dream, my lord; nay, now that I think
of it, it must have been a dream. I had speech of the
assassinhe spoke of thee, my lord, as his enemynay,
more, he said thou wert mine.
Thinethy enemy! exclaimed the chief, with a
laugh; that is enough to show thee it was a dream that
troubled thee. None had surely told thee so great a folly
with a hope to have been believed in his falsehood.
I did not believe him, my lord; but he said thou wert
18*
to wed with the daughter of Don Pedrarias at Darien
that thou didst not love thy poor Careta.
Ha! said he this, Careta? demanded the adelantado;
and could she at that moment have beheld his pale and
guilty features, she would have found in them but a
melancholy
confirmation of what his lips denied.
Even such were his words, my lord.
It was a dream that troubled thee, Careta, said the
chief, in slow accents, and after a brief pause. Let it
trouble thee no more. Get thee to sleep, my girlget
thee to sleep.
But he himself returned not to the couch to which he
despatched the damsel. There was that of guilty
reproach
in his heart, which would not suffer him to sleep.
There was a strange apprehension also. Things, so
far, strangely tallied with the prediction of the
astrologer
.
The dagger had threatened himand the fact
stated by Careta, as having been communicated by the
assassin, convinced him against his own assurances to
her, that it was no dream. There was an enemy near
him, hostile to his lifebase enough to attempt it while
he slept; and, though baffled for the moment, yet no
doubt sufficiently earnest in his resolution to renew his
bloody purpose. The threatening danger aroused his
wonted promptness and decision. He put on his armour,
and went forth into the encampmentcommanding at the
same time the presence of all his little army at the
brigantines
.
His suspicions, if he had any in particular, lay
among his officers. He knew the jealousy and vain
ambition
of that class of Spaniards, and his eye, in the
keenness
of which he had great confidence, seemed to scarch
their very souls while he looked into their faces. But
he dismissed them, without discovery, to their several
duties.
With the dawn, he said to Francisco Compaon, the
captain of one of his brigantines, be in readiness for
the cruise among the Pearl Islands. It lacks but little
more than two hours to the time. I shall be upon your
deck with the first glimmer of the gray. See that you
be not sleeping.
Pedro, the secretary, appeared with the rest, with a
countenance more calm, and nerves less discomposed
than any among that array of hardened men. When
the rest were dismissed, the two walked together toward
the tree where they had left the astrologer to his repose.
While they went they spoke of the late alarm in the
encampment
.
I should have thought it but a dream, said Vasco
Nunez, even as thou say'st, but for the speech which
Careta tells me the assassin made her.
He then related the communication touching his
projected
marriage with Teresa.
But why, my lord, may she not have dreamed this
also?
Scarcely, unless she had some previous knowledge of
the fact.
This she may have had.
Impossible! I have studiously withheld it from her;
for, to speak to you a truth, Pedro, my heart misgives
me that I do her grievous wrong. I would it were not
soI would that she had less feeling for meI dare not
send her from me; yet, ere long she must know alland
then
A smile of bitterness passed over the secretary's lips
as he spoke: What need the Adelantado of Darien to
heed this matter so greatly? The girl is but an Indian
Hush, Pedro! I like neither the words thou say'st,
nor the tone in which thou speakest them. The girl is
but an Indianbut what an Indian! How truehow
fondhow faithful! True, fond, and faithful to Vasco
Nunez when nearly all other hearts in Darien were false.
No more of this. The matter is strange enough to
make me thoughtful, and threatens enough to make me
careful. Henceforward thou shalt sleep in my outer
chamber. I can trust thee, Pedrothee, perchance, and
none other in all this array, unless it be Micer Codro.
I am sworn to thee, my lord!even in death be sure
I shall not be far distant from thy side, replied the youth
with a warmth that seemed to confirm the force of his
words, the equivocalness of which was unperceived by
the speaker.
I thank thee, Pedro; and it is of no small consolation
to me in the strife with so many open foes, and so many
secret traitors, that I can turn to one, even though his
arm be feeble like thine, with confidence and trust.
Thou wilt not always deem my arm feeble, seor
there will come a time
Nay, Pedro, think not I reproach theeI deem
thy arm strangely feeble, only when I contemplate the
strength of thy spirit. But this should be the tree. What
ho! Micer Codro!
The summons was unanswered.
Methinks, said Pedro, I behold the old man
walking
upon the beach before us. His white beard gleams
like so much silver.
It is he. Let us join him.
My son, said the astrologer, when they met, since
thou left'st me I have been watching these strange signs.
The dagger threatens thee no more. It is the smile only
which thou hast need to fear.
Nay, I have no fear of either, Micer Codro, though if
all that is said be true, thy prophecy is sadly out; for this
night have I been threatened by the dagger when there
was too little starlight to behold a smile. But comeget
thyself in readiness for the brigantineget thy scales,
thy glasses, and thy measures. This day will I take thee
over all the Pearl Islands, where, I trust, the treasures of
earth which thou shalt find, will make thee for awhile
forget
those capricious and deceiving lights of heaven.
Shall I not also attend thee, seor? demanded the
secretary.
No, Pedro; thou wilt need this day to finish the
despatches
for Don Pedrarias; and I have a note which thou
shalt copy for Hernando de Arguello. The Leon
brigantine
departs for the Balsas this day, should the wind
favour, at noon; and that hour thy despatches must be in
readiness for Lope de Olano, whose messenger, with
tidings from Darien, will be at the Balsas awaiting her
arrival. There must be no delay in this. In our next
voyage thou shalt go with usbut nowthere is yet
another reasonin a whisperKeep thine eyes about
thee here at Isla Rica. Thine eyes are keener than most
others. I mistrust that some creature of Enciso is among
us. None other could have sought my place of rest with
the dagger of the assassin. Seize, if thou suspectestI
give thee full power to this end.
CHAPTER XXII.
THE FLIGHT OF THE AVENGERLOVE KEEPS THE FIELD.
An
hour had scarcely passed from the departure of Vasco
Nunez on his course for the Pearl Islandsthe brigantine in
which he sailed was hardly out of sightwhen the
secretary
,
Pedro, was surprised by the visit of one, the last person
he expected, as it was, perhaps, the last person he desired
to see. This was no other than the damsel of Darien.
She chose a moment for her visit when the secretary was
alone. He started to his feet as he beheld her. There
was some little precipitateness in his manner, but a
solemn deliberateness about hers. He offered her a seat,
but she refused it. He would have urged it upon her
with that respectfulness of attention which he had been
ever accustomed to pay to one so distinguished by his
employer, and who, however equivocal might be her
station
in a social point of view, or however inferior her
birth and connexions in the estimation of a European,
had been always with him a subject of sincere regard.
He knew that, though deceived, she was virtuous; and
though lovely and possessed of power, she was no less
gentle and complaisant than good; and at a time when his
Indian wife was a favourite topic of sneer with the meaner
enemies of Vasco Nunez, he was one of the few who
never deemed her undeserving of that high distinction.
Indeed, his own hostility to the adelantado was renewed
as he discovered the injustice of the latter to the damsel,
as he beheld the weakness and deficiency of a mind
which could sacrifice such profound devotion and so pure
a heart because of its savage origingiving a preference
to another, simplyas he believedbecause of her
European
birth,or in compliance with a yet baser argument,
for the rescue of a forfeit life. She rejected his courtesy,
and for a few seconds contemplated his features in silence,
but with such a look of deep, serious regret, that his
apprehensions
for the first time grew quickened on the subject
of his last night's adventure, and without being able
entirely
to conceal his impatience, he desired to know of her
the purpose of her visit. He was soon answered.
Seor Pedro, I have discovered the person who would
have slain my lord last night.
Ha! can it be, seora? Speak, Caretadost thou
indeed know?
Her eyes were riveted upon him with the piercing
keenness of fascination, as she replied
Ay, Seor Pedro, it is a great sorrow with me that I
do knowthe more so, as the criminal is one whom my
lord greatly trusts. Seor Pedro, thou art he!
I,ha!Who! Careta, this is a strange jest. Why
should I do this thing?why should I seek the death of
the Seor Vasco?he who hath been so good to me ever
whobut it is thy sport, Careta. It is thy mood to
sport with me to-day.
Alas! for meit were a great sin if I could think to
sport on so dreadful a matter. I have no heart for sport,
Seor Pedro, for next to the sorrow which I have at my
lord's danger from his enemies, is the great grief at my
heart, Seor Pedro, that thou shouldst be among them
thou whom he has ever trusted among the first, and to
whom, as thou thyself hast said, he hath ever been a
firm friend.
But I am not among his enemies, Careta; and as for
this strange humour of thineif thine indeed it bethat
I have lifted weapon against himsome evil person hath
possessed thee against the truth
No more, Seor Pedro, she interrupted him with
solemn emphasis; speak no more in denial of thy own
shame. The truth is against thee, and there is proof.
Ha! Proof, say'st thouwhat proof?
Without a word she unclasped one of her hands which
had been hitherto so closed as to conceal its contents,
and revealed to his eyes the fragment of a frill, such as
were commonly worn at the sleeve by the gallants of that
time and nation. His eyes instinctively fell upon the
wrist of his right hand, where the other portions of the
frill, rent and torn, were at that moment visible. Hitherto,
the injury which it had sustained in the scuffle had
entirely
escaped his sight. His thoughts had been too busy
elsewhere to suffer his eyes to do their ordinary duties;
and though writing with the fragments continually
presenting
themselves before him, he had not been in the
slightest degree conscious that they exhibited any other
than their usual appearance. This sudden revelation
the action, look, manner of the damsel, all announced to
him that in her mind she had arrived at the fullest
conviction
of his criminalityand the sudden paleness of his
cheeks, and the sinking of his eyes beneath her glance,
against which he vainly strove, and of which he felt
painfully
conscious, were enough, he well knew, to confirm
her suspicions, by whatever doubts they may have been
qualified before. He stammered out a farther denial of
the accusation, though admitting what he could not deny,
that the frill was his. But his words failed utterly to
affect her convictions. She answered him calmly and
without hesitation. She forebore all language of hate
and denunciation. The enormity of his offence, indeed,
seemed to deprive her, in the consciousness of her
imperfect
modes of speech, of all power of reproach.
This, Seor Pedro, is from your sleeve. I found it in
the tent of my lord, and beside his couch where he slept
last night. It lay in the very spot where I struggled with
the person who came to slay him. Oh, Seor Pedro, how
you have deceived my lord! How will he hearhow
will he believe that you, whom he so much trusted, have
been the person to seek his life!
The secretary went to the entrance of the tent, which
he carefully examined before answering; then returning,
he prepared for a conference, the details of which might
have moved a hardier villain, yet were inadequate to
disturb
to any great degree the fixed and fanatical resolution
of his mind. He saw that the circumstance which had
apprised
Careta of his guilt was one that, once known, must
be almost equally conclusive to all other persons. Feeling
assured that any attempt at denial would be vain, he
resolved
upon a bolder, and, perhaps, more manly course.
Wherefore should he hear it, Caretawhy shouldst
thou tell him of this?
How! Wouldst thou have me take part with his
enemy?
Ay, if his enemy is your friend. If his enemy, doing
himself justice, avenges you at the same moment. Hear
me, Careta,seeing she was about to interrupt him with
a very natural expression of indignationVasco Nunez
has deceived you. He told you that you were his wife
according to the Christian law, but the Christians
regard
you not as his wife, nor does he himself give you
such a title, nor have you such a claim. Ere long he will
tell you otherwiseere long he will give that title to
another
.
Know from meI spoke the words in your ear
last night, but you would not hear and would not believe
he is sworn to wed Teresa Davila, the daughter of
Pedrarias, and his late visit to Darien, when he left thee
behind him at Acla, was to meet with and to see her.
I believe thee notI believe thee not now, no more
than I did last night. My lord is ever good and
honourable
.
He took me from my father at Coyba as his wife,
according to the law among the Christians, and such I
am, and such he will make me ever. He can make no
other his wife. He hath ever called me such, and if it be
as thou say'st, that he went to Darien to see this lady,
wherefore is it that he hath left herwherefore is it that I
lie even now within his arms?
Yet is all true that I tell thee, Careta. The condition
by which Don Pedrarias released him from prison in
Darien, was that he should marry with his daughter.
This he hath sworn to doand this, Careta, I tell thee,
will he do, utterly regardless of thy affections, and the
promises which he hath made to thee and to thy father.
Seor Pedro, it were death and shame for me to
believe
thee. It were death to me, since it were such
sad shame to my lord. I cannot believe thee. My
lord hath been ever true to me and good. He hath ever
kept his promise to the poor Indians, my peopleand to
me, that, if there be truth in thy speech, am the poorest
Indian among them. It is not true, for my lord hath
never spoken to me of this.
Nor will he, till it may be questioned no longer. Thy
first knowledge, Careta, of the truth from him, will be
heard when the Lady Teresa stands before thee as his
wife, and commands thee as his slave.
Slave thyself, and liar as thou art! Leave mefly, I
tell thee, thou bad man, that speakest of my lord such
things as belong only to thy own base thoughts! fly,
while he is yet absent from this island. Speed thee away
in this ship that goes to-day to Darien, for, so sure as
my heart is true to my lord's nobleness, will my lips
tell him of thy crime.
Her lips quivered with her gradually increasing
emotion
,
which, swelling against restraint, now burst all
bounds, and poured itself forth in language in which
her inadequate Spanish was liberally filled out by the
rapid rushing sounds of her native tongue. The veins
upon her brow were risen into ridges, and those upon
her throat seemed cords that grasped and threatened
her with that suffocation which appeared also to be no
less threatened in her thick and choking utterance. Her
figure, which was naturally small, seemed to rise and
expand with the provocation, and her extended hand,
as she bade him fly, was lifted with a majesty which
might have furnished a lesson of united grace and
dignity
to the most polished and finely tutored princess of
the royal race of Christendom. The now inflexible eye
of the secretary gazed on her with a mingled expression
of pity and admiration. In his thoughts, at that moment,
he felt no anger, and nothing but sympathy. Her scorn,
and the keen language from her lips did not vex him. He
only thought of the moment when the truth should
become
known to her, no longer to be doubted, which she
now denied with such warm confidence and hostile
expression
.
Yet, Careta, but awhile. If this should be true that
I tell theesay that I prove it to be truethat Vasco
Nunez
is to wed with Teresa Davila
Thou canst not prove itit is not true, she replied
impetuously. He patiently repeated the words, and
proceeded
If I can prove it to thee by the lips of Micer Codro?
I should sooner believe that Micer Codro had grown
false like thyself, than believe this baseness of my lord.
Let me not hear thee longer. How should I believe thee
thou that speakest to me evil of my lord, only when
thou hast been thyself shown guilty of the worst of evil
designs against him? Thy dagger has been lifted
against his heart, even when his heart most believed in
the goodness of thine. Seor Pedro, I would not have
thee die by a cruel death. Goleave Isla Rica ere my
VOL. II. 19
lord returneth; for it may not be that I shall keep from
him the truth.
Hear me, Caretashall I prove to thee by thy lord's
own words that he is bound to wed, by his own promise,
with Teresa Davila? Look, here is his own letter to
that damsel, new written, and to be sent this day to
Balsas.
She turned away her head in haste.
I would not see it even if it be true, and, as thy falsehood,
I still would look away from it, as dishonouring my lord.
Thou canst not persuade me, Seor Pedro. I will believe
nothing against my lord which is spoken by his enemy.
Wilt thou not believe me when I swear?
No! How should I believe thee, when thy daily life is
a lie? Dost thou not walk beside my lorddost thou not
smile when he speaksand dost thou not hearken to his
secret thoughts, and counsel him as if thou wert his
certain
friend, even when thou wouldst strike him with thy
weapon? Shall I believe his words, whose actions are
so false? No, no! From thy lips I will believe nothing.
The secretary paused a moment. Rapid thoughts
rushed through his mind. It was necessary that he
should resolve quickly. He saw at a glance that there
was no relenting on the part of the Indian damsel; that
no assurance of the faithlessness of Vasco Nunez could
produce a like faithlessness in her, even if he could
succeed
in persuading her to credit his own assurances.
Her resolution seemed equally certainas, indeed, there
could be no reasonable hope on his part that it should be
otherwisethat the return of the adelantado from his
cruise would be the hour of his own exposure. A
desperate
resolve passed through his minda horrible idea
by which he hoped to escape this danger, and remain
at the same time in the neighbourhood of his victim.
Shall I now, he thought to himself, be driven by
this woman from the revenge which I have so long
meditatedwhich is an oath written in heaven, and
which the spirit of the injured dead hath been invoked
to witness? No! Driven hence, I lose all present
prospect
of my vengeance, and the tongue of this woman
leaves me to the hostile and destructive rage of Vasco
Nunez, who will inevitably pursue me to the death. That
were nothing, could I destroy, also, in the hour of my own
destructionbut that cannot be. There is yet another
mode. Careta!
The last word was spoken aloud, and he advanced as
he spoke towards the damsel. Without suffering his eye
to lose its immediate hold upon hers, his hand, unobserved
by her, possessed itself of a dagger, which hung with
other armour against a tree, around which his sylvan
tent had been erected. Grasped firmly in his left hand,
the blade was turned upward and concealed behind his
arm. He approached her with slow steps, and his ear as
he moved was keenly alive to the stillness of the scene
without. As if unassured, he looked once more to the
entrance of the tent. The very billows seemed sleeping
upon the shore. The hundred details of a cruel scheme
of murder and concealment went through his mind in
regular order in the short minute's space in which his
eyes were thus employed.
A single sudden blow, thus ran the terrible musings
of his mind, and she is silenced for ever. This wide
waste of waters will bear her beyond sight of the keenest
eye, and there are none near to behold the stroketo hear
the cryto see or to speak. Careta! he exclaimed
returning
;
thou art resolved then to hear nothingneither
thy lord's crime against me, nor that which he has
meditated
against thyself. Of what avail will it be to thee
that thou shouldst tell this to Vasco Nunez, and show
that thou lovest him in spite of all his injustice, when, but
a little month shall pass, and thou wilt be doomed to
behold
another in his arms?
Thou hast already filled my ears with this, Seor
Pedro
.
Have I not said to thee that I believe it not?
Thou art then resolved to give me up to the vengeance
of thy lordnothing but my death will appease thee?
Nay, the Holy Virgin forbid that thou shouldst die.
I wish not that. Do I not tell thee to depart ere my lord
cometh? Were it not for the safety of my lord, my lips
should be sealedhe should never hear of thy crime. No,
no! Go where he may not find thee. Go, where thou
mayst turn to be sorry for thy evil thoughts. In the
country far over the waters my lord will never find thee
nay, I promise thee I will beg that he will never seek
after thee. I will beg him to forgive thee, and to forget
thy crime.
Poor fool! exclaimed the secretary half aloud; in
a little time what will thy prayers to him avail theeand
thy promises to me? Thou little dreamest thy own
discarded
destiny. Thou little knowest thy own wrongs
the abiding hopelessness of that heart which is so
completely
the slave of another's that it will believe no evil of
its tyrant. Thou wilt yet pray for mefor thy avenger!
I cannot strike her now. It were a blow against the
purest innocence. I am not sworn against virtue but
against evilnot against the weak but the strongnot
against the just and gentle, but the bloody-minded and
unjust. No! There is yet another mode. I will try that.
Careta! I will obey thee. See! I mean thee no evil
this dagger was but now lifted in my hand to slay thee.
I had sworn against the life of Vasco Nunezthou wert
in possession of my secret, and when, in thy blind
devotion
to that man, thou refusedst all ear to my accusation
against him, my first thought was to silence thee, that I
might still be nigh to work out my vow of vengeance.
But I look on thee with too much admiration to strikeI
pity thee, for what the future will bring thee, too much to
heed the opposition of thy will to mine, and the scorn and
hostility which thou breathest against me. I will leave
Isla Rica, even as thou counsellestbut the hour will come,
Careta, when in thy secret thought thou wilt say, the blow
which was aimed by my hand at the breast of Vasco
Nunez
,
and which thy woman hand hath baffled, had been a
blow no less sweet to thy heart than its success had been
to mine.
Never, never! The Holy Virgin strengthen and
preserve
me from such a sinful thought. It glads me, Seor
Pedro, that thou goest from Isla Rica. Thy dagger
alone could have kept me from speech to my lord of the
crime which thou hast meditated against him; and Careta
had been only too happy to have died for him, could it be
that her death had saved his life. Go!I forgive thee for
what thou hast thought against me; but I cannot forgive
thee that which thou hast felt against my lord. Thou
mightst have slain me, Seor Pedro, but even with the
blood going out of my heart, I had told thee that my faith
in my lord is fast. Thou canst not move me in that,
whether
I live or die.
Thou art worthy of a better faith, Careta, replied
the secretary, gazing on her with pity and admiration,
and I would that my prayer might find thee a better
fortune
.
Alas! for thee; I shall one day see thee more
desolate
than myself. I leave thee.
Go, seor, and let thy prayer be for thyself and not
for Careta. The Christian God hath been very kind
already
to the poor Indian. I am bidden to have faith in
him, and from what he hath already shown me of his
favour, I were blind and foolish had I not. May he favour
thee, Seor Pedro, and make thy heart wise to love only
that which is good.
Thou wilt yet curse him and die! exclaimed the
secretary
,
as he left the tent and moved towards the
sea-shore
.
She made him no answer, but her hands were clasped,
and her eyes lifted up to heaven, with an expression in
which the serene, relying, hope shone out with a
tenderness
of aspect that looked most like love, and yet was
religion. In another hour and the brigantine left Isla
Rica for the river Balsas, bearing in her the secretary of
Vasco Nunez, no less revengeful in his mood than before,
and, perhaps even more resolved upon its execution, from
that defeat of his design which had ended in his exile
from the victim.
19*
CHAPTER XXIII.
THE AVENGER BUSY AT A DISTANCE.
The
secretary of Vasco Nunez sped with all despatch
from Balsas to Acla, and from Acla to Darien. It was
fortunate for his purposes that just at this time the usual
objects of the exploring expedition required that a large
brigade of soldiers and labourers, still employed in the
transportation of materials and supplies across the
mountains
,
should set out on their return journey. As the
confidential secretary of the Adelantado of the South Sea,
bearing his despatches to Pedrarias, the representations
of Pedro were received without question, and his
forward
progress facilitated without any scruple, by those
officials who might, upon any hint of the truth, have
readily arrested him. But the ill fortune of the
conqueror
prevailed, and his enemy reached Darien in safety,
and in a space of time, for those days, and in that difficult
and perilous journey, of unusual shortness. It was then
that he came to the final resolutiona resolution which a
sense of personal pride had baffled long beforeof
making others the agents of that vengeance which he
had found himself unable to execute. As soon as his
mind felt itself undivided in the pursuit of this one object,
he dismissed his former scruples. A ready sophistry
reconciled him now to agents and artifices which he had
scorned before; and his first visit in Darien was to one
whom he had sufficient reason to know was the bitter
enemy of Vasco Nunez. This was Francisco Pizarro.
The scornful smile, the sharp, contemptuous question, and
the rude, brutal demeanour of this bloody soldier, did not
now offend him.
Seor, said he, I have now the means to serve you
to meet your former desires, and please Don Pedrarias.
I have it now in my power to convict the Seor Vasco
of treasonto show that he designs to throw off the
government of Darien, and with his brigantines pass to
the provinces bordering on the great South Sea, beyond
the jurisdiction of Pedrarias.
Thou art late with thy proof, replied Pizarro. How
know we that Pedrarias will believe these things of one
pledged to be his son-in-law? What are thy proofs of
what thou sayest? Whose testimony beside thy own canst
thou offer in support of thy charge?
Proof shall not be wanting, was the answer; and
if thy former desire hold on this subject, Seor Francisco,
thy question might have been spared. Thou mightst
easily get proof which will maintain the truth of my
assurances
.
But this shall not be lacking, as I tell thee;
and when I assure Don Pedrarias, moreover, that it is
scarcely the purpose of Vasco Nunez to become his
son-in-law
that
he still clings to the Indian woman
Couldst thou show this, perhaps?
It were easy. Pedrarias hath no love for Vasco
Nunez
.
It was in a moment of fear that this treaty of
marriage
and reconciliation was patched up, and only by the
means of the Archbishop Quevedo. He is no longer here
to keep his agreement whole, and help his ally through
thick and thin. How many enemies hath Vasco Nunez
made here in Darien, all of whom rage against him. The
Bachelor Corral hates him with an unforgiving hate, which
would destroy wherever he might dare. Alonzo de la
Puente is no less his foe. Thou, thyself, hast found a
ready confidence, in what thou sayst, in Don Pedrarias;
and methinks there is a natural bias against the
adelantado
in his mind, because of the rivalship and better
fortunes
of Vasco Nunez, which will make it easy to persuade
him of the truth of my declaration. Nay, more, I have
papers of the adelantado, under his own hand, which will
greatly help to establish it against him.
Let us go to Pedrarias on the instant, was the
answer
of Pizarro. Thou art in the right spirit for good
fortune, Pedrosee that thou shrink not from it. Speak
to Pedrarias as thou hast spoken to me, else it shall be
worse for thee now. I am not to say these things as
from thy authority, from which thou thyself shalt
afterwards
depart. Be thou firm, and mislead me not, if thou
wouldst not eat my dagger.
Thou wilt find me no less firm than thyself, replied
the youth. Nay, I should prove myself so even more if
in thy dagger's spite, and utterly in scorn of thy threat.
Such have I shown thee already, Seor Francisco, of a
temper which needs no word from thee to make it
resolute
,
whether it be in defence of a friend, or in
prosecution
of just vengeance on a foe.
Thou shouldst have a better strength for thy dagger,
boybetter limbs and more masculine manhood for thy
tongue. Thy spirit were more becoming were it more
modest, for audacity and weakness, when they go
together
,
make the geese grinthou shouldst know the
proverb. But I speak not this to anger thee, he
continued
,
as he beheld the ghastly paleness on the youth's
cheek, and the dark crimson hue which succeeded it
since thy boldness angers not me. Be thou as resolute
before Pedrarias, to repeat what thou hast said to me,
and thou wilt find no better friend in Darien than
Francisco
Pizarro. I rather like the frankness which becomes
insolent, than the timidity which grows treacherous and
strikes, like a hidden snake, with full venom at the heel.
Yet,a brief pause followed at this point, which seemed
sufficiently appropriate after the utterance of a sentiment
so truly at variance with the real principles of the speaker,
and one which brought something more than a smile upon
the lips of his companionyet, Pedro, he continued,
though in truth, it will nothing help this business
forward
,
yet would I know wherefore now thou shouldst be
the enemy of Vasco Nunez, that, but a little space ago,
was his most trusted and serviceable friend. These
changes happen not without a cause; and yet, according
to thy own showing, to the moment when thou leftst Isla
Rica thou wert still his approved secretary.
I have served the Seor Vasco, and served him
faithfully
,
replied the youth gravely, but I never was his
friend. From the first I have been his sworn but secret
foe. Nay, more, even when I served himwhen I
declined
to serve thee against himI was sworn to slay
him. Ask me not farther of this matter, Seor Francisco.
It is enough that I am now resolved to put my oath in
execution. I have been a foolish boyflattered with
shows of greatness and dreams of glory, and blinded no
less to the truth than to my duty. That hour is past
the scales have fallen from my eyes, and though I wield
not the dagger with my own hand for his destruction, it
is not the less effectually my blow, when I arm with it
the hand of another more capable to strike.
That is true, but here is the Plaza, said the rough
soldier, comprehending in part only the somewhat
mystical
solution which his companion gave him of that moral
perversity in his course, which it required a nicer
judgment
than his own readily to reconcile. Now, Pedro,
see that thou keepest to thy story. It will not be hard,
as thou sayst, to make Pedrarias believe. He fears the
successes of Vasco Nunez, and will not be slow to hate
where he fears. I will move him to these fears by other
facts of which I have knowledge; and there is more to
alarm him in this matter touching Vasco Nunez and his
daughter, than thou dreamest of. This damsel, when she
dwelt in Espaola denied Vasco Nunez, in his prayer for
love; there is nothing strange, but much that is
reasonable
in the thought that he means not to wed her now
that he will fling back her hand into her father's face,
when he has once laid a clean keel on the waters of the
great South Sea. Let me but show this image to the
mind of Pedrarias, and the jealous old man grows furious.
Boy, thou shalt speed well for this.
As Pizarro anticipated, it was any thing but difficult to
awaken in the mind of Pedrarias all his old suspicions of
Vasco Nunez, and all the hostility accordingly, which had
so persecutingly pursued him before. Many
circumstances
contributed to swell the torrent of imputation
which was raised against the distant and unconscious
cavalier. A long interval had followed his last departure
from Darien, and he had failed to communicate to the
governor his projects and achievements. The very
despatches
which he had prepared to send by the
brigantine
which bore the secretary to Balsas, were in the
possession
of the latter, and suppressed for his own
purposes
from delivery. To this it may be added, that there
were in the hands of the secretary some documents which,
in their imperfect and incomplete condition, tended in
some considerable degree to confirm his
misrepresentations
.
It was shown clearly that Vasco Nunez had not
been without some idea of ridding himself of the
governor's
control, in the event of his being able to launch his
vessel upon the great sea which he had found; and though,
to the unprejudiced and unembittered mind, it would have
appeared equally clear upon inquiry, that these
memoranda
had been made, and these ideas formed, at a period
preceding the late compromise between the parties, yet
the pertinacity of Pizarro, and the positive asseverations
of the secretary, completely blinded the despotic governor
to all consideration of reason or justice on this subject.
He yielded, as had been predicted, to a passion of fury,
which only suffered itself to be quieted at last by the
conviction that his enemy, as he deemed him, was beyond
his power; and believing, as he did, the representations
of the conspirators, his natural fear and inference were,
that, being now fairly in possession of the means equally
of flight and independence, Vasco Nunez would soon bid
him defiance. It was not the policy, however, of those
who sought the destruction of the latter, to suffer him to
rest in this last conviction; and Pizarro showed many
reasons for his assurance that it was the policy of the
cavalier to maintain an appearance of good faith with his
superior for some little time longer. It was at length the
conclusion of the parties that Vasco Nunez was a traitor,
and should suffer the punishment of one. But how to
get him into the power of Pedrarias was now the only
difficulty. If his designs were such as had been ascribed
to him, it was scarcely reasonable to suppose that he
would tamely yield himself to punishmentit was equally
improbable that he should not exercise a large degree of
precaution towards the man in relation to whom he
meditated
so much faithlessness. He had now four
brigantines
,
all well manned and afloat, upon an ocean,
the whole world of which was fairly before him, where to
choose. Three hundred picked menhis own devoted
followersthe old soldiers of Darienmen who had
already shown their love of their commander, by the
readiness with which they had turned out at the
summons
of a mere boy, for his rescue from the prison to
which Pedrarias had consigned himthese were at his
bidding, and immediately under his command. They
could not be withdrawn from him on any pretence not
calculated to provoke suspicion, and any open attempt
even under the seeming sanction of the law, openly to
arrest
him, would, it was evident enough to every
understanding
,
arouse him to instant defiance and
insurrection
.
The governor was bewildered, until the more wily
secretary came to his assistance.
It seems to me, your excellency, he said, that this
matter is not so difficult as you suppose. To summon
Vasco Nunez to Darien, to answer charges against him,
would be, it is true, most likely to defeat your object.
But why do this? The easier course would be to express
no suspicionsto utter no chargesbut to write to him,
as beforeto invite him, not to Darien, but to Acla, whither
he well knows you have already resolved to go. There
are motives enough which would justify your desire to
meet with him, if it were only to confer on the subject of
the intended expedition; and the more effectually to
disarm
his suspicions, should he have them, it were not
unwise
to counsel your daughter to write him, as if of her
own heart, desiring his presence also. Meanwhile, care
should be taken that such of his known friends as are
here in Darien, should be seized and silenced. Hernando
de Arguello, who hath large interest in the fortunes of
Vasco Nunez, should be at once arrested on any plea
but kept from communication with Acla and the Balsas.
There are others, his officers, one of whom is here and
two at Acla, whom it were no less important to arrest
with all despatch. These are Valdebarrano, Hernan
Muos, and Botello. I know that these men counsel
Vasco Nunez of all the doings in his absence at Santa
Maria and Acla. This done, silently, and what more?
Nothingbut to await at Acla for the coming of the
traitor, with a force strong enough to secure him. The
Seor Francisco, I doubt not, can bring together in short
time a strong band to go forth and seize him, while he
comes unsuspectingly with the messenger whom you
despatch for him to Isla Rica.
Such were the counsels of the secretary, and they
were such as readily commanded the entire ear of
Pedrarias
.
They were accordingly adopted, and measures
taken for their prompt execution. Arguello was arrested
that very night, and Gaspar Nino, a man known to be
faithful to Pedrarias, yet one who was equally well known
for his mild and just deportment, was chosen, with three
others, equally inoffensive, to bear the deceitful despatches
to Vasco Nunez, and to accompany him to Acla. To
this man, though the words of Pedrarias conveyed no
knowledge of his sinister determination, his manner, at
once angry and restrained, conveyed a signification of
the truth, which the arrest of Hernando de Arguello
contributed
to strengthen. He said nothing, however, but
set forth without scruple in the performance of his duty;
leaving the conspirators in anxious expectation of the
results of a scheme, of the success of which, forming
their inferences rather with regard to their own evil
objects
than to any just appreciation of the character of
their noble victim, they had as many doubts as
expectations
.
These doubts were stronger in the mind of the
governor, than in those of his counsellors and agents.
They were more sanguine, from a better knowledge of
the frank, confiding simplicity of Vasco Nunez, of the
success of the expedition; and Pizarro, exulting in his
hopes, was in no wise sparing of the applauses which he
now bestowed upon his heretofore despised coadjutor by
whom the plan had been devised.
That was a shrewd notion of thine, Pedro, he said,
to get the letter from Teresa Davila, for of a certainty
Vasco Nunez loves that woman; though she hath, if I
may believe the eyes of woman, but little thought of him.
That letter will bring him, be sure, even were all other
artifices to fail. He will put his head into her lap, and
she will call the enemy, even as the worthy Jeronomite
father tells us was the case with the strong man of old
made captive by the heathen Philistines. It were now
worthy question, if Pedrarias declared the truth to his
daughter ere she wrote the letter.
The curiosity expressed by Pizarro was echoed by the
secretary, and remembered by the latter long after the
former had forgotten the sentiment. The question was
one which, considering the past tenor of our narrative,
may possibly arise in the minds of our readers also; and
it may not be ill advised briefly to detail the particulars
of the interview between Pedrarias and his daughter
when the former sought her with this object. He
suppressed
all the knowledge which he had obtained by the
secretary, except the simple fact of his arrival; and this
circumstance alone, as the latter had brought with him
no communication from her lover, or, at least, had
delivered
none to her, was, of itself, enough to occasion
some suspicion or surmise in her mind, that all things
were not as they should be. Still she smoothed her
features
into that simplicity of expression which innocent
confidence ever wears, and cunning sometimes imitates
so well, and listened calmly to the language of her father,
whose success in a like effort to be calm was scarcely so
successful. But Teresa saw not, or affected not to see,
the half-stifled disquiet struggling in his features and
rising even in the tones of his voice.
Teresa, my love, despatches will leave Darien by
to-morrow's
dawn for the Balsas on the Southern Seait
should give thee pleasure to send greeting to the Seor
Vasco. I would have thee write him a letter filled with
thy fondest follies. He is a brave, noble gentleman, yet
he seems to love these thingsbe no wise sparing of
themthou mayst safely requite him; for, of a truth, I
think he loves thee very much.
Yea, my father, so, truly, would it seem. His love
hath taken from him all power of speechall expression!
There hath comeif the tale be rightly toldthere hath
come his secretary, directly from the Seor Vasco, yet
he brings me no word, no speech, no token. Even were
it a matter of so great speed that time were not suffered
for a letter, yet, methinks, there are pearls of that
Southern Sea not unseemly as a token from its adelantado
for the damsel to whom he hath pledged hand and heart,
and for whom his love is held to be so excessive. When
he hath shown more heed of Teresa Davila, he shall have
like heed from her. It were scarce seemly that I should
pen missives to one who hath shown no such
remembrance
of me.
Pshaw, Teresa, would thy father demand of thee any
thing unseemly? There is nothing in this, believe thee
nothing to make thee doubtful of the regard of the Seor
Vasco. He hath had great trouble in launching his
brigantinesthere were matters calling for his eye and
hand, so that time has not been left him for these passing
tokens. But he did not forget theethere were words to
which, truth, I paid little heed, which the secretary poured
into mine ears, and which were solely meant for thine
and now, I remember me, they were words of such
customary
VOL. II. 20
tenderness that I held it scarce needful to give them
very watchful ear. He hath not forgotten thee, Teresa,
be sure.
The secretary shall take like words of tenderness
back, replied the maiden quietly; thou shalt tell him
as from me, my father, what in thy own wisdom would
be seemly for a damsel to say to her betrothed.
Thou
Demonios! I will do no such thing. I tell thee, it is my
wish, Teresa, that thou shouldst write! exclaimed the
other impatiently. It is of useit hath an object
beyond
what thou seest in thy girlish simplicity. Thou
shalt write to the Seor Vascothou shalt speak to him
in that idle language in which girl feelings overcome the
better and properer sense, and tell him of thy love and of
thy lack, and of the joy which his presence should bring
thee. Nay, more, thou shalt implore his presence at
Darien, as of a wish in thy own heart, which, I trust me,
he will be scarce able to withstand. Dost thou hear me,
Teresadost thou hearken to my words?
Truly, my father, these are strange requirements.
What is thy meaningwhat wouldst thou have of me
what of the Seor Vasco?
Of thee, obedienceof himBut why do I prate?
Do thus, Teresa, and let it suffice thee, that all things
thy father's governmenthis fortunenay, perhaps his
lifeall rest on the presence of Vasco Nunez here in
Darien. Seek not to inquire farther. Is not this
enough?
Enough?Ay! But still, wherefore, my father,
wherefore, if the presence of the Seor Vasco be so
needful in Darien, dost thou not send thy own
despatches
?
Would he obey themwould he come? demanded
the other precipitately; then, conscious of having
intimated
a doubt which he would rather have suppressed,
he continued, though confusedly, in an awkward
endeavour
to qualify or explain his hasty utterance
Launched
on that strange sea, and, perchance, on the eve of new
discoveries, it may be, Teresa, he would not so much
regard
my wishesbut thinethine! Teresa, write me
as I would have thee. I tell thee again, it is a matter of
great need, and lifethy father's lifeis, perchance, a
thing to depend upon the success of thy despatch in this
matter.
The daughter keenly eyed the old man's countenance
as he spoke, and read there that language which he had
been vainly striving to hide. His anxiety on the subject,
and the utter absence of any good reason why he should
not summon Vasco Nunez himself, if he desired his
presence
at Darien, and if he meditated nothing hostile
against him, or had no suspicions of his fidelity
furnished
strong conjectures to her mind, which led her very
nearly to the truth. Had she really loved Vasco Nunez, she
would have obeyed without reflection, since to have the
loved one near her, would have led her instantly to that
obedience to a father's commands, in the recognition of
which the desires of her own heart were so immediately
consulted. Without such a feeling she was enabled
to analyse his, and calmly to reflect upon what he said;
and her conviction, the result of her prompt examination
of the matter, apprised her of the truth as clearly as if her
father had confided to her his true motives for the urgent
wish which he declared. Her deliberative silence, while
she thought of these topics, and the growing intelligence
which appeared in her countenance, at length compelled
his deliberation also; and a moment's calm survey of her
features, the first, probably, which he had made during
their conference, almost led him to the belief that his
secret was discovered, or, at least, strongly conjectured.
This presented to his jealous mind a new subject of alarm.
Thinking it not improbable, in spite of her refusal of
Vasco Nunez, that she might now have some attachment
for him, as, indeed, nothing would have seemed more
natural than that she should entertain some such
feeling
for one, who was at that period the admiration of
a whole world, he began to fear that she might not only
refuse to second his wishes, but apprise his enemy of the
danger that threatened him at Darien. His keen, earnest,
and anxious glance, when she perceived it, startled and
offended her; and a deep crimson suffusion of her cheeks
attested the presence in her mind of another
consciousness
which the governor could not so well appreciate. If
she believed the designs of Pedrarias to be hostile to
Vasco Nunez, she was absolutely conniving against her
betrothed to hearken to the application of her father; and
a sense of propriety, even if she lacked all love for the
destined victim, made her feel her present conduct, if she
was convinced of his danger, criminal in the last degree.
On this head she had no scruples so long as she preserved
her secret; but to suffer her father to believe that she
conjectured his designs, was to compel her to declare
against his application. Her momentary fear that he had
made this discovery, produced the accusing blush which
mantled her cheeks for an instant. A happy thought
accounted for the suffusion and her scruples at the same
instant.
My father, you ask too much from your daughter.
Must I seek the Seor Vasco, who surely hath been little
heedful of my claims? Shall I write to him in the
language
of my heart, when he hath been so chary of the
expressions of his own? It is a hard duty, and my cheek
may well burn me and glow like fire while my thought
dwells upon it. But thou hast saidthy will shall move
me to this, when it would better please my own to say
nothing to one who, perchance, at this very moment, has
no thought of me. But ere I write, I must see and speak
with this messenger. I would hear from him the
language
of the Seor Vasco, that I may be the better able
to shape my own in reply.
Thou shaltyes, thou shalt see himthough, truth
to speak, it is but a little matter that he will tell thee.
But let not his tidings move thee to speak coldly to the
Seor Vasco. Let thy words clip and cling to him,
Teresabe warmbe fondI will not chide thee, my
child, though thou breathest a fondness which would pour
fire into the cold veins of a Jeronymite, so that thou
bringest him to thy feetso that thou bringest him to
meet us in Acla.
There was yet another suffusion on the cheeks of the
maiden.
It is thy danger, my fatherthe danger to thy life
only, my father, which should move me to such
unseeming
fondness as that thou speakest of.
Wouldst thou have better reason? I tell thee, Teresa,
as the holy friars would tell thee, that holding ever the
good end in view, even the employment of the evil agent
becomes a hallowed necessity before God.
CHAPTER XXIV.
THE SCALES CLOSING FAST OVER THE EYES OF THE EAGLE.
The
secretary of Vasco Nunez received his instructions
from Don Pedrarias before he was despatched to the
presence
of his daughter.
She hath consentedshe will write, were his words,
and write as we would have her, beguiling the lion to
the pit, though she knows nothing of our purpose. She
would, however, first hear from thee those pleasant
remembrances
,
so sweet to dreaming boys and half-fledged
maidens, which, to such are natural enough, and which I
have persuaded her the Seor Vasco entrusted to thy
keeping for her ears. I have given her to believe that but
for pressing toils and urgent necessities, alone, he would
have written those tender matters at large, which he hath
otherwise been compelled to give to thy charge in spoken
words. I am but ill suited to repeat these toys which
thou wilt manage better than myself. See that thy
invention
be more fertile than minelet thy fancy couch
fairly, and spring with a free pinion, for I trow such is
the sort of speech of most lovers, and of the Seor
Vasco, chief among them. He hath a high and swelling
utterance, as if all Castile was mighty in his throat.
Manage thou thy part rightly, and this swelling spirit
shall be brought as low as revenge itself could wish.
Remember, only, she hath no thought of this. I fear me
she loves this traitortraitor as he isand would warn
him of the danger, did she fear it, though the warning
sped the arrow of death at the bosom of her own father.
Be ripe, Pedro, in thy caution. Weigh thy words
let none which are light escape thee. Seest thou not
20*
how I am beset all around? My own wife deems nobly
of this wily traitor, and hath not spared her censure
when she hath found me hostile. Wife, daughter, friend,
captain, all hath his cunning moved to work against my
will. Be thou faithful, and thou shalt grow superior to
them all in the favour of Pedrarias.
The secretary heard this communication with
ill-concealed
scorn.
This base creature, who would make his own child
the instrument to destroy one whom he deems she loves,
he fancies that in this behalf I toil for him. Would it
were that I did not. That it were not needful, in securing
my own purpose of revenge, I should toil for his also.
I am his tool, his agent. Ha! ha! Have I not
sharpened
his dull wits and jealous fears, that he should be
mine?
Such were the thoughts of the secretary, as he left the
presence of the governor. The commission entrusted to
him now was in no wise disagreeable. A minor
sentiment
made it gratifying. He was curious to note in how
much the maiden might suffer loss by the death of Vasco
Nunez.
I believe not, said he as he went, this story of her
love for him. The old man, Micer Codro, hath more than
once, in mine own hearing, counselled Vasco Nunez
against too much faith in her words; and from other
tongues than his, I have learned to look upon her as
one selfish, cold, jealous, and malignant as Pedrarias.
We shall see. It is well I destroyed not the letter of
Vasco Nunez. It will help this purpose to yield it to her
hands. But how? It hath been told her that I brought
none. Stay! There is no trouble in this. The tender
speech of lovers is nothing for public ear. The doves go
apart from the flock in the season of their affections, and
it is easy to say, I was bidden to give this letter in secret
to my lady's own hands. This will dothis will do; and
for the rest, as the skies counsel.
Teresa Davila was surprised by the presentation of the
letter from her lovera circumstance that somewhat
added to the difficulty of comprehending the relation in
which her father stood with him. The plausible talk of
the secretary which naturally accounted for the ignorance
of Don Pedrarias on the subject of this communication,
contributed still more to the conviction that there was
something wrong between them; and, it followed, in the
perusal of the letter, which in fact contained nothing more
than those ordinary expressions of attachment which were
to be expected in such a communication, that her prompt
imagination did not fail to detect much that was occult
and mysterious. Single expressions were seized upon
here and there, upon which to build some considerable
structures of suspicious conjecture, and when, from her
conversation with Pedro, she discovered that Vasco
Nunez
was in fact, if not in law, utterly independent of her
father, and might bid him defiance and prosper, her subtle
mind readily understood the fear which had seized upon
that of the governor, and in which she did not fail with
equal promptness to participate.
With four brigantines, and nearly four hundred
men, Pedro, said the lady, the adelantado must surely
meditate some great exploit. He will not linger at Isla
Rica. He hath launched too boldly forth upon this strange
ocean to pause now, and return. Will he not adventure
upon noble conquests? Meditates he nothing of this
sort? Methinks thou shouldst know, being his favoured
secretary; methinks it were not unfitting that he should
stretch his sails for strange lands, of which we have not
heard in Darien. It were, perhaps, something against his
orders, but thou knowest the Seor Vasco is a great
favourite
with the king, and such little excess might be
suffered
in consideration of the wondrous discoveries he
hath already made, and may yet make in his journeys.
It were, I doubt not, easier for my father to forgive his
wanderings, than for me to forgive his absence.
The secretary answered the maiden with a degree of
subtlety even greater than her own. He saw which way
her suspicions tended, and encouraged them. He gave a
glowing picture of the passion of adventureanother
name for ambitionon the part of his master; of whom
he declared himself a devoted admirer; and with an
enthusiasm which seemed to arise from the simple
overflowings
of his zeal, he cunningly depicted the delights of
that sort of life to which he described Vasco Nunez as
particularly inclining. Isla Rica was declared to be a
paradisethe South Sea a world of wonders, which
amply
atoned for the absence of all the world besideand
in the seeming fulness of his heart, which seemed to
forget the claims of the person before whom he stood,
he let fall certain judicious hints of the Indian damselof
her beauty, and her invariable attendance upon all those
expeditions which formed the constant business of the
chief.
Enough, Pedro, said the maiden, with an air of
hauteur which fully assured the secretary that he had
gained his object; enough! ere sunset you will receive
a letter from me for the hands of the Seor Vasco.
She hath it! exclaimed the secretary, exultingly, as
he left the presence. She hath it, and he will have it
soon. The shaft hath hit the true mark, and the wound
rankles, and will be sore enough till all is over. A proud,
cold creature! Truly doth the Seor Vasco deserve his
doom, if it were only for the foolish crime of doing wrong
to one so pure, so lovely as Careta, in tribute to one,
lovely though she be, yet scant of soul, and utterly
heartless, as is this Lady Teresa. She, too, is my
instrument
she,
and the vain old fool, her fatherand the base
and brutal Pizarrothey are all my instrumentsmy
tools of might, my weapons of vengeance. I am weak
and feeble, am I! He surveyed his slight frame and
slender arms as he spoke, while a smile of mingled
bitterness and triumph overspread his lips. Who shall
say that I am weak, when I wield such instruments as
these? The strong man moves the sword, and I move
him. The ambitious and the cunning leap into station
and gain the eminence, and I command all the powers
due to their station. It is a just providence, indeed, that
my superior wit and wisdom reconciles the inequalities of
mere brute capacity. What is the lion's strength to the
serpent's fangthe rage of the wild bull to the agile anger
of the mountain eagle? Neither the strength of the beast,
nor the speed of the bird is in my limbs. Shall it be
forbidden
me that I meet their anger with the wisdom and
the venom of the serpent?
The letter of Teresa Davila was in readiness at the
time appointed. Shall we add that it fully answered the
contemplated objects of the fatherthat it answered the
fond protestations of her lover, with such protestations
as lovers are wont to love, yet fully kept itself within that
nice, yet well-marked boundary of reserve, which seems
to be an instinct among women, only forgotten or
disregarded
when they are willing to forego what may
also be designated as a womanly policy. And yet, while
she penned the epistle which was intended to bring to
her feet the person whom she so professed to love, she
felt more than doubtful of the reception which he would
get from her father. She saw that the suspicions of
Don Pedrarias were already in arms, and all his caution
failed to blind her to the truth, that, if he had not
determined
to hate where she was sworn to love, it was not
her love that would keep him from a condition of mind to
which he was rapidly hurrying, and which would give
activity to hate, and arm it with all the-weapons of
unsparing
hostility.
Pedrarias had already prepared his despatches for
Vasco Nunez, and these, no less treacherously designed
than the letter of Teresa, were placed in the hands of the
messengers, who set forth for Acla by dawn of the day
following. When a day had elapsed from their departure,
he commanded Francisco Pizarro to put the whole force
of the settlement under arms. These he reviewed, and
from these selecting a strong body of the stoutest
veterans
,
he placed them under the command of the fierce
soldier just named, and sent him forth to meet the
returning
messengers with their victim. This commission
against his old commander was readily received by the
unscrupulous Pizarro. No less base than bloody, the
ambition of the vulgar and selfish mind by which he was
wholly governed, made him regard with indifference, or,
at least, without shame or compunction, the office of
arresting
a leader who had always treated him with
distinguished
favour, and shared with him freely of his spoils
and glories. He followed the course of the messengers,
prepared
with cool resolution to perform a farther part in that
treachery in which his share was already so considerable.
It was not to be supposed that these things could take
place in Darien, and these movements be made without
attracting some attention, and provoking some suspicion
among the people of the real purposes of the governor.
The arrest of Arguello, the special friend, and, indeed,
the partner of Vasco Nunez in several leading enterprises,
was enough to alarm the few persons in Darien who were
favourable to the adelantado. These, however, were too
few and too timorous to seek or find any opportunities for
apprising him of his danger; and the emissaries reached
Isla Rica and delivered their despatches to the warrior,
without his having the slightest suspicion of the true
object
of their mission. The letters of Pedrarias were
couched in language of the most friendly confidence and
affection, and that of Teresa Davila, was a spell upon his
understanding, through the medium of his heart, which at
once deprived it of all acuteness. That she should use
such tender languagethat she should declare so earnest
a desire for his presence, was a charm too potent to be
withstood. And while he pored over the beguiling billet,
he utterly forgot the Indian damsel, whose eye watched
his countenance the while with feelings of that instinct
apprehensiveness which is, perhaps, never utterly absent
from the bosom which truly loves. Long and fondly had
he lingered over the page, whose every accent found so
ready a response from the deepest chambers of his own
heart, ere his eye caught the sad, earnest, but sweet gaze
of the Indian girl, and then his conscience smote him, and
he averted his glance from hers while he said, in tones as
much hurried by delight as by his own rebuking spirit
Careta, I must leave theeI am summoned to Darien.
Here are despatches from Don Pedrarias, urgently
commanding
my presence. I will leave thee here at Isla
Rica, or thou wilt go with me to Acla; andand
Careta, wouldst thou not wish to go to thy father in
Coyba for a season?
Does my lord wish that Careta should go from his
sight? Is my lord sad to look upon the Indian? she
demanded
mournfully.
Nay, Careta, why shouldst thou speak in this fashion?
Why should I be sorry to look on thee? Thou art lovely
to the sight; and do I not know that thou art good,
Careta, as thou art beautiful? Why, then, should I be
sad to look on thee?
Wherefore, then, would my lord send me from his
presence? Wherefore should I stay in Isla Rica when he
is away at Darien?
Nay, if thou wishest it, Careta, thou shalt go with me
to Acla. Thou canst remain at Acla in more safety until
I come from Darien; though, it may be, thou wouldst
better prefer to go for a season to thy father in Coyba?
Father and mother and people, did I leave to follow
my lord. Does my lord now say that I shall not follow
him?
No, Careta, I say not thisbut wherefore shouldst
thou suffer the toil of this journey? It would kill thee
to go with me whithersoever I go, among dangers which
thou canst oppose with no strength, and taking upon thee
a fatigue which is needless, full of pain, and without
profit.
I have no painI feel no fatigueI fear no danger
when I can look upon my lord. I will go with thee, my
lord, to Darien, as I have gone with thee every where
before.
Her pertinacity, expressed at the same time with so
much fondness and humility, gave him no small
uneasiness
.
A guilty conscience all the while working in his
breast, added to his annoyance, and enfeebled his
judgment
.
I must put an end to this, was the muttered
resolution
of his mind. If she goes with me to Darien, it will
be impossible to keep from her this knowledge. She will
see Teresashe will hear from all around her, what
hitherto I have kept from her ears, and the worst will be
that Teresa will learn that which might be for ever fatal
to my hopes. On each side is vexationbut on that is
something more. Better she should know all at once
better she should hear the truth at Isla Rica, than at
Darien. But I cannot speak it. Her looks crush me
with a weight of shame. Her sad, tearful eyes, sadder of
late than I have noted them beforeher words of
imperfect
speech, full of a mournful tendernessthese go to
my heart, and reproach me with the sorrows she has yet
to feel. I would to God I had never seen her. It were
less cruel for me to have slain her, after the brutal fashion
of our people, than to have taught her hopes and feelings
on which the cruel necessity makes me trample, as if I
cared for them nothing. It is a pledge to Pedrarias and
Teresait was the condition of my life and release. I
cannot, in honour, fly from this marriage. That is
written
and
shepoor CaretaI dare not meet her eyes.
His own desires taught Vasco Nunez a sophistry
which, under other circumstances, his judgment would
have scorned. If his honour was pledged to Teresa, it
was no less bound to the Indian maiden, whose claims,
however inferior they might be felt in some respects, were
at least superior from priority to all others; and the fact
that he obtained his release from prison, and probably his
life by such pledges, was no justification for a man no less
brave than honourable, who had faced death a thousand
times before, and should have faced it upon the scaffold,
sooner than have departed from that sworn faith which
formed the basis of another's love and life. Nor, indeed,
did Vasco Nunez succeed in justifying himself by such
reasoning. While he strove thus to deceive himself, the
burning blush upon his cheek, and the sinking of his
eyes when he met the glance of the untutored and
inferior
Indian, were conclusive even to himself of the
dishonourable
and worthless character of the plea. All that
may be said in his behalf, will fail of his defence in this
grand, and, we may add, almost the only leading error of
his conspicuous life; and it is only to be extenuated by
the fact that he was the victim of oppressive
circumstances
,
and of a passion which has been so long found
to be tyrannical, as almost to furnish a justification for
those perjuries of its victims at which Jove himself is
said to laugh. Vasco Nunez could not meet the eyes of
the poor Indian whose deep devotedness and fervent love
made his own infidelity so cruelly unjust. But his
determination
was made, to apprise her of his engagement
with Teresa, as the only means, short of absolute
harshness
,
by which to prevent her going with him to Darien.
To do this in person he found to be impossible, and he
sought the friendly aid of the astrologer.
Micer Codro, to you in part I owe my present
position
.
You made it the condition of my release with
Pedrarias
,
that I should wed his daughter. The time is at
hand. I return with these messengers to Darien, and if
I may presume upon the contents of the letter from
Teresa
,
we shall then be married. It will not do that Careta
should go with me to Darien; yet she persists in the
desire
to do so. She must know the truthshe will know
it ere very long; and it were the best policy that she
should know it now, and keep from Darien. I would
have sent her to Coyba, but she is resolved to be with me
to follow me wheresoever I goand there is but one
way to check this resolutionand that is by a full
declaration
of the truth. But I dare not tell her. Indeed,
I cannot. My voice cleaves to my throat when I approach
the subject, and my strength leaves me. It is to you I turn
to do for me this painful office.
Painful indeed! replied the other, painful and
pitiful
.
No Christian spirit was ever more pureno woman
that ever lived, more fond, more true, more worthy of the
love of man. Vasco Nunez, my son, I share with you
the dishonour and the pang; and bitterly now do I repent
me of the share I had in this deed, since I feel the
difficulty
that attends escape, and the faithlessness which, one
way or another, the attempt to escape involves.
There is no escape, replied Vasco Nunez.
Ay, but there is, said the other, and I have thought
painfully and long upon this matter, and not without the
hope that the Blessed Mother would guide my thought
rightly to the just conclusion.
What is thy thought. Micer Codro?
That thou shouldst not wed Teresa Davila.
Ha! This is strange! How canst thou counsel
me thus?thou, too, from whom came that other counsel
which has led me to this tie.
A sad error of mine, but made in thy necessity
committed when they cause was hopelesswhen thou
wert threatened with a sharp and sudden death. It
was the condition of thy releaseI prayed thee to
accept
of escape and life, but not this woman. Thou
know'st, at all other times, how I bade thee beware of
her bonds.
Ay, ay! But thy connsel at the last was of easier
performance than all thy other counsels; and thy success
too great to leave thee or me hope of escape now.
Nay, but there is hope. Better thou shouldst break
with Pedrariasand with Teresa, than do the great
wrong to this poor daughter of the heathen, which will
follow thy marriage with Teresa. She is worthy to be
thy wifemake her so.
And make Pedrarias mine enemy, and break my
plighted faithmy honour
That is broken if thou wed other than this Indian
damsel. Thy honour binds thee doubly to her. Hear
me, son Vasco. Thou hast now no reason to fear
Pedrarias
,
and as little to love Teresa Davila. They neither
VOL. II. 21
love thee for thyselfthey have no care for thee beyond
thy achievements.
I believe not that, replied the other hastily. Thou
wrongest Teresa, as thou hast ever wronged her. Hadst
thou read this, Micer Codro, lifting the letter as he spoke,
thou hadst held other language.
No! no! Hypocrisy speaks sweet words, when love
speaks only the truth. I care not for the letterI would
not read it. Do thou, my son, do this Indian damsel
justice
.
Let the Jeronymite friar, Becerra, wed thee after the
custom of the Holy Church.
Micer Codro, it is too late. I am sworn otherwise.
Besides, were I to do this, it were at once to arm
Pedrarias
against me.
And what needst thou care for the hate of
Pedrarias
,
and wherefore shouldst thou fear his arms? Can
he hurtcan he overtake thee? Hast thou not four
strong, well-manned vessels at thy command. Are not
thy warriors brave and numerous. Movest thou not
upon this great and glorious sea, which has never done
homage to any prow but thine own, and mayst thou
not bid defiance to the hostility of this tyrant, who hath
but too long trampled upon thy rights and upon thy
feelings, with all the insolence of power and all the
malevolence of hate. Thou art free, Vasco Nunez
free at lastand no will but thine own can again
enslave
thee. The winds are at thy wish. The barriers
of the sea are downthere is nothing to chain thy
footstepsnothing to curb thy wing; and thy own
thought has already counselled thee to strive for a richer
dominion than anyay, anyever yet given to the
Spaniard. If thou not obey these calls to gloryif
the summons to freedomthe trumpet summons of the
soulstill sounds unheeded by thy spirit; then take
counsel even of thy fears, and be warned against this
union with Teresa. Nay, morebe warned against
obedience
to this invitation of Pedrarias to meet with him
at Darien. There are bloody signs in the firmament
there is death upon thy backward path. The blessed
stars counsel thee to flightthe threatening star striving
against them with unabated malignity. Oh, my son,
hearken for the last time to thy friendto one who hath
ever loved thee with a father's love. In wedding Teresa
Davila, thou weddest thy fatethy death. Take this
Indian girl to thy heart in the eye of the Holy Church,
then speed, with the blessing of God upon thy path, from
the sight of Pedrarias. Speed to those southern lands of
which thy thought is so lively, and thy speech so warm.
Speed from thy foes to thy conqueststo what is more,
and what thou canst never have while thou hast
communion
with Pedrariasto thy freedom.
No more! no more! I cannot hear thee, Micer
Codro
.
I am pledged solemnly to Pedrarias and his
daughter
.
Truth, justice, honourall forbid that I become a
traitor to my troth.
Truth, honour, justiceall forbid that thou shouldst
marry other than Careta.
Thou thought'st not thus, when thou thyself pledged
me to Pedrarias for his daughter.
The pledge was worthless, made by thee in bonds,
and with the terrors of death before thee.
I cannot think so, Micer Codro. I must keep my
faith.
Alas! my sonit is love which pleads against the
poor Caretalove pleading against love; and oh! worst
of all, pleading in behalf of hateof heartlessness!
Be it so! exclaimed the other, interrupting him. It
is now too late.
No! no! Not too late,there is helpthere is
flight!
Let me die first! said Vasco Nunez, resolutely.
I am resolved, Micer Codrowilt thou speak with
Careta?
I dare not! I cannot, my son. Looking in her eyes,
beholding her sorrows so deep, so undeservedI should
curse myself for my share in themI should curse thee
too that can witness them in vain.
Enough! The task must be my own. Bitter as it
may be, I must perform it. I have lived too long, if my
tongue may not utter without fear, the resolution of my
soul!
Cruel! cruel resolution! Vasco Nunez, thy words
will kill her. This, from thy lips, will be her death. If
thou art, indeed, thus resolved, I will see her. She shall
hear the bitter tale from my lips, though, while I speak, I
invoke heaven's vengeance on my own head and thine.
The head of Vasco Nunez rested against a palm-tree,
hot and heavy, while a strange sickness of heart and
feebleness of limbs seemed to paralyse his faculties. He
would have called out to the astrologer as he departed,
but the tongue refused its officehis lips were parched,
and even had they been willing, there was no coherent
thought in his mind to which words could have given
utterance.
CHAPTER XXV.
BONDS AT ACLA.
The
old man performed the office which he had
undertaken
,
painful though it was, with sufficient resolution,
nor did he spare himself in his narrative. He accused
himself of the counsel by which Vasco Nunez had been
led to the engagement which robbed the Indian damsel of
her rights; and though he did not seek to excuse his
course by the plea of necessity, he yet unfolded the
circumstances
by which he had been persuaded that the
adoption of such a course alone, could have rescued his
principal from the iron tyranny of Pedrarias, which, as
the reader will remember, at that time threatened him
with death. Sad and solemn were his accents, and
bitter
,
indeed, the grief which he expressed at the part he
had taken in the business.
Thou, my daughter, he said, hast been dear to me,
and art dear to me as my own child, and gladly would I
offer up my life this day, could I save thee from this deep
affliction. But it may not be. The honour of Vasco
Nunez requires this sacrifice of thy own and his
affections
.
But thou shalt be cared for. Henceforward I will
be thy father and thy friend; and neither pain nor care
shall afflict thee, while it is in the power of Micer Codro
to baffle their approaches.
Careta heard him in silence. The power of speech
had been taken from her when she listened to the
utterance
of those first words which declared her isolation.
Her eyes were dry; and they glared with a vague
apprehension
,
rather of mistrust than fear, upon the
countenance
of the speaker. The pulsation at her heart seemed
suddenly to stop, and when the astrologer ceased speaking
21 *
she continued to gaze upon him in a silence which he found,
in the activity of his own suggestive conscience, more
full of reproach, than could have been any words from
her lips. Again he spoke, not in palliation either of
himself or of Vasco Nunez, but accusation of both.
It might be avoided, Caretathis cruel deedthis
departure from that faith which Vasco Nunez has pledged
to thee and thy father, not less earnestly than to
Pedrarias
and Teresa Davila, and which
She broke the silence which had sealed up her lips so
long.
It was the truth then that Seor Pedro spoke! she
murmured in barely audible accents; it was all truth.
I have heard of this before, my fatherfrom the lips of
Seor Pedro I heard it, the night when he came to
slay
The choking emotion stifled the accents in her throat
when she came to speak of him; and the event to which
her memory brought herthe event of that night when,
in the devotedness of her heart, she stood between the
dagger-point of the assassin and that bosom which now
proved itself so utterly regardless of hersstung her
with a keener pang, when, by a natural reflection, her
sense of justice assured her that such devotion, alone,
should have secured her the lasting love of the man for
whom it had been so strongly shown, and without which
who could not have survived to requite another's love, or
prove so faithless to hers. The consciousness of utter
abandonmentthe feeling that she was now, on a sudden,
cut away from all the ties which had sustained herthat,
where she had set her soul, she was denied to rest for
hope, for love, for nourishmentwas too overwhelming
for farther expression, and slowly she sank from the rude
bench on which she had been sitting, and crouched and
cowered upon the rush-strewn floor of the habitation,
uttering
neither word nor moan, and with face bent to the
ground in a seeming stupor, from which, with a mistaken
kindness, the astrologer sought to arouse her. She had
neither swooned nor fainted, nor was she unconscious, as
at first he thought; and when he renewed his assurances
of his own continued and increased regard and
protection
,
she answered in a manner which sufficiently
betrayed
her entire indifference to her future lot.
He told me of all this, but I believed him not. Nay,
when the thought sometimes troubled me with a strange
fear, I trembled lest my lord should see it, and dreaded
lest he should think I doubted him. I told him not of the
dark tale which Pedro poured into mine ears, and my
cheeks scorched me as if with fire for shame that I should
think of it again. Yet to think now, that it is all true
thatthatoh, my father, why may I not die at once,
and go down into the cold earth without more feeling?
Why, why should he not stab the poor Indian to the heart,
and let her perish? The keen edge of the dagger were
not half so bitter as these bitter words of death, which
wound me even as with an arrow that is poisoned, and
yet do not kill.
Nay, my daughter, think not so deeply upon it. Thou
shalt lose no friendsnay, indeed, thou shalt lose even
little or no love. Vasco Nunez loves thee not less
because
of this new tiehe will be to thee even
Tell me not this, my father. Had I not been taught
in other lessons than those which teach my peoplehad
he not taught me of other gods, and of things more
sacred which forbid such thoughtsI might believe thee,
since the women of Coyba behold daily the heart of the
warrior divided among many. But the faith which he
has given me, since first he took me from my father at
Coyba, is a better faith for the poor woman who has but
one heart, and gives it all to one warrior. Alas! alas!
she must die, if he cares not for the possession.
But he cares for it, Careta. I tell thee, Vasco Nunez
loves thee not less because of his pledge to Teresa
Davila
No, my father, no! He never loved the poor girl of
Coyba, or he had not given her up. Say to him that
Careta is very sadvery sick and sorrybut she will
not vex him by her sorrows. Tell him she does not
complain that he leaves her for the Spanish lady. Should
he not love the woman best who comes from among his
own people?and yet, my father, never did Careta see
among her own people, a warrior to love as she loved my
lord. When I am gone tell him this. Let him not ask
for the Indian womanshe will go among the hills, and
in the thick woods, where none may see her:and she
will die there very soon.
The old man's heart melted within him.
My poor girl, would it were that I could spare thee
such pangs as these. If my words could save thee and
avail
Do not speak them, my father. If my lord is not
willing that I should sleep upon his bosom, wilt thou make
him willing? Thou canst not; nor, if thou couldst,
would I again place my head upon the heart which beats
only for another. No! no! Let him take the Spanish
lady in place of CaretaCareta will pray to the Blessed
Virgin that she may love my lord as well as the Indian
woman loved him. Tell my lord I will pray for him
while I live. I will not be angry with him, nor chide him,
though my heart feels very strange and very sad.
He deserves not such love, Careta; he deserves not
thy prayer.
Go, my father, and say not this. If he deserves not,
shall I, who love him so well, speak of him so unkindly?
No, no! Go to him, and tell him to wed the Spanish lady,
but not to fling her from his heart when he is tired, as he
has flung away the poor Careta.
Blind heart! blind heart! exclaimed the astrologer
as the Indian woman turned away and sought the inner
chamber of her cabin,to cast away so sweet a
treasure
,
so dear a gift from Heaven, to give place to one so
worthless and vain as she for whom his admiration is a
madness not less ungovernable than blind. But I will be
the father to this forest child; she shall be my care while
I have life. The Christian seed is in her bosoma choice
plant in a fitting soil;and if mortal love be denied her,
Jesu help the labour that would compensate her heart
with love that is eternal.
Thou hast told her all! exclaimed Vasco Nunez
when the astrologer joined him.
Ay, my son; I have endured a pang of hell within
my heart, while beholding with my eyes an image of
heaven. God grant there be no other pangs like this.
God grant that thou suffer not for this sacrificea
sacrifice
no less blind than cruel, and in which thy loss is far
more than that even of this injured woman.
Spoke she bitterly, Micer Codro?
Bitterly! Ay. If to pray for him who wronged her be
a bitter prayer, then was her speech full of bitterness. It
is not too late, Vasco Nunez! Spare this woman; take
her to thy arms, reject the alliance with Pedrarias, and
fly from his dominion. I swear to thee, my son, there is
life and happiness at thy bidding, if thou dost this; if not,
defeat, ignominy, strife and death. Say not thou hast had
no warning; the stars toil to counsel thee if they cannot
save.
But the astrologer spoke in vain.
The fates will have their victim! he continued, as he
heard the slow but inflexible resolve of his companion.
Alas! my son, how would those scales fall from thine
eyes, were thy heart free from the snares of Teresa
Davila. How much wiser and juster wouldst thou be if
thou lov'dst her not. It is thy blind passion which dooms
the poor Careta, not thy sense of what is due to
Pedrarias
.
Thou wilt go as the sheep to the shamblesinto
the very den of the butcher. Sad to think! Sad to
think! when an hour's sail upon these broad billows
would bear thee to safety and new renown.
Thou wilt take Careta under thy care, Micer Codro.
Provide her a place in the brigantine, where I may not
see her. I will send her to Coyba when we shall have
reached the Balsas.
Thou wilt then send from thee thy guardian angel.
Thou hast ever been fortunate since she has slept within
thy arms.
Goad me not farther, Micer Codro; my sense swims
with strange doubts and fancies. I am not surely myself
within this hournay, not since I have read this letter
and resolved upon this thing. Do not madden me with
thy farther reproaches.
Thou art under the bondage of an evil sign, replied
the other; that letter and she who writes it, have
turned thy heart within thee, and made it a fountain of
strange and warring waters, which will vex and madden
thee for ever. Wert thou wise now, the holy man should
quiet this strife and soothe those waters, and lay the
troubling
spirits with a spell, which the good angels would
rejoice
to smile upon. Thou shouldst bind thyself to this
woman, whom thou lovedst when a pagan, and whom
thou desertest when a Christian. I go to her now, Vasco
Nunez, to bid her be in readiness. Oh! be wise ere I
leave thee, and let me gladden her heart with a single
word from thee.
The word was unspoken. The passion, long
suppressed
,
which he had entertained for Teresa Davila from
the first moment when he beheld her, swayed with
arbitrary
power every feeling in his bosom. His whole heart
was subject to her fatal rule; and though he could not
but feel deeply for the wrong done to the Indian woman,
his heart was too weak and too submissive to reject or
resent the dominion which impelled him to such
injustice
.
The fatal letter was still in his hand; its contents
were in his memoryevery word; and while there, and
with such perfect supremacy, he lacked the courage no
less than the will to resist their influence. He suffered
the astrologer to depart upon his mission, while he joined
the messengers of Pedrarias, and prepared for his journey
to Darien.
Lone, wretched, but resigned, Careta was conducted
to the vessel by Micer Codro, and the little cabin of the
brigantine given up entirely to her possession. But a
solitary glimpse of her person, during the brief voyage to
the Balsas, did Vasco Nunez behold, and he shrank away
from the contemplation of those features whose sorrows
were his shame. He shrank away from beholding her,
and his eyes never again wandered to that part of the
vessel which contained her form. She saw not him, and,
indeed, saw none while the voyage lasted. The
astrologer
sought her to console, but his words seemed to be
thrown away upon her. She gave him no heed, or at
least seemed to yield no thought to what he said. If she
answered at all, it was evident that her comprehension of
his objects was imperfect, and the effort painful to
respond
to them. When they reached the Balsas, and the
messengers for Coyba, to whom Vasco Nunez had given
it in charge to conduct her to her father, were prepared
to commence their journey, she was no where to be
found; and though she had been seen but a little while
before the vessel entered the river, the reasons were
strong for supposing she had thrown herself overboard
before it did so. Search was made for her along the
shore wherever it was thought possible for her to secrete
herself, but in vain; and Vasco Nunez was subjected to
the cruel conviction, that his criminal injustice had
prompted her to commit self-murder. He had been
equally fatal to her happiness and life.
It would be needless to dwell upon his misery as this
conviction
forced itself upon his mind. He now felt, for the first
time, the full force of his cruel and criminal proceedings; and
could she at that moment have been restored to his arms, it
is certain that in his penitence he would have done her justice
he would have re-resolved with a better regard to the
dictates
of honour; and, adopting those counsels of the
astrologer
,
which he now acknowledged he had been too ready to
reject, he would have placed it out of his own power to have
repeated the injustice. He would have made her his wife,
as he pledged himself to her father to do, and bidding
defiance
to Pedrarias with a more manly and daring temper,
would have spread his adventurous sails for the golden
shores of Peru. Even now would he have done so, had
he entertained any doubts of the faith of Pedrarias. But
this he did not; and with a spirit more oppressed and
humbledmore troubled with doubts and misgivings, the
inevitable fruits of a guilty consciencehe proceeded on
his way to meet his insidious enemy. Sad and silent, he
crossed again the weary mountains over which he had
toiled with an eagle spirit, how far different from that
which nerved him now. Even the remembrance of
Teresa
,
and the thought that he was on his way to meet with
one, who, unhappily, had been ever too dear an object in
his regards, failed to soothe and to sustain him under the
heavy weight of his self-reproach, which the disappearance
of Careta cast upon his mind; and, with the look of one
conscious that the unrelenting fates were closing the toils
around him, he went forward, until even the messengers of
Pedrarias began to feel a sentiment of regret, and, perhaps,
remorse, when they beheld one, whom they esteemed noble
in every respect, going forward blindly to his doom. This
sentiment became stronger as they approached Acla, and
at length the kinder feelings of Gaspar Nino, the chief of
the messengers, getting the better of his caution and loyalty,
and touched with the melancholy that weighed upon the
mind of the adelantado, he revealed to him the facts so far
as they were known in Darien, the suspicions entertained
by all parties, and the one circumstance, which, to a more
suspicious mind than Vasco Nunez, might have seemed
conclusive, the arrest and imprisonment of his friend
Arguello
.
But Vasco Nunez, though aroused and astonished
by this recital, would not believe it.
These are conjectures only, he said to Gaspar Nino.
Arguello has been guilty of something which may merit
imprisonment, and though Pedrarias might have spoken to
me of the matter, yet I see not that his omission to do so,
makes any thing in favour of thy suspicion. Besides, I
am conscious of no evil intention, no wrong, no crime, no
injustice, to Pedrarias, for which I have any cause of
apprehension
;
and this letterhere he spoke to his own
thoughts rather than to Nino, for he refered to the fatal
letter of Teresa,this letter is proof against thy story.
No, no! Gaspar Ninothou art mistakenthou art led
away, like all our people, by quick and groundless
suspicions
.
If Pedrarias be troubled by any jealousy of one to
whom he hath pledged his daughter in marriage, my
readiness
to seek him and place myself in his power, will banish
all such notions. Yet, I think thee, Gaspar Ninothou
shalt find favour at my hands for thy readiness to show me
favour. I thank thee and thy companions for the good
feeling with which you have all spoken of a danger,
which, if well grounded, I had had no claim upon you to
disclose.
Seor Vasco, be not too certain of thy position with
Don Pedrarias. This same suspiciousness of temper which
thou well say'st is common to us all, is, if possible, more active
in the bosom of Pedrarias than that of any man in Darien.
He hath, as thou well knowest, been suddenly jealous of
thee ere this, when there was, perchance, as little occasion
for jealousy as now. Beware! Put thyself in safety
there is yet time for thee to escape. We look down upon
Acla, but they see us not. Fly while there is yet season,
and make thyself sure in safety. It were a pity that so
brave a man should fall into evil snares.
The suggestion was at once seconded by Micer Codro,
who had all along warned his companion against it. But
the other was no less rigid in his resolve than before.
Enough, enough, my friends; but truly though ye
mean well, ye afflict me. I am weary of this sort of
struggle
this
struggle against faith and confidenceassurances
made with strong words of solemn import, and truth pledged
in heaven's sight. If I may no longer confide in man, let
me perish,there is nothing left worth living for.
Alas! my sonit is in woman that you confidenot
in man! exclaimed the astrologerbut who are these
what may this mean?
The words of the astrologer were echoed by the whole
party, not excepting Vasco Nunez himself. They were
surrounded by the armed soldiers of Pedrarias; and ere
they could again speak, Francisco Pizarro, who
commanded
for Pedrarias, stood in the presence of his victim, and
advanced resolutely, though with downcast eyes, to arrest
him.
How is this, Francisco? demanded the adelantado,
while he gazed with no less surprise than indignation upon
the man from whose gratitude he might well have expected
other treatment. Is this the way, Francisco, you have
been accustomed to receive Vasco Nunez?
The brutal soldier muttered something, the words
duty, loyalty, and Don Pedrarias, alone, being
clearly intelligible to the ears of the prisoner.
Enough! Enough, Seor! Do your duty, since it
must be thus. Micer Codro, the poor Careta is already
avenged.
Lost! lost! lost! was all the reply which the
astrologer
made, as he followed his friend and favourite, now in
the custody of his own lieutenant, to meet with the enemy
who sat, glowering like a hungry tiger, in waiting at Acla
for his prey.
VOL. II. 22
CHAPTER XXVI.
HATE AND JEALOUSY PRESIDE IN JUDGMENTTHE DOOM
RECORDED.
With
a degree of hypocrisy which was surely
unnecessary
,
and uncalled for by any of the circumstances of
the transaction, Don Pedrarias concealed the exultation
which he felt at finding his enemy within his power. He
sought him in prison, affected deep concern at being
obliged to treat him with such rigour, and uttered the most
earnest wishes that he might establish his innocence. This
conduct denoted a consciousness of injustice on his own
part, which leaves it doubtful whether he ever
contemplated
a sincere union of interests with one against whom,
from the first, he seemed to have adopted all the hostility
of a rival.
Be not afflicted, my son, he said with an air of the
tenderest concern; an investigation of these charges will,
I doubt not, serve to acquit younay, if it be as I imagine,
they will do you great service, by rendering your loyalty
and zeal towards your sovereign more than ever
conspicuous
.
But who are my accusers, Don Pedrarias, and what
are the crimes which they allege against me? was the
demand of the prisoner.
Alonzo de la Puente, the royal treasurer, is one of
them; Pedro, late your secretary, another
Ha! that youth! There is a mystery about that
matter
!
Don Pedrarias, this youth sought my life, when I
slept in my own tent on the shores of Isla Rica. Evidence
from him cannot be regarded under such circumstances;
and he, indeed, for such a crime should be held to answer
for his own life.
Make that which you relate appear, and he will be,
my son, replied the governor; he continued, there is
yet another witness named Lope Sanchez, a sentinel,
who
But what is it that they charge against me, Don
Pedrarias
of
what crime am I supposed to be guilty, which
can justify the incarceration of a man high in favour with
our sovereign, and in command of his armament?
None other than treason to him, my son. It is charged
that you have designed a treasonable conspiracy to throw
off your allegiance, and assume an independent sway on
the borders of the Southern Sea.
This is sheer folly, Don Pedrariasyou cannot surely
believe it. Let me be confronted with these accusers
with that miserable boy, who hath so strangely sought my
life, and seeks it now with such vindictivenesshe whom I
have ever favouredwhom I have taken into my counsels,
into my confidence, and now to play thus falsely with my
honour and safety! I pray thee, my lord, let this
examination
proceed instantly, that I may fling off the sooner
this cruel aspersion.
I trust me, my son, that thou canst do so, replied the
hypocritical governor.
Doubt it not, Don Pedrarias, I pray theeI have
neither doubts nor fears on this subject. My conscience
acquits me of thought or deed which should make me
liable to the anger of my sovereign, and this thou shalt
thyself see when I put mine eyes on these base accusers.
But let me not forget other feelings in mine anger. The
Seora Teresais she not in Acla, my lord?
She is, my son, but it were not well that she should
see thee while this accusation hangs above thee. Nor
should I seek thee here myself, since it would seem to
denote my too great partiality to one accused of such
heinous offence, but that I have no fears that you will not
easily establish your innocence. This shown, my son,
Teresa Davila is yours.
Once more, my lorda question, a single question
would I ask of you, said the prisoner, with a trembling
eye and quivering lip, as if he dreaded the answer which
he yet demandedthis letter,showing, as he spoke,
that of the maiden, which he that moment drew from his
bosom, this letter, written by Teresa to summon me to
Aclaknew she when she wrote, my lord, of these
charges against me?
Not a word, my son,to the last, I was bound in duty
to my sovereign, no less than to you and to herself, to
keep this from her knowledge.
The prisoner seemed relieved as from a heavy weight
upon his breast. His breathing became freer, and a
voluntary
exclamation of thanks to the Virgin, attested the
pleasure
which he felt in escaping from that crushing doubt
which assailed him, that she, upon whom his every hope
in life was now set, and for whom he had made such a
painful sacrifice, should have become the willing agent of
that treachery which had beguiled him to a prison. There
was little more than this, that passed between the governor
and his still unconscious victim. The latter simply urged
that his examination might soon be had, and the former,
with the same hypocrisy which had distinguished his
conduct
throughout, left him with loud encouragements, and
the utterance of the most fervent hopes that he might soon
succeed in establishing that innocence of which he
professed
to have not the smallest suspicion.
The trial was accordingly urged forward with a degree
of haste at once equally satisfactory to the prisoner and
grateful to his enemy. The charges were principally
sustained
by the evidence of the secretarythe fragments of
papers and notes which he produced of Vasco Nunez;
and by that of a soldier, who stood sentinel one night near
the tent of the adelantado at Isla Rica, and overheard a
conversation between him and certain of his officers,
wherein he declared his resolution to put to sea, in the
event of certain circumstances, on his own account, and to
set the governor at defiance. This testimony, according to
Las Casas, arose from a misconstruction on the part of the
sentinel, who heard but a part of the conversation, which
related to his intention of sailing without orders, in case a
new governor should arrive to supersede Pedrariasan
event which had been reported to Vasco Nunez as really
about to occur. Upon these charges, vague in some
respects
,
and scarcely conclusive in any, the prosecution
rested. The defence of Vasco Nunez was that of
indignant
innocence. He met his accusers with an eye at
once fearless and frank, and in turn became the accuser,
when the secretary stood before him with his part of the
accusation.
This unhappy youth should not be heard in this
presence
,
he exclaimed, as the other was about to give his
evidence. he is governed by malicious motives, so
bitterly
felt and meditated that he hath even gone so far as to
assail me with his dagger while I slept. Can it be that
you will listen to the accusation of an assassin?
Where is the proof of this, Seor Vasco? demanded
the alcalde mayor, Espinosa.
Alas! this is another part of my sorrowthe deepest,
keenest sorrow of all. I could bear the ingratitude of this
boy, who hath been taken to my bosom, and who hath
proved a festering serpent even while I warmed himI
could defy the malice of all this accusationand scorn the
accusers who denounce me as disloyal to a sovereign who
hath favoured me with his smiles, and crowned my deeds
with his honoursbut the consciousness that I have been
disloyal to another, and that my disloyalty hath been her
destruction, is beyond my strength to bear. The witness
for whose favouring voice you ask, is, alas! no more.
The poor Indian woman who baffled his dagger when it
hung above my breastshe who could have confounded
him with her look and wordshe whom I should have
lived for and died forwho loved me, and has been ever
a Christian when Christians have shown me the teeth of
the savageto her alone have I been disloyalto her
alone have I broken my plighted faith. She who alone
could justly accuse me of treachery, and who, alone, could
shield me against the treachery of that miserable boy, she
sleeps in death, beneath the broad bosom of the southern
sea.
She lives! She lives! She is here, my lord, my
dear lord! She is here to speak for my lord, and to tell
the blessed truth in his behalf! Oh, my lord, my dear
lord! I thank thee for those sweet, kind words, thou hast
spoken for the poor Careta. She is glad now that she
lives, since she can speak for my good lord.
The intruder at this moment was, indeed, the poor
Indian
girl. Her beauty, her humble yet fervent devotedness,
as, rushing forward into the court, and heedless at first of
the presence of the surrounding men, she flung herself at
22*
the feet of the prisoner and caught his hands in her own
drew tears to more eyes than those of the one man whom
she sought, and for whom her words were spoken;but the
cheeks of the secretary grew suddenly white, and those
of the governor exhibited the deep flush of anger, at an
interruption to the progress of those proceedings which
were destined to destroy their victim. Her presence, she
accounted for, after the first ebullition of her emotion had
subsided, in a very simple and characteristic manner. She
had thrown herself into the sea, at first meditating suicide,
but the instinct of life had prompted her to use that art
which all her people possessed in perfection, and, swimming
to the shore, new thoughts suggested themselves to her
mind as she lay in concealment among the thick mangroves
along the banks. She resolved to follow the man whom
she so adored, to Darien; and to behold with her own eyes
those charms of her rival which had been so cruelly
preferred
to her own. In this plan she had found little
difficulty
.
She had never been far behind the party which
she followed, and practised, like all her people, in the
woods and among the hills, she had neither faltered nor
fainted by the way. Wild roots and berries had been her
only food, and unseen and unsuspected by the Spaniards,
she had beheld all their movements, nor at any time suffered
them to advance so far beyond her, as to make it a difficult
task to overtake them. In the neighbourhood of Acla,
among some of the ruined cottages of a former tribe of
natives, had she concealed herself, and by occasional
communion
with the Indian slaves of the town, she had gained
that knowledge of events which had enabled her to time
her visit to the place of trial, so as to witness the whole
proceedings. This she had done in silence and trembling,
crouching in a recess of the court-room, until that moment
when Vasco Nunez spoke of her as sleeping in death beneath
the waters of the sea. She could then contain herself no
longer. The tender eulogy which he had uttered upon her
virtuesthe fond tones of his voice, so like those which
he was wont to use in the first days of their communion
warmed her heart and made her blood, like a fountain
escaping
from the earth, well up in a sudden gush of impulse,
that defied the restraints of fear and prudence; and her lips
poured forth the abundant feeling of her bosom, in an
utterance which prevailed, for the moment, over all voices
and every will in that presence.
Can it be, Caretadost thou indeed liveart thou here
to speak for me, and to confound that false and perjured
villain, from whose dagger thy fond love preserved me,
and from whose sharp perjury thy truth will no less suffice?
Jesu be praised, thy blood is not upon my soul.
Such were the words of Vasco Nunez when he
recovered
himself sufficiently from his surprise at her unlooked-for
presence to speak to her. He would have raised her from
the floor, and placed her on a seat beside him, but she
clung to his knees, and would not be removed. Her long
raven tresses, loose and flowing, covered her shoulders and
swept the floor, while her eyes, turning now from his face
to those of the judges, gradually began to assume their
wonted timidity of expression, which the enthusiasm of
her first impulse, on rushing forward from her place of
concealment
,
had for the moment banished.
Oh, yes, I am here to speak for my dear lord. I will
tell Don Pedrarias the truth. I am so glad I did not let the
waters go over me, but tried to gain the shore, though it
did not seem to me as if I cared any thing for life. I did
not think of life. I thought only of my lord, and I felt
that I could not leave him, though he was willing to leave
me. My dear lord will not leave the poor Careta any
more.
What woman is this, Seor Vasco? demanded
Pedrarias
sternly.
The daughter of the Cassique of Coyba, was the
reply, whom I look upon with no less joy than shame.
It is my joy, seor, that she lives, when it was my fear that
my injustice had destroyed hermy shame, that she lives
a memorial of my disloyalty and broken faith to her,
though she can well establish my truth to my sovereign
and to thee. She can prove this youth, Pedro, to have
aimed his dagger at my life.
Her words avail nothing here, replied the alcalde,
her testimony may only be received against her own
peoplenot against that of a Spaniard. Hast thou no
other witness, Seor Vasco?
The cloud was increasingthe transient gleam of hope
which was produced upon his mind by the unexpected
appearance
of Careta, was as suddenly swallowed up in the
decree of the judge by whom her testimony was rejected;
and the indifference of despair was in his voice, as he
replied
to the question
None! none!
Then, said the governor, throwing aside the mask of
hypocrisy which he had so unnecessarily and ostentatiously
wornthen, Vasco Nunez, do I discard you from my
affection. Hitherto, I have looked upon you as loyal to
your sovereign, and to me, as his representativeI have
accordingly treated you as my son, and it was at one time
my wish that you should become so. Now, guilty, as you
clearly are, of meditated rebellion to the crown of Castile,
I cast you from my care, and shall henceforth hold you as
my enemy, no less than the enemy of our king.
Vasco Nunez rose to his full height as he listened
to this language. Hitherto he had been cowed and
oppressed by circumstances. The consciousness of his
guilt to Caretahis belief in her deaththe degradation
of the arrest to which he had been subjectedall wrought
together to produce in his mind a downward tendency of
thought and feeling, which took the fire from his eye, and
the life from his movement, and that proud, commanding
energy from his voice, which, in his days of greatness and
glory, had been among his most distinguishing exterior
attributes. At this instant he seemed to resume them all
the presence of Careta, restored to life, had given a new
strength to his heart; and his conscience had somewhat
relieved
itself, most probably, in the return to his bosom of
some of those more generousjust, we should say
emotions
,
which his wild and maddening passion for Teresa
had for a time banished. He now met the insolent gaze
of Pedrarias with a glance of defiance. His words were
fearless, and denoted the innocence which they were not
permitted to prove.
Your sentence makes me not guilty, Don Pedrarias,
nor does your readiness to believe me so, altogether fail to
convince me that it is not your desire that I should appear
so. To other minds and times, I fear not to leave this
charge, for judgment; satisfied, as I am, that, on the bare
face of the circumstances, no honest judgment will
condemn
me. Had I been conscious of any guilt, would I have
been simple enough to come here at your bare summons,
and surrender myself into your hands? Had I meditated
the rebellion which you place to my charge, what could
have prevented me from lifting the banner, and pressing on,
with full canvass, over the broad ocean spread out before
me? Not all your force, led, though it might have been, by
those whom I have lifted into confidence, and regarded
with a favour for which they have made such foul return,
could have stayed my progress, and baffled my insurgent
arms. I had four gallant ships at anchor, three hundred
brave men, to whom my word had been law, and the very
waving of my sword, a summons to victory. They had
followed my bidding through life, and into the very jaws
of death. What had I to do but to press forward? Rich
lands, vast empires, inviting rivers, that run over golden
beds, wooed me to this course, and furnished arguments
for independence, stronger than any that could have fallen
from the lips of counsellors, or ever found an echo in my
own heart. Homes on every hand implored my presence,
the savage, wherever I went, became my friend, and
proffered me his homageI had found a land, with little
toil, sufficient for me and mine, and far beyond any
control
of yours, had such been the desire of my heart. But
such was not my desire. You had proffered me a gift,
which I too readily acceptedone which promises to be
as fatal to my life, as it was fatal to my independence. In
my confident innocence, I came at your summonsthe
summons of the friend and the father, rather than the ruler
and the chiefand lo! these are my rewards!these chains,
that dishonour you no less than me, have met me at my
coming. Instead of love and friendship, I have found
nothing
but slander, indignity, and bonds.
This speech, fearless and ingenuous, whatever might
have been its effect upon the disinterested portion of the
audience, had no power upon the vindictive Pedrarias, and
as little upon the pliant Espinosa. A verdict of guilty
was rendered against the prisoner, coupled with a
recommendation
to mercy, in consideration of past services;but
this recommendation was rejected, as soon as made, by the
merciless governor.
No! he exclaimed. If he merits death, he cannot
merit mercy. Let him suffer the doom to which you have
consigned himthe keen axe and the solid block. Let
him die.
Nowise moved, but stern and collected to the last, the
voice of Vasco Nunez was heard immediately after
From this bloody and unjust judgment, Don Pedrarias,
I appeal to the king. The sovereign of Spain shall hear of
this.
Ay! he shall hear of it, but when he does so, it shall
avail you nothing. So resolute a traitor shall not be
suffered
long to hatch new treasons, or complete the old. Let
it be known in Acla that the rebel Vasco Nunez dies
to-morrow
on the block.
One shriekone long, piercing shrick, and the hitherto
breathless Careta fell prostrate on the floorher hands
uplifted
to the cruel judge, but her lips incapable of giving
utterance to the agonizing prayer which their action was
intended to prefer. Vasco Nunez raised her, with
unshaken
nerves, from the floor, and bitter was the pang of
that self-reproach in his heart, which reminded him that he
had thrown away, not merely life, but the richest jewel
among heaven's gifts of mercy, by his improvident return,
under the seductions of that fatal letter, to chains and death
at Acla. His eyes met those of Micer Codro, whose
efforts
,
it may be said here, however ineffectual, had been
made without ceasings in his behalf. His evidence could
disprove nothing, and his misery throughout the trial had
been far greater than that of him whom it most endangered.
Take her, Micer Codrotake herremove her from
me now, while she knows nothing. Preserve, protect,
provide for her, my father. I have now no power to make
her other reparation; but I pay too dear a penalty for the
one error which did her so much wrong, not to be secure
of her last forgiveness. Quickly, quicklyshe awakes.
CHAPTER XXVII.
THE LAST WILLING SACRIFICE OF LOVE.
The
spirit of Vasco Nunez, like that of all truly great
men, rose more proudly under the pressure of injustice.
He was more surprised than sorrowful at the precipitate
and wanton judgment which had been passed upon him.
From Pedrarias, indeed, he had no favour to expect. He
had long known his violent, vindictive, and arbitrary
character
;
but there was a painful mystery, which vexed and
troubled him, in the conduct of the woman, his fatal love
for whom, as the astrologer had long before assured him
would be the case, had been his undoing. Surely, he
thought, she cannot believe me this traitor. Surely she
cannot, without a word, a prayer, an effort, have given me
up to this wanton malice of her sire. Her prayers, her
tears, even if they availed nothing in my behalf with that
cold-hearted and inflexible old man, must at least have been
poured forth in supplication at his feet. This faith must
be my consolation to the last. And yet, wherefore is she
not here? Why seeks she not the prison of one to whom
she hath written such burning words as these? Nay, let
me not question her affection. How should he suffer her
to seek the presence of one whom he hath declared his
enemy, and hath thus relentlessly delivered over to a bitter
death. Even now she sorrows with a pang keener than my
own; and it may be that her prison is no less close. Alas!
that I should pray for this, Teresa. If I thought
otherwise
,
the pang of my own bondage would be far less
supportable
,
and the death which awaits me would most surely
be the only relief.
His musings were interrupted by the entrance of the
astrologer, whose tidings brought him no consolation. The
old man had vainly striven to interest the most influential
persons in Acla in behalf of the condemned. They were
all too much in awe of the wanton disposition of the
governor, to take any active part in opposition to his will;
and the soldiers at Acla were chiefly the new recruits
brought with him from Spain, most of whom regarded
Vasco Nunez with hostility rather than with favour. His
own warriors, the old soldiers of Darien, upon whom he
could have relied to wrest him from the tyrant, or revenge
his death, were all improvidently left behind him at Isla
Rica. Bitterly, indeed, as his mind reverted to the
counsels
of the astrologer, did he denounce his own folly and
blindness, in thus, as it were, depriving himself of all
strength and succour, and rushing, with headlong haste,
into the snares of his enemy.
But of what avail now, he exclaimed, of what avail
to look back on what might have been done. It is the
fool's philosophy that rejects the wholesome medicine
which would save if taken in season, yet seeks to swallow
it greedily while death is closing up the channel of his
throat. I were doubly a fool now to brood over the old
follies which no after wisdom may repair. Micer Codro,
my friend, my father, thou art old; it will not be many
years ere we meet again; and then it is my trust we shall
not be separated. There will then be no tyranny to crush
our hearts, to baffle our hopes, to deny us our conquests,
and subject us to the unmerited pangs of a bloody death.
The hope which rises from the grave, Micer Codro, is the
most secure of all the hopes of humanity.
The sorrows of the old man were inexpressiblethey
impeded and even choked his utterance.
Would I could die for thee, my son. Would I could,
in the last pang and agony, for thy sake undergone, bid
thee fly to thy unfinished conquests. Yet thy fame is
secure
;
that blessing have the stars which favoured thee
yielded to our hope. No tyranny can touch thy greatness,
written on the eternal rocks of Darien, and murmured aloud
in every billow that breaks upon its shores. The world,
to which thou hast given a world no less vast and wondrous
than that of Colon, will preserve thy memory.
It is my hope.
It is thy only hopethe life immortal when the other
life is denied. My son, thy doom is unchangeably written.
Thy tyrant is inflexible, and the stars are no less so. The
hour hurries onthe day and night are now at meeting.
Prepare thyself for the stroke and the parting.
Jesu be my strength in the trying hour. I do not fear
to die. The pang, Micer Codro,the only pang is in the
partingthe loss of sunlight and the daythe loss of the
bright green wood and the glittering, flowing watersthe
song of birds and the sweet tones of those who love us;
these are the pangs which come with death, and make it
terrible. Besides, Micer Codro, there is still so much left
to be done. Others will follow me, and achieve those
triumphs on which my heart was set, and to which my
sword has pointed out the way. How many glorious
labours
do I leave unfinished; andthou wilt smile when
I mingle these togetherTeresa.
Would thine eyes had never beheld her! Knowest
thou not what is said in Acla?
What is said in Acla?What of Teresa?
It is said that Vasco Nunez is not doomed because of
his treason to his sovereign, but because of his treachery
to Teresa Davila. One of the crimes of which thou hast
been accused to Pedrarias and to his daughter, is thy
fondness for the poor Careta. Thy secretary, Pedro, hath
assured them that thou wouldst never wed with Teresa;
but wast bent to fly with Careta to new lands beyond the
dominion of Pedrarias, and in utter scorn of thy
engagements
with his daughter. This, though no part of the
charge against thee, is that charge which has made
Pedrarias
most wrathful, since, if it were true, and he most
certainly
believes it, then did thy resolution sever the only
sure hold which he had upon thy obedience.
Now may the fiends light upon the base villain that
spoke this falsehood.
Call it not a falsehood, my dear lord, cried the voice
of Careta, as she rushed forward from the entrance of the
prison, and threw herself at the feet of the prisoner,call
it not a falsehood; let the poor Indian believe it for the
truth. It is so sweet the thought, even though it be now
hopeless, that thou wouldst have left the Spanish lady to
have gone with Careta into the forestsnot the forests of
Coyba, but forests afar off, behind the blue hills where the
sun hides himself day after day. It was true, my lord. I
know it was true. It could not be that thou wouldst cast
VOL. II. 23
the poor Indian from thy armsshe that loved thee so dearly
as Careta.
He clasped her to his bosom in a sudden agony of
self-reproach and sorrow, and for a time was speechless.
His words, when he spoke at last, were the fruits of
spasmodic
effort; and his breast heaved as if he were in the
midst of a mortal strife, at the utterance of every syllable.
My poor Careta, I have done thee cruel wrong.
No, no! How couldst thou do wrong to the Indian
woman, when thou hast taken her to thy bosom, and
taught her thy language and thy faith, and hast
protected
her people, and given them wealth, and made them
happy. And thou hast made Careta happy too. Thou
hast been kind to her always; and thou hast brought her
to see thy God, and to love him, and made her pray to go
to thy heaven when she dies.
Yes, yes, I reproach myself not for these, Careta; but
there are other matters of which I have great need to
reproach
myself, no less because of their wickedness and
folly, than because of their great injustice to thee. It is
true, Careta, that, in an evil hour, under the guidance of a
mad passion for another, whom I had beheld and loved
with a blind admiration long before I had looked upon
theenay, long before I came to DarienI resolved to give
thee up, to cast away thy love, which had been so sweet to
me and so dear, and to sacrifice thy poor heart to the
prouder dominion of another. I do not seek to excuse
myself now by telling thee that the counsel of friends and
the desperate condition of my own life, compelled me to
this resolve; for, of a truth, if my own heart had not
desired
this maiden, who is lovely beyond compare, I had not
fallen away from my faith to thee. Of this crime, then, am
I guilty without excuse or allay. I came from Isla Rica
for this purpose; and I am but rightly rewarded for my
treachery to thee, by this doom, which punishes for a
treachery of which my soul is guiltless. Thou hast heard
nothing now, Careta, but the truth, andcanst thou love
me any longer?
Oh, yes! Yes, my lord! Wert thou to slay Careta
with thy knife, she would love thee the same as ever. But
this lady, is she then so beautiful, my lord? Is she so
beautiful now, and will she not beg her father to forgive my
lord, and let him go free out of prison without these
chains?
She is even beautiful as I have said, Careta.
Then she should be good; and if she loves my lord,
it is like she was angry when she heard that thou wert fond
of a poor Indian woman of Darien. Let her take my lord
to her arms, and wed him, andandOh! my lord,
if she will do this, let her father send Careta back to
Coyba, but let him spare the life of my lord. Careta will
be sorry, but not angry, when my lord loves her no
longer.
I will always love thee, Careta; nay, I have always
loved thee, even when I sent thee from my side, and set
forth on this sad expedition to wed another. But my heart
was wretched while I went, and my thoughts were strange
and wild. Thy purpose to save me will do me little help.
It is not now in the power of Teresa to save me, else do I
think I were safe. Her father hates me, Careta, and will
not sleep until he hath shed my blood upon the block.
Alas! alas! cried the woman, lifting up the heavy double
chains which encompassed and wearied the arms of the
prisoner. Her tears fell fast upon them, and her words,
subsiding into occasional moans, left the astrologer and
Vasco Nunez free to resume the conversation which her
presence had interrupted. While this conversation
proceeded
,
her attention was fixed by a renewal of the last
topic upon which they had been engagednamely, the evil
but undeclared influence which the connexion of Vasco
Nunez with the Indian woman had maintained over the
conduct of Pedrarias, prompting that vindictive pursuit of
his victim, which he had shown throughout the trial, and
which had evidently overawed the alcalde, and compelled
his unwilling sentence of death. While she listened, she
started abruptly to her feet, and prepared to depart. Vasco
Nunez would have detained her.
Wherefore would you leave me, Careta? Heed not
the speech of Micer Codro and myself. My time in life
is so short, that I would not lose you from my side while
we are permitted to be together. Nay, you have not yet
told me how you obtained entrance. Could it be that
Pedrarias
suffered this? He hath been barely willing to let
Micer Codro approach me;and thou!
I saw him not, my lord, she replied hastily, and still
seeking to extricate herself from his grasp, but I showed
the gold which the Spaniard worships to the soldier at the
door, and he took his god and suffered me to enter. Let
me now leave thee, my lordit is needfulI will return to
thee again soon.
Vasco Nunez would still have detained her, but a sign
and word from the astrologer, to whom a sudden thought
had suggested itself, moved him to compliance with her
demand. She had scarcely disappeared when the old man
spoke.
There is yet hope for thee, my son. If she hath
bribed the soldier with gold to obtain entrance, wherefore
should we not bribe him with more gold to obtain thy
release
.
I have in my possession a sum which would buy
most soldiers of Pedrarias, and Jesu forbid that we should
leave any effort untried to win thy freedom. I will seek
him now; there is little time to lose. Do thou pray
that thy sentinel hath a soul sufficiently sworn to avarice
that we may buy him to the performance of a virtue to
which he would not otherwise incline.
With these words he left his companion, to try the
efficacy
of gold upon the gaoler. That hope which dies not even
in death, during the brief interval which followed his
absence
,
sprang up anew in the bosom of the prisoner. His
soul seemed to rise on strong wings to the eminence of
life; and the fervour of fresh blood seemed to be
vouchsafed
to the heart but a moment before prostrate, if not
torpid, and looking only on the backward paths of life,
dreading every glance upon the future. His hope was of
short duration. The gaoler was one of the chosen
creatures
of Pizarro, and, it appeared, rendered hostile to Vasco
Nunez in consequence of a punishment to which the latter
had subjected him months before, as the reward of some
petty offence, agains order, of which he had been guilty.
He had not refused the gold of the Indian woman, since
her presence in the prison could have availed the victim
nothing in his desire for escape. But the greater object he
at once denied.
Take back your gold, old man, he answered, and no
more words, lest I report you to the Seor Francisco. As
for the Seor Vasco, when you have reminded him that I
am that Gil Sandanha, whom he scourged at Coyba for
little reason, he will see reason enough why I should not
let him forth. He hath had his turn,it is but right that I
should have mine. Besides, a word in your ear: when he
dies, as with God's grace he does to-morrow at noon, then
the Seor Francisco will succeed to his command upon the
South Sea; and under him, and there, I trow I should win
more gold than any in thy pouch to offer. I were a pretty
fool to set the Seor Vasco free to spoil all this goodly
prospect.
The astrologer made another trial.
Your fortune shall not be spoiled by this measure. I
promise you, on behalf of the Seor Vasco, a command
under him on the South Sea, and better chances than any
which Pizarro would secure thee.
In, in! In or out, old man. It will not answer thee to
argue thus. You cannot move me. Were I to set my
prisoner free, there were a thousand chances to one that he
could not escape pursuit. I will not endanger my small
certainty for any uncertainty, however large, which it may
please you or him in his desperation to offer. Men in the
noose are apt to be liberal of promise much beyond their
means. Ye blind me not in this fashion. That I have,
that will I secure. In, and no more of this.
The keen ears of the prisoner had taken in the tenor of
this brief dialogue, which, in an instant, overturned the
pleasant hopes which had sprung up into sudden life about
his heart; and the walls of his prison grew darker in the
deeper gloom which followed the sudden privation of that
momentary light which had illumed them. The aged man
refurned with weary steps, and a heart doubly wo-worn,
and long was the silence that succeeded, in that dreary
dungeon
,
the fruitless effort which he had made in behalf of his
companion.
Far different from theirs was the new feeling in the
bosom of the Indian damsel. A noble, generous resolve,
the natural growth of a nature no less lofty than it was
sweet, pure, and unpretending, led her forward, with
impatient
footsteps that heeded neither fatigue nor danger, to
the rude palace which Pedrarias occupied. A hope had
arisen in her heart, that by her own sacrifice she might
yet save the man she loved. Fond and faithful, in her
childish simplicity of soul, she fancied that by declaring to
the Spanish lady her own resignation of all claims upon
Vasco Nunez, she should move the latter in his favour;
23*
nothing doubting, that if, as she fully believed, the report
of his connexion with her, had led, more than any thing
beside, to his bitter sentence, her release, and the solemn
pledge which she meant to offer, of her flight from his
presence, would serve to restore him to the favour which
he had lost, and to security from the penal doom which
threatened him. She never once doubted the love of
Teresa
for the chief; and her meditated course partook of a
still more romantic air of generosity, when she reflected all
the while upon the happiness which she was about to
bestow upon a vexed and jealous rival. Alas! she little
knew how much of cold and selfish littleness might dwell
in the palace of civilizationin the heart of woman,and
under the guise of innocence and beauty. Could she but
have dreamed, that, among the thousand phases of feeling
common to her sex, there could be one so utterly and
perversely
at variance with the first fresh impulses of
humanity
,
as that which held predominant sway in the bosom
of the vain, capricious woman whom she sought, it might
have checked her own forward impulseit might have
brought to her mind a precautionary doubt of the success
of that effort which she proposed to make, and which she
fancied, in the exuberance of her own true feelings, could
not be other than successful.
The lady Teresa sat in her chamber, or rather reclined,
in a loose undress suited to the season, upon a low couch,
the rich magnificence of which was strangely at variance
with the rude exterior of every thing around her. She was
unemployed, and her countenance was expressive of
thought, or at least, contemplation. Her face was grave
rather than sad, and the influence which at that moment
formed her mood, seemed to derive its character rather
from her mind than from her feelings. These seemed to
be little touched by the circumstances going on around her,
and in which, her recent relation with the mighty victim
destined for the sacrifice, considered, she might be naturally
supposed to have a leading and painful interest, even if she
recognised the perfect justice of his doom. The Searcher
of hearts, alone, could say, with certainty, what were her
thoughts and feelings; the student of human character
could only conjecture them. With him it would be
conclusive
against her, that her attitude was studiously
graceful
,
her robes disposed with propriety and a flowing
neatness
,
her long hair adjusted in wandering ringlets, and her
features, grave however they might be, indicative rather of
disquieting annoyances than of any serious and absorbing
subject of sorrow at work within her bosom. Her gravity
and solitude would, to him, seem more like the tribute
which the slave of social decorum would be expected to
pay to the expectations of society, than because of the
influence
of any innate and intrinsic feelings toiling for the
same effect. It was proper that the Lady Teresa should
be sad at this season in Acla, and the Lady Teresa was sad
accordingly.
Her solitude, and the silence of her chamber, were
disturbed
on a sudden by the sound of lightly-falling footsteps.
She looked up without any emotion, and the Indian woman
stood before her. Careta had hurried into the presence of
the lofty lady with a precipitation that was natural to such
emotions as filled her heart. But a sudden thrill went
through her veins, and her feet were fastened to the floor in
the instant that their eyes encountered. The poor Indian
needed no second glance to conceive the reason of her own
desertion by her noble lover. The beauty of Teresa
Davila
the
haughty and majestic character of her charms,
even heightened by the gravity which her features wore
seemed overpowering in her sight; and the pulsation
ceased for an instant at her heart, and her eyes were
riveted
on the gorgeous presence, while her hands were slightly
lifted, and extended towards her, as if in the act of
supplication
.
If the glorious beauty which she beheld did not
excuse the faithlessness of her lover, the thought was
prompt in the mind of Careta, which told her it sufficiently
accounted for it.
Whence come you? Who are you? demanded
Teresa
,
as her unlooked-for visiter still stood gazing with
worshipping or wondering eyes in perfect silence upon
her. The words of the lady freed the fettered limbs, if not
the tongue of the intruder; and rushing forward, without a
word, she threw herself at her feet, and grasping her hand,
carried it to her lips; then, suddenly releasing it, she drew
backwards, still kneeling the while, and with her eyes and
face nearly to the floor, she groaned aloud, and the
thickcoming
sobs, which rose from the bottom of her heart,
precluded all reply. Teresa, now startled and surprised,
raised herself from her reclining to an upright posture, and
with rapid accents repeated her inquiry. Receiving no
other answer than the continued sobs of the stranger, she
would have risen from the couch and summoned her
attendants
;
but suspecting her resolution, Careta grasped her
hand at this moment, and, with an obvious effort, controlled
her emotions in part, and rose at the same instant to her
feet.
I am she, my ladyI am the poor woman of Coyba,
of whom you have heard! I am she who dared to love my
lord, when he was sworn to love none other than your
ladyship. Forgive me, sweet lady, that I have been so
foolish as to lift my eyes where yours have been placed.
I am but a poor IndianI am not wise like the Spaniard
I knew not what I did.
The eyes of Teresa put on a vague inquiring
expression
as she replied.
What may this mean? Of whom,of what speak
you? There is surely some mistake in this.
Thou art the Lady Teresa, the daughter of the
governor, Don Pedrarias? said Careta.
The reply was affirmative.
Ah! I knew it could be none other. Thou art
beautiful
,
my lady,most beautiful. It were a wonder, indeed,
if there should be a man to behold and not to love thee.
It was not in the power of Teresa to suppress the
pleasurable
expression which mantled her hitherto grave
features
,
even as a soft glimpse of the dawn warms the cold,
gray foliage of the autumn forests. The tones of her voice
became kind and soothing, as, doubtful of the person who
stood before her, she sought to obtain the desired
knowledge
.
Thou hast guessed shrewdly, my pretty damsel; I am
she whom they call Teresa,I am the daughter of Don
Pedrarias. But thou speakest of my beauty as if it were
worthy to be seen, when thine own is very great. Thou
hast charms which should win the eyes of men among thy
people more certainly than could I among mine.
Alas! my lady, do not mock me. When thou
speakest
of the beauty of Careta, thou speakest to me of a thing
which is no longer of value in my eyes, even though it
should be deemed worthy in the sight of others. There
was a timeit was not many moons agowhen I loved
but too much to look down into the glassy waters that run
from the mountains of Darien, and behold the features
which thou hast praised too highly, but not more highly
than my own foolish and vain heart, in those days, had
esteemed
them. Then, it was a hope in my mind, that
they should seem to the eyes of others as they did in my
own; and when my lord looked upon them
Who is thy lord? What is he of whom thou hast
thrice spoken? demanded Teresa, with more curiosity, as
she hearkened to a form of speech so much more elevated
than any she had been accustomed to hear from the lips of
the Indian, and surveyed, with increasing interest, the
beauties of a countenance in which resignation to a loss of
all that was dear to her in life, seemed a prevailing
sentiment
struggling at the same time with a painful solicitude.
Ah! have I not said to thee? was her reply. Alas!
my lady, this should have been first spokenthe
adelantado
,
the Seor Vasco Nunez, is my lord.
Ha! was the sudden exclamation of Teresa, her form
rising as she spoke, and a glow passing over her cheek,
which indicated her growing consciousness as to the
character
of the person who now stood before her. The
Indian woman, who remarked these passing changes, and
to whom every change seemed full of danger to the one
object in her mind, hastened to conclude the speech which
the exclamation of Teresa had slightly interrupted.
But he loves not the poor Careta, my ladyhe cares
not if she lives or dies. He but took her from Coyba that
he might teach her in the religion of the Christians,and
now that he hath taught her, she will go back to Coyba,
and live among her own people. Oh! believe me, lady,
they that have told thee that he loved thee not, spoke what
they knew not, and have done my lord a grievous wrong.
I know, my lady, that he loves none but thee; and when
he left Isla Rica, it was only that he might behold and
love thee. This he told me, my lady. He told me by
the lips of the venerable man who reads the starshe
whom they call Micer Codro. I knew not of thy beauty
then, my lady, and my heart was given to my lord. I
maddened when I heard this tale. I maddened, and flung
myself into the waters of the ocean sea. But the Blessed
Mother saved me from deathsaved me, dear lady, that I
might tell thee all the truth, that thou might'st save my
lord. Thou wilt save himI know thou wiltthou wilt
go to thy fatherthou wilt show him how my lord has
been belied, and he shall then be thine, and thine only.
Careta will bless thee and pray for thee in Coyba, and will
never again look upon my lord. Turn not away from me,
my lady; by the Blessed Mother, I tell thee nothing but
the truth.
The proud spirit of the Spanish beauty was roused
within her, and her eyes flashed fire upon the Indian
woman as her speech proceeded. More than once she
would have stopped the flowing accents of her visiter, but
that Careta, as if fearing to leave something unspoken, the
want of which might prejudice her cause, uttered her
words with a rapidity that the more dignified damsel whom
she addressed would have scorned to emulate under
circumstances
even more trying to her feelings than those
which prompted the application of the Indian damsel.
And think you, she answered, when the other had
fairly ceasedthink you that Teresa Davila will accept
the base leavings of a savage! Look on me woman;do I
seem like one so desperate in hope and fortune, that I am
to grasp at the refuse of as Indian's intrigue, and take a
doomed traitor to my arms? They have told thee
falsehood
,
woman; the man of whom thou speakest is as nothing
to the daughter of Don Pedrarias Davila!
The Indian woman sank back affrighted,her lips parted
with an expression almost of horror,certainly of
consternation
,and
her hands were uplifted, as if in deprecation of
that haughty anger which she had so unwittingly provoked.
When she recovered breath, however, to continue her
appeal
,
she did so. There was too much at stake, to suffer
her to be discouraged by what she heard.
Forgive me, noble ladyI have said what has vexed
my ladyI know not the good speech of the Spaniards
I am a poor Indian woman of Coyba. But was it not true
that my lord was to wed with the Lady Teresa?
There was some such treaty with my father, was
the reply, but that was when the Senor Vasco was an
honourable gentlemannot when he became a traitor to
his sovereign.
But my lady loved him then?
Ayperhaps, was the hesitating answer.
Alas! can she not love him yet? Oh! my lady, if he
were a traitor to the king, believe me he was ever true to
thee. Do not thou leave him to his enemies. They seek
his life. He is doomed to die to-morrow ere the sun goes
down. One word from thee to thy father, and he lives.
Ay, to become once more a traitorto take once more
his Indian beauty to his arms.
The blessed mother of God forbid, my lady. No, no!
From that hour which makes him free, my lady, Careta
looks not upon him. He loves not the poor Indian. He
loves theeonly thee, my lady. Jesu be merciful and
incline
thy heart to him. Go to thy father, noble lady, and
let thy tears beg for his life.
My tears! No, no! It cannot beI can do nothing in
his behalf, even if I would.
But thou wouldstthou wilt!
The Spanish lady was silent; but her silence denoted
any thing but compliance. Her lips were closed with an
air of inflexible determination. The Indian was not
satisfied
.
Hear the poor woman of Coyba, my ladyhear her
have pity on her speech, and forgive when she offends
thee. She means not to offend; but her heart is full of
fear and sorrow, and she cannot stop to speak. She hath
loved my lordshe loves him even nowoh! how truly,
how fondly, she feels deep in her heart, though she cannot
show it with her tongue, which is a poor Indian's. Yet
she gives him up to thee, because he loves thee. She will
say to him, `be happy, my lord, with the Spanish lady;'I
will pray in Coyba for his happiness and yours. He shall
be all thine, my lady, if thou wilt but save his life. Nay,
if thou fearest the poor Indian, let her die. Let thy father
doom her to death in place of my lord.
The simple Indian could not persuade herselfindeed,
she had no thoughtthat the coldness and reluctance of
Teresa arose from any indifference to the object of her own
attachment. Her only impression was, that Teresa was
moved by jealousy to assume an attitude, which she felt
assured was no less unjust to her own feelings than
unnatural
in her sex. Not to love Vasco Nunez seemed as
utterly unlikely, as to suffer a brave man to die by a cruel
death, when it was in the power of a woman's voice to
interpose and save him. Unhappily, the words which she
employed were some of them the most ungracious which
could have been chosen for the haughty ears of Teresa.
Fear thee! exclaimed the latter, as with, to her, a
natural transition of mind, she turned to a polished steel
mirror that hung upon the walls, and beheld with feminine
complacency the proud beauty which it presented to her
eyesFear thee! Go, my poor woman, go; thy passion
for this traitor hath turned thy brain. It is pity enough;
for thou art comely to the eye. Thou hast erred in setting
thine eyes upon one of another race, and still more in
choosing one so unworthy of thy love. Goleave meI
can do nothing for theetrouble me not again.
The composed, contemptuous demeanour of the proud
beautyher ironical tonesthe complacent survey of her
person, which, during her speech, she had taken in the
mirror opposite, conveyed to the mind of her observer,
much more than her words, an idea of her true character. In
that instant, the conviction flashed for the first time upon
the Indian woman, of the utter callousness and
heartlessness
of the person whom she implored; and she now felt
aware, however difficult it had been to arrive at such a
conclusion, that Teresa Davila had actually suffered
herself
to be betrothed to one, and such an one as Vasco
Nunez
,
without loving him. The poor Indian clasped her
hands together, as these thoughts filled her mind, and her
own tearless eyes were for a moment lifted to heaven. In
another instant she turned them upon the haughty lady,
and a perceptible shiver shook her frame. No
exclamation
escaped her lips; but, giving a single looka look of
horrorat the beauty who stood waving her off with a
smiling scorn playing upon her lips the while,she darted
from the hateful presence, and, hopeless now of all the
world, fled once more to the prison, which, however
cheerless, contained all that was dear to her heart. The
scorn of Teresa Davila for the object whom she loved,
seemed to have had one effect which was no less
strange than pleasing to her soul. It made him dearer than
ever to her, as it seemed to confirm her own title to his
love. He shall find, she murmured to herself as she
wenthe shall find the poor Careta still loves though
she may not save him.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
THE FALL OF THE CURTAIN.
The
efforts to save Vasco Nunez from the cruel and
unjust
doom which threatened him, were not confined to the
Indian woman, in whose heart he had so dear an interest.
There were many good citizens at Acla, who heard with
sorrow the judgment passed upon him, who, at the
instigation
of Micer Codro, joined in a petition to Pedrarias to
pardon the supposed criminal, or, at least, to commute his
sentence to banishment and fine. They presumed, though
trembling at their own audacity, to suggest doubts of his
criminality, and to question the honesty of those upon
whose testimony he had been condemned. They dwelt
upon the wondrous discoveries he had made, and their
great importance to the crown of Spain and to the fortunes
of the Spanish people; and though they especially avoided
hinting such a conviction, in their application for mercy to
a tyrant who had ever before shown a temper the most
merciless, their petition was warmed into enthusiasm as
they felt that, though Vasco Nunez might be guilty of the
alleged crime, there was even in that a noble daring which
amply sustained all their previous impressions of his eagle
character, and made his so sudden doom a matter not
merely of severity but cruelty. Micer Codro himself
appeared
before the arbiter of his friend's fate, and on bended
knee, implored for a remission of his doom as a gift of
mercy rather than a due of justicea concession,
however
,
which the proud spirit of Vasco Nunez had
especially
commanded him not to make. But the
bloody-minded
Pedrarias was inflexible. He had no reason now
to keep any terms with his rival. The power was in his
VOL. II. 24
own hands, and his fear of the man he had so frequently
wronged, and had now so completely dishonoured, left him
no alternative of safety, but in the consummation of the
long list of his wrongs by the last penal act of murder. He
dared not suffer him to live; and his passion of jealousy
had now reached that stage of excitation which excluded
every consideration of policy, no less than humanity, from
his mind.
No! he exclaimed, as he dismissed the petitioners
from his presenceI would sooner perish on the block
myself than spare him.
It was a day of gloom and consternation in Acla which
had been assigned for the sacrifice of this noble victim.
Lamentations were heard in all the streets. The populace,
though, under the dominion of so jealous a tyrant as
Pedrarias
,
and surrounded by his soldiers, they did not dare to
complain, were yet every where in tears. Few or none
among them regarded him as guilty, but all esteemed him
as a brave and noble gentleman, sacrificed to the base
enmity
of a cruel and vindictive rival. In the dungeon of
the prisoner there was, perhaps, more sunshine. The
soul of Vasco Nunez grew more and more calm and
fearless
as the hour of his fate approached; and his heart, if
more tender and subdued than ever by some of the
circumstances
of his situation, was, at the same time, more
free than before from many harassing doubts and bitter
self-childings. He had sought to banish from his mind the
remembrance of Teresa Davila, and the hope being for
ever banished which made him think of her as his wife,
he was the better able to do justice to the claims of the
devoted woman of Coyba, who was a silent mourner at
his side. When the astrologer returned from the presence
of Pedrarias, and declared to him the rejection of all the
prayers which had been made in his behalf, a smile of the
most perfect resignation passed over the features of the
condemned.
I looked not for other answer, Micer CodroI warned
you of the hopelessness of your mission. You have bent
your knee in vaindishonoured yourself without serving
me. I trust he denies me not the presence of the holy
man?
No. The Jeronimite is in waiting.
Let him attend, said Vasco Nunez, I will the
sooner be prepared to die when I have done the last act of
justice.
The friar was summoned, and shortly made his
appearance
.
Father, said Vasco Nunez, ere I make my last
confession
,
and receive from your hands the holy sacrament,
there is another no less solemn sacrament which I would
have you perform. It is needful as an act of expiation, to
heaven no less than earth. I would have you unite me in
the bands of wedlock with this woman of Coyba. Arise,
Careta, and give me thy hand.
She rose passively, and they, whom the sharp stroke of
death was so soon to separate, were united for ever.
Careta!
My lord!
Leave me now with this holy man. Go with Micer
Codro, he will take care of thee, and be thy friend and
father, when I shall be sleeping.
Alas! my lord, wherefore wilt thou send me from thy
side? Let me not go. What need that we should
separate
?
Has not the holy man made us one by the
Christian
lawand should I leave thee now to lose thee for
ever? Send me not hencelet me be with thee until
She could not speak the rest; but burying her face in his
bosom, her sobs completed the sentence. Long and fondly
did he clasp her within his manacled arms, and the sorrow
was no less sweet than sacred with which he contemplated
so much love. He put her away at length.
For awhile, Careta, until the holy father and myself
have spoken of matters most needful to my soul's peace.
Go thou with Micer Codro. We shall meet again.
The astrologer was about to lead her away, when the
prisoner summoned him to his side. In a whisper he
said
Keep her closelet her not see me again till all is
over; thenremember!
The unfinished sentence contemplated some previous
instructions which he had given the astrologer, about the
removal of Careta to the dominions of the Cassique of
Coyba, her father. Another fond look, another embrace,
and Careta was borne from the dreary cell of her lord.
An hour after, and the prisoner was joined by the
astrologer
.
Hast thou secured her? was the question of the
former. I trust thou hast deceived her as to the time of
execution.
All, all, my sonit is done according to thy wish,
was the reply.
That pang, at least, is spared me. I could wish,
Micer Codro, my friend and my father, that thou too wert
far from the sight of this bloody act. Were it not well
that thou too shouldst be away?
I will be with thee to the last, my son. For long
years of pride and pleasure, we have dwelt, and moved, and
toiled, and suffered, together. I will not leave thee now
when we are to be torn asunder by these cruel hands. I
will stand by thy side when the sword falls, that I may
feel a pang in my heart no less sharp than that which thy
body must undergo.
Ah! Micer Codro, it will add to my pang to behold
thee at that instant. I would there were no other pang;
but I fear, Micer Codroit is like a fiery arrow in my
brain, the fearthat Teresa Davila knew of her father's
purpose, when she wrote me that letter from Darien.
Think'st thou so, my son?
Careta, when she left us so suddenly last night, sought
her out in her father's dwelling. She has kept from me
all that took place between them, the single fact excepted,
that she saw and pleaded with her, and that her prayers
were without avail. I pressed to know from her the truth,
but the noble creature refused to speak, and her refusal has
oppressed me with this cruel fear. I know that Careta
would not do her wrongI know that in mercy to me she
would forbear any speech which could give me sorrow.
Had Teresa betrayed a feeling which had been grateful to
her heart, the generous creature would have poured it forth
into mine, with the impatience of a spirit that loves all
forms of justice and humanity. A mournful look
sometimes
a bitter smilehas answered all my entreaties on this
subject; and when I have chided her with her reluctance,
she wept bitterly, and, imploring my forgiveness, as
resolutely
continued silent.
Said she nothing?
Yes,her first words as she came to the prison, may,
perhaps, sufficiently declare the meaning of her silence.
`I have seen her, the Spanish lady,' she exclaimed, `I
have seen her, my lord, I have looked upon her, and my
words have answered hers. Oh! wherefore did my lord
suffer her words to bring him from Isla Rica?' I asked
her, striving to smile as I did so, `Dost thou not think her
beautiful, Careta?'`Beautiful!' she exclaimed, covering
her face with her hands, while a shiver went through her
frame at the instant, rattling the chains which my arms had
partly thrown around her.
There was meaning enough in that, my son. I have
long counselled thee against this woman. She hath none
of the sweet juices of humanity within her heart. It will
wither, my son, long years before she herself shall perish
it will begin to wither in that moment when the axe
shall fall upon thy neck.
Nay, nay! Curse her not with a doom so cruel.
It is her own doom. Her heart hath cursed itself.
Alas! if it be true! exclaimed Vasco Nunez.
Never yet was beauty to vie with hers. Ha! the bell!
It tolls! It strikes my heart with a hollow, ringing sound
like its own. The hour is come, my father, for our
parting
.
Leave me, I pray thee. I will look more firmly upon
the crowd and the scaffold, if I meet none of the faces that
I love.
I will leave thee never, my sonnever, while you
have life. Jesu forbid, that I should shorten by a single
instant, the time left us for communion.
Be thou firm, falter not, Micer CodroI should prove
feeble wert thou to fail.
The guards were at the entrance in the next moment;
and with a free step, erect carriage, and placid countenance,
Vasco Nunez emerged into the open air, amidst the crowd
of sorrowful and exulting faces which encountered him at
the portals of the prison. Their various aspects produced
no change in his. He walked forward with as little
seeming
emotion, as if he had the least interest of all in the
terrible
proceedings, until he reached the public square of
Acla, when the whole dreadful array of death met his
sightthe scaffold and the executioner, and the grim
guards already surrounding it and in waiting. A slight
shudder of his frame might have been visible to a close
eye as he approached the scaffold, but it passed away in
another moment, and he ascended the ignominious eminence
with a firm martial tread, and looked with unblenching
cheek and fearless aspect upon the assembly.
24*
Is thy weapon keen? he asked of the masked
headsman
,
whose slender frame seemed to promise but little of
that strength which was required for such a duty as that
before him. The man lifted the axe in silence, and
presented
the edge to the destined victim. Vasco Nunez,
utterly
unawed, passed his finger over the blade.
It will do, if thou strike but firmly. It needs that it
be keen in thy hands, which do not seem to justify the task
thou hast chosen.
Thou wilt have no reason to reproach me again with
feebleness, Seor Vasco, nor wilt thou have the power,
when I have struck but a single stroke at thy neck, was
the reply of the executioner.
Surely that voice is not strange in my ears, exclaimed
Vasco Nunez as he heard it, who art thou?
One who promised, long months ago, to stand beside
thee in the last moments of thy life, said the other,
partially lifting his mask so as to show his face only to
the victim.
Ha! Pedro! Unhappy young man, wherefore hast
thou pursued me with such bitter malice? Why hast
thou perjured thy soul to hell for ever, that thou mightest
shed the blood of one who hath ever bestowed care and
kindness upon thee?
Pedro no longer, Seor Vasco, replied the other,
that name was but assumed, that I might win thy
confidence
and secure an opportunity for vengeance. Know
me for Andres Garabitothe brother of that Jorge
Garabito
whom you so basely murdered by night in the town
of Santo Domingo.
And for this have you pursued me to the death, and
for no other cause?
Ay! for thisfor this cause and no other.
Then let it blast thy hope, and sicken thee for ever,
unhappy youth, to know that Vasco Nunez is utterly
guiltless of thy brother's death. Weapon of mine never
touched his lifethis I swear in the presence of the great
Judge, before whom my soul shall shortly appear.
I believe thee not! I cannotdare not believe thee,
murderer, cried the executioner with hoarse and choking
accents. Bend thyself to thy doom, lest my arm
tremble
with the rage and passion of my soul.
Vasco Nunez regarded him with a countenance of
mingled
pity and aversion; but he turned away as the public
crier announced the moment fixed for the fatal blow. His
proclamation changed the current of the victim's thoughts,
and converted all of his feelings into indignation.
Hear, hear, ye people of Acla! This is the
punishment
inflicted by command of the king and his lieutenant,
Don Pedrarias Davila, on this man, Vasco Nunez, as a traitor
to the crown of Castile, and a usurper of its territories.
It is false, people of Acla! exclaimed Vasco Nunez,
in reply. It is false! I am guiltless of this crime, and
here, in the equal sight of God and man, I declare to ye
that I have ever served my sovereign with truth and
loyalty, and sought rather to augment than take from his
dominions.
These words, says the historian, of no avail in his
extremity
,
were yet fully believed by the people of Acla,
with the exception of those who were the creatures of
Pedrarias. That tyrant, meanwhile, heard the proud
denial
of his victim, while, with gloating hate, he watched
in secret, from between the reeds of a house near the
scaffold, the progress of the bloody scene. At this
moment
,
and while the deep tones and indignant words of
the victim yet vibrated in the ears of the populace, a
wild, piercing shrieka woman's shriekrang through
the multitude. The keen, quick eyes of Vasco Nunez
turned in the direction of the sounds, and his heart
quivered
with a new emotion which he vainly strove to suppress,
when he beheld Careta, with flowing hair and frantic
footstep
,
making her desperate way through the crowd.
Micer Codro, he exclaimed, hastily, she hath
escaped
.
Deathsman! he said, turning to the executioner,
whose own emotions were almost perceptibleand
kneeling
down to the block as he spokesee that thou strike
quickly and fairly. Let it be over ere she comes. Micer
Codrofarewell!
Stay! said the executioner, burden not thy soul
with a lie. Confesssay that thy hand slew my brother.
Traitor and perjurerstrike! and damn thy soul with
the concluding crime. Whatever may be the guilt of
Vasco Nunez, his soul is innocent of that. His arm
touched not the life of Garabito.
Thou liest! I will not believe thee! I know thou
liest! was the hoarse cry of the deathsman, as the keen
weapon descended. The bloody head rolled along the
scaffold at the moment when Careta rushed up the gory
steps. One wild shriek of horror burst from her lips, and
she fellfell like a stoneupon the body of her lord;
and when Micer Codro lifted her up from the corse, life had
departed from her also. The ligaments that secured her heart
had cracked and given way in that awful instant; and the
immortal spirit of Vasco Nunez had scarcely risen from the
spot where his body suffered death, ere it was joined by the
most devoted soul that had ever loved and valued it before.
The mask dropped from the face of the secretary, while he
gazed upon the mighty man whom he had destroyed.
Thou! exclaimed the astrologer, thou hast carried
out thy malice to the last.
He slew Jorge Garabito, my brother! cried the
secretary
;
had he not, Micer Codro, I had worshipped
him.
He slew him not! replied the astrologer solemnly.
Were the dead to arise and say so, I should be sworn
against them. I have the proofs written by the Bachelor
Enciso, and Ortado, the matador, the last of whom beheld
the deed.
They have sworn falsely then, said Francisco
Pizarro
,
who came forward at this moment, with a grin of bitter
satisfaction on his featureshere is one who beheld the
death-bed of Ortado, the matador, and heard his last
confession
,
by which we learn that he was employed by Jorge
Garabito and Enciso to slay Vasco Nunez as he came from
the bohio of Teresa Davila, whom he was known to seek
nightly in San Domingo. Garabito went with the
matador
,
and stood in waiting behind a tree, where he was
slain by one unknown, at the very time when Vasco
Nunez
was advancing towards him, the said Ortado, in front.
This he knows, for he beheld Vasco Nunez plainly. It
was the purpose of Enciso to destroy Vasco Nunez, and
hence the assassination was placed to his score. The
Jeronimite will show all this.
Wild with fear, hoarse with agitating and conflicting
emotions
,
the perjured secretary rushed to the friar, who laid
before him the written confession of the matador,
confirming
all that Pizarro had said. Long did the miserable
youth strive against convictionfor days did he seek every
associate in Acla, from whose conjectures he might hope to
find any basis for that belief which had prompted him to
the crime which he had committed. But the dreaded
truth rose triumphant over the fond artifices of his hope
ann thought; and when he could no longer baffle it, the
conviction became fatal to his sanitymadness followed;
and crying aloud to all he met, that hell was already in
his heart, he disappeared for ever from the scene of his
dreadful crimes, and blind, reckless vengeance. By the
paternal care and fond friendship of Micer Codro, the
victims
of his perjury found a humble burial place at Acla.
Of the fate of Micer Codro himself, a brief notice is given
by Irving, taken from the relation of the historian Oviedo,
who happened to be in Darien at the period of these events.
It appears, says this writer, that, after the death of
Vasco Nunez, he continued for several years rambling
about the New World, in the train of the discoverers; bent
upon studying the secrets of its natural history, rather than
searching after its treasures. In the course of his
wanderings
he was once coasting the shores of the Southern
Ocean, in a ship commanded by one Geronimo de
Valenzuela
,
from whom he received such cruel treatment as to
cause his death. Finding his end approaching, he
addressed
Valenzuela in the most solemn manner. `You
have,' said he, `caused my death by your cruelty; I now
summon you to appear with me, within a year, before the
judgment-seat of God.' The captain made a light and
scoffing answer, and treated his summons with contempt.
They were then off the coast of Veragua, near the verdant
islands of Zebaco, which lie at the entrance of the Gulf of
Paria. The poor astrologer gazed wistfully with his dying
eyes upon the green and shady groves, and entreated the
mate of the caraval to land him upon one of the islands
that he might die in peace. `Micer Codro,' said the mate,
`these are not islands, but points of land.' `They are,
indeed, islands,' replied the astrologer, `good and pleasant
and well-watered, and near to the coast. Land me, I pray
you, upon one of these islands, that I may have comfort
in my dying hour.' The pilot was touched by the prayer
and conveyed him to the shore. He laid him on the
herbage
in the shade, where the poor wanderer soon expired.
The pilot buried him at the foot of a tree, and carved a
cross on the bark to mark the grave. Some time afterward,
Oviedo was on the island with the same pilot, who showed
him the cross on the tree, and gave his testimony to
the good character and worthy conduct of Micer Codro.
Oviedo, as he regarded the nameless grave, passed the
eulogium
of a scholar upon the poor astrologer. `He died,'
said he, `like Pliny, in the discharge of his duties,
travelling
about the world to explore the secrets of nature.'
According
to his account, the prediction of Micer Codro held
good with respect to Valenzuela, as it had in the case of
Vasco Nunez. The captain died within the term in which
he had summoned him to appear before the tribunal of
God.
The various fortunes and fate of Pizarro and Pedrarias
are well known. The history of Teresa Davila is less so,
but a few words will suffice for her. Her heart, even as
the astrologer had emphatically spoken, withered within
her. She lived, like her father and his brutal ally,
unblessing
and unblest. Let none accuse the justice of God,
because
death does not follow the evil deeds of the criminal.
To those who have in their hearts no choice spring of
humanity
,
life is but a weary trial and a vexing strife; and
better had it been for these cruel persons, had they suffered
the sharp pang of death, like their victim, a thousand
times, than endure the continual sappings of hope in their
heartsthe bitterness of that desolation which is the due
reward of a mean and narrow selfishnessthe absence of
all confidence among menthe constant dread of treachery
the distrust of friendshipthe doubts of lovethe death,
in short, of all those joys of the heart and mind which can
alone make life an object of desire. They lived, indeed,
to triumph above the graves of many other victims, only
less great and less noble than Vasco Nunez; but they were
wretched even in their conquests, and though the shame
and dishonour which hang about their memories, may not
depict the misery of their secret souls, during their bitter
and merciless career of life, it will not be difficult to
imagine
what seeds of bitterness and sorrow must have sprung
in such wretched soilhow they must have been haunted
ever by the shadows of evil deeds, and the goadings of evil
thoughts, and perished at length, looking back without
satisfaction
to the past, and forward, to the future, without
hope. Let us leave them.
THE END.